(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“Loose Women airs weekdays from 12.30pm on ITVGot a story?”
“...magazine to the Grenfell Tower fire victims fund.”
“The couple, who wed 10 years ago in Portofino, renewed their vows recently at their 18th century mansion and in lieu of gifts, they asked their guests to donate to the relief fund.”
“3 Credit: ITVThe devastating fire ripped through the Grenfell Tower block in North Kensington on June 14 leaving 80 confirmed dead but the true death toll will not to be known until later this year.”
“Speaking on Loose Women, Penny said they wanted to give back while celebrating their special day.”
“She said: "My husband just said: 'Look I know we said no gifts but how about I just hand a hat around and everyone makes a donation to the terrible fire that happened in Grenfell Tower'.”
“"And everyone was generous to do that and Rod quadrupled it and then afterwards we wanted to make some more money and thought we could sell some of the pictures.”
“"While the ceremony was going on we couldn't help but reflect on all the families that were suffering and we were there having a fun time.”
“"But in the same essence it's important that we put our arms around each other and share those moments together because you just never know do you?”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
"The dissolute woman" starts broadcasting at 12:30 noon on Sunday. Is there any report? "
“… Glenfield building fire victims fund magazine
"The couple, who married in Portofino 10 years ago, recently took another oath in their 18th Century Mansion, asking guests to donate to the relief fund instead of gifts."
"3 credit: on June 14, a devastating fire hit the Glenfield building north of Kensington, killing 80 confirmed deaths, but the real death toll will not be known until later this year."
Speaking of "licentious women," penny said they wanted something in return for celebrating their special day
"My husband just said," listen, I know we said we didn't have a gift, but I just need to get a hat and everyone donates to the terrible fire that happened in Glenfield building, OK? "She said
"Everyone was very generous, rod quadrupled it, and then we wanted to make some more money and think we could sell some photos."
"As the ceremony went on, we couldn't help reflecting on all the families who suffered. We had a good time there."
"But it's just as important that we embrace each other and share those moments together, because you never know, do you?"



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The two apologize to each other, with both confessing how much they genuinely love each other.”
“Amy goes to the church where Ruth is in order to try and repair her relationship with her mother.”
“Ruth, Sandy and Isis all meet and chat while their daughters have fun with their kids.”
“In an effort to tamp down those plans Amy takes the family to Sky Zone to meet up with Kiki and Carla and their families.”
“Ruth tries to create a spectacle out of Christmas, rather than keeping it simple like Amy wanted.”
“But while commiserating about the pressures of the holidays they make a pact to "take Christmas back".”
“Eventually, Amy, Kiki and Carla go to the mall where they express their misery over the holidays.”
“Surprised by this turn of events, Carla is excited to spend time with her.”
“When Carla (Kathryn Hahn) gets home, her mother, Isis (Susan Sarandon), has arrived, telling her she intends to spend time with her for the first time in years.”
“Sandy's love for Kiki is overwhelming, and smothering Kiki.”


"The two apologized to each other and admitted how much they really loved each other."
"Amy went to Ruth's church to try to repair her relationship with her mother."
"Ruth, Sandy and Isis all meet and chat, while their daughter has a good time with the children."
"In order to suppress these plans, Amy takes her family to skyzone to meet with Kiki, Kara and their families."
"Ruth is trying to create a Christmas spectacle, not as simple as Amy wants."
"However, while sympathizing with the pressure of the festival, they reached an agreement to" take Christmas back. "
Finally, Amy, Kiki and Kara go to the shopping mall, where they express the pain of the festival
"It surprised Carla. She's happy to be with her."
When Carla (Katherine Hahn) comes home, her mother Isis (Susan Sarandon) has come and tells her that she plans to be with her for the first time in many years
"Sandy's love for Kiki is overwhelming and chokes Kiki."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But now it’s private, off limits.””
“I said what it meant to me, and anyone can go and look at that if they want to know what I feel.”
“Moss, who was raised in the church, told Vulture in 2014, “I’m not going to talk about it anymore.”
“And so Gilead and ‘THT’ hit me on a very personal level.”The 35-year-old thanked the fan for the interesting question, ending the comment with a winking emoji blowing a kiss.”
“The most important things to me probably.”
“Religious freedom and tolerance and understanding the truth and equal rights for every race, religion and creed are extremely important to me.”
“Gilead [the fictional country in the show] and Scientology both believe that all outside sources (aka news) are wrong and evil…it’s just very interesting.”But Moss, who is famously hush-hush about being a Scientologist, responded, “That’s actually not true at all about Scientology.”
““Question though, does it make you think twice about Scientology?”
“The actress came to the defense of her controversial faith after a fan questioned her on whether there are any similarities between Scientology and the totalitarian government in Moss’ Hulu series “The Handmaid’s Tale.”“Love this adaptation so much,” the fan commented on one of Moss’ recent Instagram photos.”
“Elisabeth Moss has candidly addressed being a Scientologist in a post on Instagram.”


"But now it's private. No entry."
"I said what it means to me, and anyone can go and see if they want to know how I feel."
"Moss grew up in church, and in 2014 he told the vulture," I don't want to talk about that anymore. "
"So Gilead and 'tht' gave me a very personal impression." The 35 year old thanks his fans for asking this interesting question and ends up with a wink and a kiss
"Probably the most important thing for me is."
"Religious freedom and tolerance, understanding the truth and equal rights of every race, religion and belief, are extremely important to me."
"Gillette and Scientology both believe that all external sources (aka News) are wrong and evil It's very interesting. " But moss, known for his reticence to Scientology, replied, "Scientology is not right at all."
"The question is, does that make you think twice about Scientology?"
The actress defended her controversial beliefs after a fan questioned whether there were similarities between Scientology and totalitarian government in Moss's Hulu series the maid's story. In a recent instagram photo of moss, the fan commented, "I love this adaptation so much."
"In a post on instagram, Elisabeth moss said frankly that she was a Scientologist."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thanks @instylemagaine for a beautiful dinner," the model wrote.”
“LOVE YOU, you deserve it all.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoBehati Prinsloo (R) and Adam Levine attend the Academy Awards on February 22, 2015.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoBehati Prinsloo (R), pictured with Adam Levine and daughter Dusty Rose, captured a cute picture of Levine and Dusty's bare backsides.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoNov. 22 (UPI) -- Behati Prinsloo posted a cheeky photo Tuesday of husband Adam Levine and their toddler daughter.”
“The pregnant 28-year-old model captured a cute picture of Levine and 14-month-old Dusty Rose's bare backsides that she shared with her 5.2 million Instagram followers.”
“AdvertisementThe snapshot shows Levine holding Dusty's hand as he appears to lead her to a bubble bath.”
“Prinsloo covered her family's behinds with peach emojis.”
“"Same butt different," she captioned the photo.”
“Same butt different  A post shared by Behati Prinsloo Levine (@behatiprinsloo) on Nov 21, 2017 at 5:28pm PSTPrinsloo and Levine welcomed Dusty in September 2016, and announced this September that they're expecting their second child.”


"Thank you @ instylemagaine for a wonderful meal," the model wrote
"Love you, everything you deserve."
"Information photo of Jim ruymen / UPI | license photobehati Prinsloo (right) and Adam Levine attend the Oscar ceremony on February 22, 2015."
"Jim ruymen / UPI's photo | license photobehati Prinsloo (right) with Adam Levine and his daughter dusty rose, captures a lovely picture of Levin and dusty's bare back."
"Information photo by Jim Luhmann / UPI | license photonov. On the 22nd, behati Prinsloo released a photo of her cheeky husband Adam Levine and their toddler daughter
"The pregnant 28 year old model took a lovely picture of Levin and 14-month-old dusty Ross naked, which she shared with 5.2 million instagram fans."
"The commercial snapshot shows Levin holding dasti's hand as if to take her to a bubble bath."
"Prinsloo used a peach expression to cover up the sequelae of her family."
"The same ass is different," she added a caption to the photo
"A post shared by behati Prinsloo Levine (@ behatiprinsloo) and Levine on November 21, 2017 at 5:28 p.m. welcomed dusty in September 2016 and announced in September this year that they would have a second child."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lisa states that she loves Dorit, mainly cuz she loves Dorit’s husband, so therefore she cannot spoil this relationship.”
“Amen, sister.”
“Watching Erika prep for a night out is my most favorite thing ever.”
“No time to waste- everyone has to get ready for the evening’s festivities.”
“As the ladies pile back into the van post fashion show, the tension is so thick you could cut it with a knife.”
“#solidwork.”
“It is cute to hear how proud Camille is and it is quite refreshing to hear a mother talk like a mother, and not like a Rinna.”
“Erika claims that Mason looks fabulous, although I am not quite sure how she is even seeing anything with those shades on.”
“So classic.”
“It was only a matter of time before Rinna had to bring up her wanna-be Haddid daughters.”


"Lisa said she loved dorit mainly because she loved her husband, so she couldn't break the relationship."
"Amen, sister."
"It's my favorite thing to watch Erica go out at night."
"Don't waste time - everyone should be ready for the evening celebration."
"When the ladies get together and go back to the van post show, the tension is so intense that you can cut it off with a knife."
"Three dimensional works."
"It's lovely to hear how proud Camille is. It's refreshing to hear a mother speak like a mother, not like Lina."
"Erica said Mason looks beautiful, although I'm not sure how she can see things with these sunglasses."
"It's classic."
"Linna wants to be Hadid's daughter sooner or later."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’re so happy she and her family have a secure place to call home.”
“Freeman shared the story in this emotional video And she later shared more about Cyrus s awesome generosity on her Twitter account Thank you ALL but she found us placement until we found permanent housing gave me the deposit covered me for 6 months so I can get on my...”
“In 2014, she founded The Happy Hippie Foundation in order to help combat homelessness, particularly among LGBTQ youth and other vulnerable populations.”
“She’s not just the face and brains behind this important organization, Cyrus also puts her money where her mouth is.”
“When the 25-year-old musician found out that a contestant from her team on NBC’s “The Voice” was facing homelessness, Cyrus sprung into action.”
“Janice Freeman appeared on season 13 of “The Voice,” where she was part of Team Miley.”
“Unfortunately, Freeman was eventually eliminated from the show.”
“As fans of “The Voice” who remember her know, Freeman has not had an easy road in life.”
“Freeman had her daughter Hannah when she was 21, and when Hannah was just 4 years old, the girl’s father died of cancer.”
“Then, Freeman herself was diagnosed with cervical cancer.”


"We're happy that she and her family have a safe place to call home."
"Freeman shared this story in this touching video. She later shared more about Cyrus' awe inspiring generosity on her twitter account. Thank you, but she found our place until we found a permanent house and gave me a six-month deposit so that I could go to my..."
"In 2014, she founded the happy Hippie foundation to help address homelessness, especially among LGBTQ youth and other vulnerable groups."
"She's not only the face and brain behind this important organization, Cyrus also talks about money."
"When the 25-year-old musician discovered that one of her team members on NBC's" the voice "was facing homelessness, Cyrus immediately took action."
Janice Freeman, a member of Miley's team, appeared in season 13 of the sound
"Unfortunately, Freeman was eliminated in the end."
"I remember her voice fans all know that Freeman's life is not easy."
Freeman gave birth to her daughter Hannah when she was 21, and her father died of cancer when Hannah was 4
"Later, Freeman himself was diagnosed with cervical cancer."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I want to see him in jail.”Red Sparrow hits theaters this Friday—so savor the few days we have left of Lawrence’s publicity-tour jabs.”
“The way that he destroyed so many women’s lives.”
“The actress, who previously worked with the disgraced mogul on the film Silver Linings Playbook, has continually been dragged into stories about his fall from grace—most recently when Weinstein’s legal team used an old quote from Lawrence to defend the producer’s character in court.”
“(In case you forgot: he’s been accused of sexual misconduct by dozens of women but denies all claims of nonconsensual acts.)”
“Lawrence’s press tour for Red Sparrow has, as a result, doubled as a Distance Yourself from Weinstein Tour.”
“She talked about him on 60 Minutes, she talked about him with Oprah, and now she’s talking about him on Stephen Colbert’s Late Show.”
“In a Monday night interview after Colbert provided her with a few rounds of rum a bit he s done before with stars like Dakota Johnson the actress excoriated Weinstein s team for using her words without her permission He is just that horrible ass boil that does not go...”
“...away she declared...”
““You pop the ass boil.”
“He’s just the worst.”


"I want to see him go to jail." The red sparrow opens on Friday. Enjoy the rest of Lawrence's publicity tour
"He ruined so many women's lives."
The actress, who had previously worked with the infamous tycoon on the screenplay "a glimmer of hope", was constantly involved in the story of Weinstein's fall from grace when Weinstein's lawyers recently cited an old saying from Lawrence in court to defend her role as a producer
"(in case you forget: he was accused of sexual misconduct by dozens of women, but denied all charges of non sexual conduct.)
"As a result, the distance between Lawrence's" red sparrow "reporter tour and Weinstein's tour has doubled."
"She talked about him on 60 minutes, she talked about him on Oprah, and now she talks about him on Stephen Colbert's evening show."
"In an interview on Monday night, Colbert provided her with several rounds of rum, which he had drunk with stars like Dakota Johnson before. The actress accused Weinstein's team of using her words without her permission. He was just a creepy guy and couldn't go..."
“…… She announced that... "
"You've burned your butt."
"He's the worst."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get engaged.”
“So what’s the best way to get everyone to give a sh*t?”
“Bella Thorne and Mod SonMuch like showering, I really didn’t think holy matrimony was in the cards for Bella Thorne and Mod Son.”
“This is the only couple on this list I really want marriage for.”
“There, I said it.”
“She deserves holy matrimony with Corey.”
“She DGAF about what’s appropriate and what isn’t.”
“And besides, Kris Jenner is Big D*ck Energy.”
“...her vocabulary...”
“But Kris Jenner capitalized off of her daughter s leaked sex tape let her 16 year old kid get lip injections and possibly has an illegitimate daughter with OJ Simpson so I don t think age appropriate is really in...”


"Get engaged."
"So what's the best way to surprise everyone?"
"Bella Thorne and Maud Thorne like bathing very much. I really don't think Bella Thorne and Maud Thorne's son can have a sacred marriage."
"This is the only couple on the list that I really want to get married."
"Well, I said it."
"She should marry Corey."
"She doesn't know what's right and what's not."
"And Chris Jenner is a big d * ck energy company."
“… Her vocabulary... "
"But Chris Jenner used the sex video leaked by her daughter to give her 16-year-old a lip injection and maybe have an illegitimate daughter with OJ Simpson, so I don't think the age is right. It's really..."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Thankful for the love and joy my besties fill me with all year round!"”
“The pop star turned 37 on Monday and celebrated by having a party that included a homemade Twister mat with the faces of Bravo stars.”
“In the photo shared on Aguilera's Instagram story of the game, The Real Housewives of New York City cast members Luann de Lesseps and Bethenny Frankel are featured.”
“InstagramThe former Voice coach also shared a pic of her birthday cake, which read: "Happy birthday, Xtina.”
“We love you!"”
“InstagramAs for her birthday outfit, Aguilera wore three different shades of pink, including a slip dress, jacket and heels.”
“"Feeling pretty in b-day pink?”
“...she captioned the pic of her ensemble.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Thank my babies for their love and joy all year round!"
"The pop star turned 37 on Monday, and to celebrate his birthday, he held a party with a homemade wrapping mat with many stars' faces on it."
"In the game story photos Aguilera shared on instagram, New York City's real housewife crew members Luan de Lesseps and Bethany Frankel are the protagonists."
Instagram, the former voice coach, also shared a photo of a birthday cake that said, "happy birthday, xtina."
"We love you!"
"On instagras, Aguilera wears three different shades of pink, including a dress, jacket and high heels."
"Is it beautiful to wear b-day pink?"
“… She made a title for her ensemble
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“LaBeouf was arrested in January at his anti-Donald Trump livestream in New York.”
“The public can view a livestream of museum-goers and the trio's texts on the museum's website.”
“Visitors to the Kiasama museum in Helsinki can visit a cabin and send a text to LaBeouf, Ronkko and Turner, who can respond to visitors but can't talk to one another.”
“Ronkko and Turner also are spending time isolated in separate cabins in Lapland beginning Wednesday.”
“The project is called #ALONETOGETHER and involves the other two members of the actor's art collective, Nastja Ronkko and Luke Turner.”
“Shia LaBeouf's latest stunt is to spend a month isolated in a cabin in Finland's remote Lapland region, with his only communication with the outside world coming via text message to visitors to a Helsinki museum.”
“Shia LaBeouf Spending a Month Living Alone in Finland CabinHis only communication with the outside world will come via text message to visitors to a Helsinki museum.”


"Labov was arrested in January in New York during an anti Donald Trump live broadcast."
"The public can view the museum's audience and three person text in real time on the museum website."
"Visitors to the Asama Museum in Helsinki can visit a cabin and text Labov, Ronco and Turner. They can reply to visitors but not talk to each other."
"From Wednesday, Ronco and Turner were also isolated in different huts in Lapland."
"This project is called" the unity of alonet "and is involved by two other members of the cast, nasteja Ronco and Luke Turner."
"Shia Labov's latest stunt is to be isolated from the outside world for a month in a hut in the remote Lapland area of Finland. His only way to communicate with the outside world is to text visitors to a museum in Helsinki."
"Shiite rabov lived alone in Finland for a month, and his only communication with the outside world will be sent to visitors to the Helsinki Museum by text message."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It wasn't like this 'ah ha' moment.”
“I'd say [I found my personal style] in the last couple years.”
“Since "Very Cavallari" is largely set in a retail and fashion environment, we took the opportunity of its launch to ask the reality show star, designer and entrepreneur about her shopping habits, from her teen years to today.”
“"It's a great representation of my style because everything is effortless and dainty and simple."”
“"I design everything that I love and want to wear," she tells Fashionista over the phone from Nashville.”
“...and, of course, launching Uncommon James.”
“Cavallari has been stacking her fashion resumé since "The Hills" by curating a NFL-themed runway show at New York Fashion Week, designing her eponymous shoe line in collaboration with Chinese Laundry, commenting on red carpet fashion for E!”
“...recently launched jewelry and lifestyle line opening its flagship store and overseeing a team of TV ready staffers at the company HQ”
“This time around Cavallari moves into another life via reality TV fishbowl set not in Southern California but her new home of Nashville Tenn Very Cavallari showcases the titular star s home life with NFL quarterback husband Jay Cutler and her three kids and professional responsibilities running Uncommon James her...”
“'s thunder on spin-off "The Hills" by surprise-sauntering into Speidi's wedding in 2009?)”


"It's not such an aha moment."
"I would say (I found my personal style) in the past few years."
"Since" very cavalari "is mainly set in the retail and fashion environment, we took advantage of its launch to ask the reality TV star, designer and entrepreneur about her shopping habits from her teens to today."
"It's a good reflection of my style, because everything is easy, refined and simple."
"I've designed all the clothes I like and want to wear," she told vogue on the phone in Nashville
"And James, of course."
"Cavallari has been sorting out her fashion resume since" mountain ". She planned a runway show with NFL as the theme at New York Fashion Week, and cooperated with Chinese laundries to design her own shoe series with the same name for e!"
“… Recently launched a jewelry and lifestyle line, opened a flagship store and supervised a team of TV ready employees at the company's headquarters
"This time, Cavallari entered a different life through the reality show fishbowl, not in Southern California, but in her new home in Nashville, Tennessee - very Cavallari, showing the nameless star and NFL QUARTERBACK husband Jay Cutler Cutler's family life with her three children and her professional responsibilities... "
In 2009, at specty's wedding, thunder unexpectedly walked into another film of mountains



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Embed Code Restart 'Bachelor in Paradise' Stars Derek Peth and Taylor Nolan Get Quizzed on Their Future Together"Originally we were like, ‘This is fun, but we're in different states,’” Peth told ET during a joint interview with Nolan last September.”
“Bachelor in Paradise alums Derek Peth and Taylor Nolan have decided to end their engagement, they announced on Tuesday.”
“Their breakup comes about a year after they started dating on Paradise, and 10 months after Peth proposed with a stunning Neil Lane sparkler on the reunion show last August.”
“"It is with much sadness that we have decided to end our engagement.”
“We put everything we could into our relationship and are heartbroken to go forward separately, but we know this is the best decision for the both of us," Peth and Nolan said in a joint statement to ET.”
“"We will still be present in each other's lives with support, admiration and respect for each other."”
“Before meeting Nolan on Paradise, Peth appeared on JoJo Fletcher's season of The Bachelorette.”
“Nolan, meanwhile, gained notoriety for her "emotional intelligence" argument with Corinne Olympios on Nick Viall's season of The Bachelor.”
“Peth and Nolan were pretty much inseparable when they hit the beach for season four of Bachelor in Paradise last summer, and two months later, Peth put a ring on it.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"When asked about their future together, Derek pace and Tyler Nolan, the stars of Bachelor in heaven, said in a joint interview with ET magazine last September," we thought, "it's fun, but we're in different states."
Paradise bachelor alumni Derek pace and Tyler Nolan have decided to end their engagement, they announced on Tuesday
"Their breakup took place a year after they started dating in heaven and 10 months after Perth proposed with an amazing Neil Lane flasher on the reunion show last August."
"We decided very sad to end our engagement."
"We are sad that we have given everything for our relationship and developed separately, but we know that this is the best decision for both of us," pace and Nolan said in a joint statement to et
"We will still support, admire and respect each other in our lives."
"Before meeting Nolan in heaven, Perth appeared in Joe Fletcher's singles season."
At the same time, Nolan's "EQ" fight with Colin Olympus in Nick Villar's "singles season" is notorious
"Last summer, when Perth and Nolan were playing on the beach in the fourth season of singles in heaven, they were inseparable. Two months later, Perth put on the ring."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Image via Derrick Salters/Joseph Marzullo/WENN.]”
“Audrina feels safe with Ryan and knows he will be around for awhile.”Considering she’s had a tumultuous falling out with her ex-husband, Corey Bohan… we’re happy she’s finding love again!”
“...projects that they are working on...”
“The fact that he s a musician is one of her favorite qualities The source added that the pair is doing really well and the 32 year old has even introduced her daughter Kirra Max to the On The Way Down singer They both encourage each other s careers and...”
“The insider explained:“Audrina has been very supportive of Ryan and his music and has always been a fan.”
“News reports Ryan’s musicianship is one of the former reality star’s favorite things about him!”
“The old flames (who were first linked in 2010) were seen having “a blast” at the show, and E!”
“Related: Are Colton Haynes & Jeff Leatham Splitting?!”
“As you know, the two have been spending more time together as of late and are said to be “getting pretty serious”!”
“Ryan Cabrera had his number one fan in the audience at his concert in El Lay last night — Audrina Patridge!”


"[image source: derrick Salters / Joseph marzullo / wenn.]"
"Audienne felt safe with Ryan, knowing that he would be around for a while." Considering that she fell out with her ex husband, Corey Bohan We're glad she found love again
“… The projects they are working on
"In fact, he is a musician, which is one of her favorite qualities. The source added that the couple did a very good job. The 32 year old even introduced her daughter, Cora max, as a singer on her way. They all encouraged each other's career and
"Audienne has always been very supportive of Ryan and his music and has always been a fan of him," the source explained
"The news reports that Ryan's musical talent is one of the favorite things of the former reality TV star!"
Old flame (first linked in 2010) was seen at the exhibition with "explosion", e! "
Related report: did Colton Haines and Jeff Latham break up? "
"As you know, the two have been spending more and more time together recently. It is said that they have" become quite serious "!"
"Ryan Cabrera had his number one fan, audienne partridge, at Elley's concert last night!"



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Music and drop sequences [ edit ]Tyler Bates, composer of the Guardians of the Galaxy films, wrote the incidental music for the attraction's queue.”
“Howard the Duck can also occasionally be heard, mocking the Collector's misfortune and bidding guests farewell.”
“Guests then board a gantry lift, where they help Rocket try to free the other Guardians.”
“However, Rocket has secretly escaped his case and asks the guests for help.”
“The Collector (Taneleer Tivan) is showing off his latest acquisitions, the Guardians of the Galaxy, in customized display cases.”
“Ride experience [ edit ]The attraction is based in the Collector's fortress-esque collection called the Tivan Collection, as seen in the film Guardians of the Galaxy.”
“[17] James Gunn directed all of the scenes involving the cast.”
“Due to Marvel's 1994 contract with Universal Parks & Resorts (pre-dating Disney's 2009 purchase of Marvel Entertainment), the Marvel brand is not allowed to be used as part of the ride's title or advertising.”
“[15][16] Vin Diesel did not reprise his role of Groot, he was replaced by voice actor Fred Tatasciore.”
“[11][12][13][14]Chris Pratt, Zoe Saldana, Dave Bautista, Benicio del Toro, and Bradley Cooper reprise their roles as Star-Lord, Gamora, Drax, The Collector, and the voice of Rocket, respectively.”


"Music and delivery sequence [editor] Taylor Bates, composer of galactic film guardian, created accompanying music for the scenic spot queue."
"Occasionally, you can hear the duck's cry, laugh at the collector's misfortune and say goodbye to the guests."
"Then the guests board the gantry elevator, where they help the rocket try to release the other guardians."
"However, the Rockets have secretly escaped his case and turned to the guests for help."
The collector, taneler tivan, is displaying his latest work, the guardian of the galaxy, in a custom display cabinet
"Ride experience [editor] the attraction is based on the collector's fortress collection, known as the tivan collection, as shown in the movie guardian of the galaxy."
"James Gunn directed all the scenes about actors."
"Since Marvel signed a contract with universal Parks & Resorts in 1994 (earlier than Disney's acquisition of Marvel Entertainment in 2009), it is not allowed to use the marvel brand as part of the name or advertisement of amusement facilities."
"[15] [16] van diesel didn't play the role of grott again. Instead, it was the voice actor Fred tatasior."
"[11] [12] [13] [14] Chris Platt, Zoe Saldana, Dave Bautista, benicio del Toro and Bradley Cooper play the roles of star master, gamola, Drax, collector and voice of rockets respectively."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also has the drama Tiger, alongside veteran actor Mickey Rourke, coming out in November, and she will also be reprising her PLL role alongside Sasha Pieterse, 21, for a spin-off series titled Pretty Little Liars: The Perefectionists.”
“No doubt it is an exciting time in Janel's life as she had two films released in the last few weeks that includes the teen romance To All the Boys I've Loved Before and the thriller Hell is Where the Home Is.”
“The 29-year-old star shared a romantic kissing snap from Hawaii on Saturday with the caption: 'Rehearsal dinner photo.”
“But today...I married him.”
“...loving my husband so much @c_long''Marrying my dream man in my home of Hawaii surrounded by family and friends was a dream, the actress revealed toUs Weekly in an exclusive statement.”
“Scroll down for video'Loving my husband so much': Pretty Little Liars alum Janel Parrish married her longtime boyfriend Chris Long in Hawaii on Saturday and shared this snap on InstagramThe bride reportedly wore a mermaid Inbal Dror gown with a sweetheart neckline, corset bodice and long, feathered train.”
“Turns out, the pair exchanged self-written vows during the ceremony.”
“Parrish’s sister served as her maid of honor while Long’s brother officiated.”
“Some of the cast and crew of Pretty Little Liars were in attendance including Brendan Robinson and Marlene King.”
“'We feel so lucky we found each other in this crazy world,' Janel added in Saturday's statement.”


She will also star in tiger with veteran actor Mickey Rourke, and in PLL with 21-year-old Sasha pieterse, a film called pretty little Liars:the Perefectionists ）The derivative of the drama
"There is no doubt that this is an exciting time in Janel's life, because she has released two films in the past few weeks, including the thriller" youth romance for all the boys I've loved before "and" hell is home. "
"The 29 year old star shared a snapshot of a romantic kiss in Hawaii on Saturday with the title: 'rehearsal dinner photo.'"
"But today I married him
“…… I love my husband very much, @ C Yan long, "the actress revealed in an exclusive statement in the weekly atlas that it's a dream to marry my dream lover in the hometown of Hawaii surrounded by family and friends
"Scroll down to watch the video 'love my husband so much': pretty little liar alumni Janel Parrish married her long-time boyfriend Chris long in Hawaii on Saturday and shared this picture on instagram. The bride is reported to be wearing a mermaid Inbal Dror dress with a sweetheart neckline, a corset and a feathered train."
"Originally, the two exchanged their vows at the ceremony."
"Parish's sister is her bridesmaid, and Lang's brother is the chief priest."
"A number of actors and members of the little liar crew were present, including Brandon Robinson and Marlene king."
"We feel very lucky to find each other in this crazy world," Janel said in a statement on Saturday



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I could go on forever, so I’ll stop now, but get ready for a lot more Sonny talk coming soon.”
“I can’t stop looking at him, or thinking about him when I am in another room.”
“No big deal, but I created another human being and then delivered him into the world at 12:30am Thursday morning.”
“Timmy and I named the little man Sonny and I’m in love.”
“Over the next few blog posts I’ll tell you all about the entire day, the following days at the hospital and bringing him home, but for now I just want to talk about how I’m feeling.”
“We ve all heard mothers give the same speech about how life changing the love for your baby is and it s not like I didn t believe it or anything but I guess I couldn t actually connect to...”
“...those exact feelings until the doctor placed Sonny onto my chest...”
“I love him and feel protective over him, but more than anything, I’m just like obsessed.”
“It’s a bit like getting a toy you really really wanted as a child.”
“I can’t wait to watch him change and grow and take on my traits and Timmy’s.”


"I can go on forever, so I'll stop now, but be ready for more Sonny talks."
"When I'm in another room, I can't help looking at him or thinking about him."
"It's no big deal, but I created another man and sent him to the world at 12:30 on Thursday morning."
"Timmy and I named this little man sonny. I'm in love."
"In the next few posts, I'll tell you about the whole day, the next few days in the hospital, and taking him home, but now I just want to talk about how I feel."
"We've all heard mothers make the same speech about how love for babies changes their lives. It's not that I don't believe it or that I don't believe anything, but I think I really can't connect to..."
“…… I always felt like this before the doctor put Sonny on my chest... "
"I love him, I feel protected from him, but most of all, I feel like I'm fascinated."
"It's a bit like getting a toy you really want as a child."
"I can't wait to see him change and grow and accept the qualities of Timmy and me."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’ve never been hooked up with anybody I’ve worked on a movie with.”The following year she spoke to Elle magazine about what she looked for in a relationship.”
“In 2014, she told Teen Vogue she had “not had a boyfriend in almost five years.”
“Image zoom Shailene Woodley and Ben Volavola sharing a kiss while in Paris, France for Paris Fashion WeekWhile Woodley has been linked to Divergent costar Theo James and musician Nahko Bear, having a boyfriend is not something the actress has ever been open about before.”
“Image zoom Woodley shared a photo of Volavola exhausted after the Valentino fashion show in Paris, France | Credit: Shailene Woodley InstagramThe duo reportedly met in Fiji where Woodley was filming Adrift.”
“Later that same day, the couple packed on the PDA by sharing a kiss on the sidelines during a team practice.”
“...also included a second photo of Volavola napping after the Valentino show writing we done Woodley was spotted getting cozy with Volavola in October outside of a cafe in New Zealand...”
“The actress shared multiple photos of the couple on social media including one photo of the two posing against a Valentino sign with the caption This date tho Image zoom Woodley and Volavola posing at the Valentino Spring Summer 2018 fashion show in Paris France Credit Shailene Woodley Instagram She...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Woodley and Volavola attended the Valentino Haute Couture Spring Summer 2018 show as part of Paris Fashion Week in France.”
“The Big Little Lies actress, 26, shared a kiss with boyfriend and rugby player Ben Volavola on Instagram stories Wednesday night.”


The next year, in an interview with Elle magazine, she talked about what she was looking for in a relationship
In 2014, she told teen vogue that she "hasn't had a boyfriend in nearly five years."
"At Paris fashion week, sholeen Woodley and Ben Walla Walla were kissing in Paris, France, while Woodley was associated with her partner Theo James and musician NACO bell. Having a boyfriend was something that the actress never made public."
Image zoom Woodley shares a photo of Walla Walla exhausted after the Valentino fashion show in Paris, France | photo source: shailene Woodley instagram it is reported that the two met in Fiji while Woodley was filming "wandering"
"Later on the same day, the couple were kissing on the sidelines during a team training session to pack on a PDA."
“… It also includes the second photo of Walla Walla dozing. After the Valentino show "let's do Woodley", it was found that Walla Walla was very comfortable with Walla Walla outside a New Zealand cafe in October... "
"The actress shared a number of photos of the couple on social media, one of which was a photo taken by the couple in front of the Valentino logo, with the title of" the image zoom Woodley and volavola at the Valentino fashion show in Paris, France, spring and summer 2018 credit shailene Woodley instagram she... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"As part of Paris Fashion Week in France, Woodley and wallavara attended the Valentino haute couture show in spring and summer 2018."
"The 26 year old lies actress kisses her boyfriend and rugby player Ben volavola on instagram stories on Wednesday night."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Grade it below, then drop a comment with your full review.”
“What’s your “Feedback” on Jackson’s BBMAs performance?”
“— that humanity is lacking at the moment.”
“While accepting the award, presented by Bruno Mars, Jackson gave a powerful speech about all the qualities — compassion, understanding, love, etc.”
“Watch footage of Jackson’s performance below:Jackson was also the recipient of this year’s ICON Award, a prestigious honor previously presented to the likes of Cher (2017), Celine Dion (2016), Jennifer Lopez (2014), Prince (2013), Stevie Wonder (2012) and Neil Diamond (2011).”
“It feels so good to be “Together Again.”Following a nine-year hiatus from televised performances, Jackson returned to the stage on Sunday at the 2018 Billboard Music Awards for a “Nasty” little medley of some of her biggest hits from her 36-year career.”
“Welcome back, Janet Jackson.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Miley Cyrus isn't about to stand for that, and she voiced her opinion on the matter via Instagram comments.”
“One of Miley's fan accounts posted this picture a day ago, of Selena and Miley at an event together.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“And Miley commented on the picture more than once writing Well what that d ck head said if it s true is f king false and total bull sh t In another comment she wrote She fine as f ck Here s a screenshot of the comments because obviously receipts...”
“...are important Instagram MileyOfficially Stefano has a long history of feuding with celebrities including Miley...”
“Last summer, Miley's brother Braison modeled in a Dolce & Gabbana show.”
“After the fact, Miley posted a picture of him on the runway saying how proud she was, but also criticizing the company's politics.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Miley Cyrus doesn't intend to support this. She expressed her views on the matter through instagram comments."
"A day ago, a fan account of Miley posted this picture. It's a picture of Selena and Miley participating in an activity together."
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Miley commented on this photo more than once. It's very well written. If it's true, it's f king false. It's nonsense. In another comment, she wrote that she was very good, because fck, this is a screenshot of the comment, because it's obvious that she received... "
“… It's important that instagram Millie official Stefano has a long history of discord with celebrities including Millie... "
"Last summer, Miley's brother Branson was modeling on a Dolce & Gabbana show."
"Afterwards, Miley posted a picture of him on the catwalk, saying how proud she was, but also criticizing the company's politics."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Despite the wholesome theme, the comedian squeezed in a scare while Garner was busy describing all of the free gifts the audience was getting.”
“You will be best friends with your kid and then someday you re going to realize you re actually angry with them and that s OK And you re going to be great because it s your experience and it...”
“The bubbly actress who s most important role in life is playing mom to three kids she shares with Ben Affleck opened up about her pregnancy experiences sang and rapped mom advice in a cute music video did farm animal...”
“...impressions gave away lots of free stuff and of course got scared in signature Ellen fashion...”
“Enjoy all of the highlights below.”
“Pregnancy Talk The actress spent the interview portion gushing about her kids and dishing on her own pregnancy experience including one inept doctor telling her a baby growing in her womb didn t exist before giving the audience full of...”
“...pregnant women some words of wisdom about what to expect while expecting...”
“"Here's the thing you guys.”
“You will get your bodies back," Garner promised.”
“"You will get your lives back.”


Despite the healthy theme, the comedian was taken aback when Ghana was busy describing all the free gifts the audience received
"You'll make best friends with your children, and then one day you'll realize that you're really angry with them. It doesn't matter. You'll be great because it's your experience, and it's..."
"The most important role of this lively actress in her life is to play the mother of three children. She shared her pregnancy experience with Ben Affleck. She sang and rap her mother's advice in a lovely music video" being a farm animal "...."
“… Impression gives a lot of free stuff, of course, in signature Ellen fashion fear... "
"Enjoy the rest."
"Pregnancy talk" in the interview, the actress talked a lot about her child and her own pregnancy experience, including an incompetent doctor telling her that the baby growing in her womb didn't exist, and then brought the audience full of
“… Pregnant women will also say some wise words when they are pregnant. "
"That's what you're going to do."
"You'll get your body back," garner promised
"You'll get your life back."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““‘I just blurted out, ‘We should bring her home.’”Lauren is due to bring another daughter home this August...”
““Lauren had this amazing glow about her and it just felt like she was already our daughter in a weird way,” the singer told People magazine after seeing a photo of Lauren holding Willa when she was just a newborn on the trip.”
“At the time, she was having trouble getting pregnant.”
““Thank you to everyone who prayed every single day for this sweet girl.”Thomas and Lauren, who is pregnant with their first biological child, decided to adopt after Lauren visited Uganda with charity 147 Million Orphans.”
“?,” the “T-Shirt” singer tweeted along with a family photo.”
“I can’t believe our daughter is finally home ?”
““Meet Willa Gray Akins!”
“Thomas Rhett and his wife, Lauren, announced on social media on Friday, May 12, that they’ve welcomed a daughter named Willa Gray Akins home from Uganda.”
“Thank you to everyone who prayed every single day for this sweet girl pic.twitter.com/ykKFjI83wh — Thomas Rhett (@ThomasRhett) May 12, 2017She’s here!”
“I can’t believe our daughter is finally home??”


"I blurted out," we should take her home. " Lauren will take another daughter home in August this year
"Lauren has an amazing shine and feels like she's already our daughter," the singer told people after seeing a picture of Lauren holding her newborn vera on a trip
"At the time, she had trouble getting pregnant."
"Thank everyone who prays for this lovely girl every day." Thomas and Lauren are pregnant with their first child, and after Lauren visited Uganda with 147 million orphans, they decided to adopt them
The T-shirt singer tweeted a picture of his family
"I can't believe our daughter is home at last?"
"Meet Willa gray Akins!"
"On Friday, May 12, Thomas Reid and his wife Lauren announced on social media that they would welcome a daughter named Vera gray Akins home from Uganda."
"Thank everyone who prays for this lovely girl every day pic.twitter.com/ykKFjI83wh -Thomas Rhett (@ Thomas Rhett) May 12, 2017, she's here! "
"I can't believe our daughter finally went home?"



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If it is necessary to abbreviate “costume designer” for space, please use “designer.””
“Things Kim Wilcox Excellence in Sci Fi Fantasy Television Black Mirror USS Callister Maja Meschede Game of Thrones Michele Clapton Once Upon a Time Eduardo Castro Dan Lester Sleepy Hollow Mairi Chisholm Star Trek Discovery Gersha Phillips Excellence in Short Film Design Assassin s Creed I Am Commercial Patrik Milani...”
“...form Costume Design...”
“Produced by JumpLine, this year’s platinum anniversary CDGA gala will take place on Tuesday, February 20, 2018 at the Beverly Hilton Hotel.”
“Honorees including the Career Achievement, Distinguished Collaborator, Distinguished Service, and Spotlight awards will be announced in the coming weeks.”
“The 20th CDGA will be sponsored by THE OUTNET.COM, Harper’s BAZAAR, Westfield, and Grand Marnier®.”
““I would like to congratulate all of the nominees of the 2018 Costume Designers Guild Awards.”
“As we commemorate the 20th year of the CDGA, we are so proud of the legacy Costume Designers have created for the Film and Television industry.”
“We look forward to celebrating the art of Costume Design and our honorees at our awards gala on February 20, 2018,” said Salvador Perez, President of the Costume Designers Guild Local #892.”
“Following is the list of final nominees.”


If the space needs to be abbreviated as "study designer", use "designer"
"East West King Wilcox excellent science fiction fantasy TV black mirror U.S. Navy caliste majamescud power game Michelle Clapton once Eduardo Castro Dan Leicester sleepy hollow Merrich Shaw Star Trek found gersa Phillips excellent short film design assassin creed I'm commercial Patrick Milani..."
“… "Formal fashion design..."
"This year's platinum anniversary cdga party produced by Jumpline will be held at the Beverly Hilton Hotel on Tuesday, February 20, 2018."
"Winners, including career achievements, outstanding collaborators, outstanding service and spotlight awards, will be announced in the coming weeks."
"The 20th cdga will be composed of Extranet, Harper market, Westfield and grand Marnier."
"I would like to congratulate all the nominees for the 2018 Fashion Designers Association Award."
"As we celebrate the 20th anniversary of cdga, we are proud of the legacy that fashion designers have created for the film and television industry."
"We are looking forward to celebrating the art of fashion design and our winners at the awards show on February 20, 2018," said El Perez, President of the local Fashion Designers Association
"Here is the final list of nominations."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Andy CohenAndy Cohen proves that men can certainly look great in pink.”
“Mila Kunis looked gorgeous in a cold-shoulder top, metallic skirt and black pumps.”
“Jordan Strauss / APThe model looked stunning in a slinky gold dress with long sleeves and a plunging neckline.”
“Hailey BaldwinThis slinky dress has a '70s vibe.”
“Lisa O'Connor / AFP - Getty ImagesThe singer made a bold entrance in a flowing, leopard-print gown.”
“Demi LovatoAnimal print never looked so good.”
“Frazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThe “Havana” singer, who won a Billboard Chart Achievement Award, looked striking in a black-and-white dress with dramatic fringe.”
“Camila CabelloThat dress was made for dancing!”
“Frazer Harrison / Getty ImagesThe singer, songwriter and “Voice” adviser opted for a pretty white dress with a tiered skirt and a Grecian goddess-inspired neckline.”
“Julia MichaelsIf we were to describe this dress in one word, we'd use angelic.”


"Andy Cohen has proved that men look great in pink."
"Mila Kunis looks beautiful in her cold shoulder top, metal skirt and black high heels."
"The model, Jordan Strauss / Upton, looks beautiful in a long sleeve, low neckline, gold tight dress."
"Haley Baldwin has a '70s look in this tight dress."
"Lisa O'Connor / Agence France Presse - Getty the singer boldly enters the stadium in her elegant leopard print robe."
"Demi Lovato's animal print has never looked so good."
Picture of Fraser Harrison / Getty the "Havana" singer, who won a billboard list achievement award, looks eye-catching in a black-and-white dress with eye-catching tassels
"Camilla cabelosa's dress is for dancing!"
The singer, songwriter and voice consultant chose a beautiful white dress with a layered skirt and Greek goddess neckline
"Julia Michael, if we use one word to describe this dress, we will use the name of an angel."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...on June 27”
““I’m obviously at the end of my journey of being a musician… because of my age, and I’ve been doing it for thirty-something years,” she said, suggesting that she may soon be ready to retire from music.”
“Gwen Stefani is admitting that her boyfriend, Blake Shelton, will play a big role in her upcoming Las Vegas residency.”
“Per Entertainment Tonight Canada the star revealed in a new interview that Blake has inspired a number of the songs she s planning to sing when she heads to Sin City in June as well as helping her to choose a number of aspects of the shows including when it...”
“...came to picking out the dancers...”
““Obviously, he’s my best friend, so I’m bouncing stuff off him all the time,” Stefani revealed this week of involving the country superstar and The Voice coach in her residency shows.”
““He’s one of those people in my life that’s super supportive and gets me motivated,” Gwen said of the country singer, who she’s been dating for more than two years.”
““There’s a whole bunch of songs about him in the show, so that’s fun.”Gwen then revealed that she would send Blake videos and updates of how show planning is going, even sending him videos of the dancers so he could see them.”
““Like anybody with their best friend, we share everything together,” the mom-of-three said.”
““I’ll tell him, ‘I picked my dancers!”


“… "June 27"
"Obviously, my music career has come to an end Because of my age, I've been doing it for more than 30 years, "she said, hinting that she might be retiring soon."
"Gwen Stephanie admits her boyfriend, black Sheldon, will play an important role in her upcoming internship in Las Vegas."
"Per entertainment town Canada, the star, revealed in a new interview that black inspired many of the songs she planned to sing when she went to sin city in June, and helped her choose some aspects of the show, including when it..."
“… To pick the dancers... "
"Obviously, he's my best friend, so I've been talking to him all the time," Stefani revealed this week, involving the country superstar and voice coach in her internship
"In my life, he's one of those super supportive and motivating people," Gwen said of the country singer, who she's been dating for more than two years
"There are a lot of songs about him on the show, so it's very interesting." Gwen later revealed that she would send black videos and the latest programming progress, and even send him videos of dancers for him to watch
"Just like anyone and their best friend, we share everything together," said the mother of three
"I'll tell him," I chose my dancer! "



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”
“Luke Pell has a new woman in his life — on-air host Amanda Mertz.”
“The pair were set up by mutual friends “about a year ago,” a source exclusively tells Us Weekly.”
““They went on a blind date to a hockey game in Nashville and then started dating this summer.”Pell, 33, who placed fourth on JoJo Fletcher’s Bachelorette season 12 in 2016, showed off his new love via Instagram on Wednesday, August 29.”
““Date night on a Wednesday in Tampa, FL,” he captioned a sweet snapshot of the couple attending an event put on by Pandora and Ashley Furniture Home Store.”
““Who knew.”Fans left supportive messages for the duo in the comments section.”
““Gorgeous couple!” one Pell devotee wrote.”
“Added another, “Beautiful couple!”
“So happy for you both!”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube!"
"There's a new woman in Luke Pell's life - the air hostess Amanda Mertz."
"About a year ago, the two were founded by mutual friends," an exclusive source told us weekly
"They had a blind date at a hockey game in Nashville and then started dating this summer." Pell, 33, ranked fourth in the 12th season of Joe Fletcher's Bachelor in 2016, showed off his new love through instagram on Wednesday, August 29
"Wednesday's date night in Tampa, Florida," he took a sweet snapshot of the couple at an event hosted by Pandora and Ashley Furniture home store
"Who knows." Fans left a message in the comments to support the pair
"Beautiful couple! "One pelean wrote."
Another added: "beautiful couple!"
"I'm so happy for both of you!"



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You deserve your own day to be celebrated because you are the best dad anyone could ever have.”
“I love you and miss you so, Daddy.”
“You would stay up all night to make sure my fever went down.”
“You didn’t care about getting sick.”
“You would cuddle with me, hug me, kiss me.”
“Whenever I was sick you would take care of me.”
“No matter how tired you were, how many time zones you traveled, you were there for us.”
“Every time you came home from tour you spent all your hours with us.”
“Probably because everything you said was so smart.”
“Worry is a waste of time, I’m ok.’I always took what you said to heart.”


"You deserve to celebrate your day because you are the best father in the world."
"I love you and miss you, Dad."
"You have to stay up late to make sure I get rid of the fever."
"You don't care about being sick."
"You'll hug me, hug me, kiss me."
"Whenever I get sick, you take care of me."
"No matter how tired you are and how many time zones you've traveled, you're waiting for us there."
"Every time you come home from your trip, you're with us."
"Maybe it's because everything you say is smart."
"Worrying is a waste of time. I'm fine." I always take what you say to heart



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I was doing a lot of stuff,” he said, “but meth was the main one that brought me down.”Image zoom Credit: George Pimentel/WireImageHopper Penn and Sean PennHopper eventually agreed to get help, but only after getting a firm ultimatum from his dad.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Sean Penn Smoking & on Ambien: Fans React to Actor’s Memorable Late-Night AppearanceHopper has been open about his struggle with addiction in the past, saying his dad’s tough love helped him get clean.”
“The former couple also share 26-year-old daughter Dylan Penn.”
“Hopper is the youngest child of Sean and Robin.”
“Both Hopper and von Wittkamp are in custody at the Hamilton County Jail awaiting bail.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash News OnlineHopper Penn and Robin WrightHopper was arrested and booked for possession of mushrooms and less than one ounce of marijuana while von Wittkamp was booked for possession of amphetamines and mushrooms, reports TMZ.”
“Along with Hopper, actress Uma von Wittkamp was also in the car at the time.”
“News.”
“Troopers found 14g of marijuana, 4 amphetamine pills, and 3g of psilocybin mushrooms, reports E!”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"I did a lot of things," he said, "but meth was the main reason for my disappointment." Image scaling credit: George Pimentel / wire imagehopper Penn and Sean penhopper finally agreed to ask for help, but only after receiving an ultimatum from his father. "
"Related video: Sean pan smoking and sleeping: fans' reaction to the actor's unforgettable late night appearance. Hooper made public his past struggle with drug addiction, saying his father's strong love helped him get rid of it."
"The first two shared their 26 year old daughter, Dylan pan."
"Hopper is the youngest of Sean and Robin."
"Both hopper and von wittcamp are being held in Hamilton County prison awaiting bail."
Splash news online hopper Penn and Robin wrighthopper were arrested and registered for possession of mushrooms and less than an ounce of marijuana, while von wittkamp was registered for possession of amphetamines and mushrooms, TMZ reported
"Actresses UMA von wittcamp and hopper were in the car at the time."
"News."
"Police found 14 grams of marijuana, four amphetamine tablets, and three grams of poisonous mushrooms, the report said, e!"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I loved that Tan wanted Skyler to look good in a suit because, he’s right, every man’s body looks more masculine with some good tailoring.”
“...he was so proud of...”
“I never would have thought that getting a suit tailored would lead to an emotional breakdown for Skyler because he felt uncomfortable with someone all up in his pants business.”
“Many people know the struggle of being transgender in our society, but what really struck me about this episode was how even the silly everyday things that so many of us take for granted can be triggering for a trans person.”
“As hard as being a ginge is, being trans is even harder.”
“It’s such a shame that Skyler not only had to spend $8,000 of his own money to have the surgery, but will now face thousands of dollars of medical bills because of the complications just from being a redhead.”
“I certainly didn’t.”
“Who knew this was a real thing?”
“The other shocking thing is that redheads are bad with anesthesia.”
“It was really and truly moving way to begin the episode.”


"I like Tan very much. I want Skyler to look good in a suit, because he is right. Every man's body looks more masculine in some good clothes."
“… He's very proud... "
"It never occurred to me that a suit tailored for Skyler would lead to his emotional breakdown because he was uncomfortable with someone who was busy with the pants business all day."
"A lot of people know about the struggle of transgender people in our society, but what really moved me about this incident is that even stupid everyday things that many of us take for granted can trigger a transgender person."
"It's hard to be a ginger, but it's harder to be a transgender."
"It's a pity that Skyler not only has to spend 8000 dollars on his own surgery, but also has to face thousands of dollars in medical expenses, because it's just a complication of redheads."
"Of course not."
"Who knows it's true?"
"Another shocking thing is that redheads don't have good anesthesia."
"It's a very moving start."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was the sort of role I have always kept an eye out for creatively.”
“I would have played Rose at any time in my career.”
“You aren’t an exception to every rule.’ And whenever somebody says that to Marnie, it’s very tough for her to hear, but it’s important.”
“She’s like ‘I’m not your average pawn shopper, this is an anomalous situation for me.’ And he tells her, ‘Hey, nobody comes in here when everything’s great.”
“In this case, she thinks she’s wearing something she thought this man in a pawn shop had never seen before.”
“But whenever she faces these cold truths, it comes from unexpected sources.”
“It’s hard for her to take constructive criticism from Hannah, Jessa and Shosh because they’re all peers, so the idea of taking a big lesson from them always felt silly for Marnie.”
“I love that scene for a million reasons, but especially because Marnie’s ability to view herself has always been hindered by her own point of view on the person she’s talking to.”
“Marnie seems to have moments of self-reflection and then backtrack, do you think the scene in the pawn shop this season had a lasting effect in changing how she sees herself?”
“But I guess it made it more emotionally manageable because the fact that everyone wasn’t done at the same moment meant that everything was more slow and gradual and less of a shock when it was finally over.”


"It's the kind of creative character I've been focusing on."
"At any time in my career, I will play rose."
"You're not the exception to all the rules." Whenever someone says this to Mary, she's hard to hear, but it's important
"She said," I'm not a typical pawnshop customer. It's an anomaly for me. " He told her, "Hey, when everything is OK, no one comes here."
"In this case, she thinks she's wearing something that she thinks this person has never seen in a pawnshop."
"But every time she faces these grim facts, there are unexpected sources."
"It's hard for her to accept constructive criticism from Hannah, Jesse and shosh because they are all peers, so the idea of learning from them always makes Marnie feel silly."
"I like that scene for many reasons, but especially because Marnie's ability to see herself is always hindered by her own view of the person she's talking to."
"Mani seems to have a moment of self reflection, and then back, do you think this season's pawnshop scene has a lasting impact on changing her view of herself?"
"But I think it's going to make it easier to control emotions because everyone doesn't do it at the same time, which means it's going to be slower, more gradual and less shocking at the end."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are thrilled to have Lionel Richie and Luke Bryan join Katy Perry and, ultimately, millions of viewers as we begin this new era on ABC.””
“...s talent roster after signing Perry in May to a deal that gives her 25 million for one season...”
“The move to secure Richie rounds out the revived singing competition’s on-camera talent roster for its upcoming first season on ABC, with Richie joining fellow judges Luke Bryan and Katy Perry as well host Ryan Seacrest.”
“It also puts “Idol” back on schedule.”
“With shooting on live auditions slated to begin Tuesday, ABC and producer FremantleMedia faced the possibility of having to delay the start of production if the judges table had not been set.”
“ABC also on Friday confirmed that Bryan is joining the show.”
“Variety broke news of his involvement last weekend.”
“A legendary R&B musician, Richie was said by sources to be a favorite choice of Perry, and had for months been in engaged in on-again, off-again talks.”
“But the “Hello” singer had backed away from discussions after fielding a lowball offer from ABC.”
““Luke and Lionel are the perfect additions to round out our panel of judges for ‘American Idol’ on ABC,” said Channing Dungey, president, ABC Entertainment.”


"We are very happy that Lionel rich and Luke Bryan will join Katie Perry and eventually become millions of viewers of ABC in this new era."
“… After signing Perry's deal in May, give her a season of 25 million
"To ensure his safety, Ritchie, together with judges Luke Bryan and Katy Perry and host Ryan Seacrest, has revived the photo talent list of the singing competition in ABC's upcoming first season."
"It also puts idol back on track."
"ABC and filmmaker Fremantle media may have to postpone filming if the number of judges is not determined because the live audition is due to start on Tuesday."
"ABC also confirmed Friday that Brian will join the show."
"The variety show revealed that he was involved in the case last weekend."
"Rich is a legendary R & B musician, it is said that he is Perry's favorite candidate, and he has been talking again and again for several months."
But the "hello" singer dropped out of the discussion after accepting a low-key offer from ABC
"Luke and Lionel are the perfect complement to perfecting our jury of 'American Idol' on ABC," said Channing dunkey, President of ABC entertainment



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“King breakup...”
“I found out she was waiting at another Burger King on the same road but she dumped me because I didn t got to the right Burger King yeah Who will volunteer as tribute to console him after that Burger...”
““I waited over two and a half hours and went home, and she never turned up,” Heughan told us at The Spy Who Dumped Me premiere.”
“It involves Burger King and a long wait—and he was a vegetarian at the time!”
“News’ Zuri Hall all about his tragic dumping.”
“The Outlander star, who can next be seen on the big screen in The Spy Who Dumped Me, which is about exactly what the title indicates, told E!”
“Yes, even Sam Heughan has a bad date story.”


"The king broke up..."
"I found her waiting at another Burger King on the same road, but she dumped me because I couldn't find the right Burger King. Yes, he will go to comfort the Burger King voluntarily after he has finished eating... "
"I waited two and a half hours and went home, but she didn't come," Hogan told us at the premiere of the spy who dumped me
"That includes Burger King and the long wait, he was a vegetarian at the time!"
"The news in Suri hall is all about his tragic fall."
"The next outsider star in" the spy who dumped me "can be seen on the big screen. It's exactly the title of the film. Tell e!"
"Yes, even Sam Hohan has a bad dating story."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We both had pain in dealing with our individual demons and the new paths we were forging, but I truly felt we were trying to lift each other up."”
“We came into each other's lives as we were both starting our careers as artists, and we tried to help each other.”
“"What she and I shared was a close friendship for a period of time.”
“"I am horrified and saddened by the statements and story told tonight by Timothy Heller, Martinez wrote.”
“Early Tuesday morning (Dec. 5) Martinez wrote back, categorically denying Heller's claim.”
“...described as a close friend later revealing it to be Martinez...”
“The shocking addition to the flood of stories regarding sexual impropriety in Hollywood Washington and beyond began on Monday Dec 4 when Heller posted a lengthy tweet in which she described her alleged assault at the hands of someone she...”
“Melanie Martinez, who appeared as a finalist on The Voice in 2012, has adamantly denied an accusation of sexual assault and rape by friend and fellow aspiring musician Timothy Heller.”


"Both of us are in pain in the face of our respective demons and the new path we are opening up, but I really feel that we are trying to improve each other."
"We all started each other's lives when artists started their careers, and we tried to help each other."
"What I shared with her was a period of close friendship."
"I am shocked and saddened by Timothy Heller's statement and story tonight," Martinez wrote
"In the early morning of Tuesday (December 5), Martinez wrote back, categorically denying Heller's claim."
“… He was described as a close friend and later revealed that it was Martinez... "
"It's shocking that sexual misconduct in Hollywood, Washington and other areas has been rampant, starting on December 4 (Monday), when Heller posted a long tweet describing her alleged assault, she said..."
"Melanie Martinez, who appeared as a finalist on voice in 2012, firmly denied sexual assault and rape charges against her by her friend and aspiring musician Timothy Heller."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple welcomed their daughter Wyatt in October 2014, got married in July 2015 and welcomed son Dimitri in November 2016.”
“It has been all uphill from there.”
“Kunis, 34, opened up on her relationship with her “That '70s Show” co-star Kutcher on Marc Maron’s “WTF” podcast Monday, starting with her familiarity with Kutcher’s first marriage to actress Demi Moore.”
““They had, like, a normal, real relationship,” the “Spy Who Dumped Me” star she told Maron.”
““They had three kids they were raising.”
“It was, like, a normal life.”In “That '70s Show,” their characters shared an on-and-off romantic relationship.”
“Nothing came of it in reality as Kutcher wed actress Demi Moore near the show’s final season.”
“Kutcher and Moore split in 2011 and Kunis’ romantic interest began soon after.”
““I was looking around, and there was a really beautiful man from the back,” she said of the time she saw him at a 2012 awards show.”
“I was literally like Oh he s kinda hot And then he turned around and I was like Oh my God it s Kutch I thought it was the weirdest thing that I was checking this guy out and it was someone that I had known forever Characteristically it all...”


"The couple had their daughter Wyatt in October 2014, got married in July 2015 and their son Dimitri in November 2016."
"It's been hard since then."
On mark Malone's "world television Federation" podcast on Monday, Kunis, 34, revealed her relationship with Kutcher, CO star of the '70s show, starting with her familiarity with Kutcher's first marriage to actress Demi Moore
"They have, like, a normal, real relationship," the "dumped my spy" star told Malone
"They have three children."
"It's like a normal life." In "that's the show of the 1970s," their characters have a broken romantic relationship
"Nothing happened when Kutcher married actress Demi Moore in the last season of the show."
"Kutcher and Moore broke up in 2011, and the romance of Kunis soon began."
Speaking of meeting him at the 2012 awards ceremony, she said, "I look around and there's a very beautiful man behind me."
"I really like it. Oh, he's a little hot, and then he turns around, and I'm like, oh my God, this is cage, I think this is the strangest thing, I'm checking this guy, this is a person I'll always know, the characteristics of all this..."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since then, many other country stars, including Dierks Bentley, Vince Gill, Maren Morris, among others, have taken to the ice for surprise performances.”
“The Oklahoma native performed the Star-Spangled Banner last year during the Predators first run in the Stanely Cup playoffs.”
“After Sunday night’s game, the teams will move to Winnipeg for the next few games.”
“On Friday (4/27), the Preds faced an unfortunate loss against the Winnipeg Jets in game one of the second round of playoffs.”
“And seeing Mike and hearing Mike talking about those guys and how much talent was on the ice and how much they had in them, it wasn’t surprising to me at all that they made it to the finals last year,” Underwood said of the team spirit recently.”
“We seem to be the underdogs in every single situation.”
“I did, but [laughs] nobody else.”
“I mean, nobody expected them to make it as far as they did.”
““I think going to the Stanley Cup Finals last year was such a confidence booster.”
“She is often seen celebrating the team’s triumphs from a box within Bridgestone Arena.”


"Since then, many other country stars, including dilx Bentley, Vince Gill, and Marlene Morris, have performed surprise on the ice."
"The Oklahoma native performed the Star Spangled Banner in the first round of the Stanley Cup playoff predators last year
After Sunday night's game, the two teams will go to Winnipeg for the next few games
"On Friday (April 27), in the first game of the second round of the playoffs, the preds lost to the Winnipeg jets."
"I'm not surprised to see and hear Mike talk about these people, how talented they are, how talented they are," Underwood said of team spirit recently. "They made it to the finals last year."
"We seem to be at a disadvantage in every case."
"Yes, but no one else."
"I mean, no one expects them to go that far."
"I think last year's participation in the final of the Stanley Cup was a confidence boost."
"She is often seen celebrating the team's victory in a box in the Bridgestone arena."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thanks again #Brooklyn99!””
“He added, “Also: since Friday night, I’m in the weirdest, best group chat with @HamillHimself @RealGDT @sethmeyers and @SeanAstin.”
“I’m just a fan who deserves better.”Miranda tweeted out a photo of himself with the “Brooklyn Nine-Nine” cast on Monday, so it doesn’t seem to far-fetched to get him in for an episode.”
“ I’m SO not ready to say #ByeBye99.”Astin also tweeted, “Have nothing 2 do with the show.”
“Hamill added, “NOOOOOOOOO!!!!!!!!!”
“THIS IS ONE OF THE THINGS #RenewB99,” Miranda tweeted on Thursday.”
““I ONLY WATCH LIKE 4 THINGS.”
“...comedy after five seasons...”
“We re thinking all of them probably are owed guest spots He added smiling into the camera So I would expect all of them to be on the show Fox decided last week to pull the plug on the cop...”
““A lot of people went to bat for us like Lin-Manuel Miranda, Mark Hamill, Sean Astin.”


"Thank you again, Brooklyn 99!"
He added: "in addition, from Friday night, I've been with you@ hamillhighels@RealGDT@sethmeyers I had the strangest and best group chat with @ seanastin. "
Miranda tweeted a picture of herself with the Brooklyn 99 crew on Monday, so it doesn't seem far fetched for him to plug in an episode
"I'm not ready to say goodbye." Aston also tweeted, "it's not about the show."
Hamir added, "no, no!!!"
"It's something worth renewing," Miranda tweeted on Thursday
"I only look at four things."
“… Comedy after five seasons... "
"We're thinking that they might all be guest actors," he said to the camera with a smile, so I think they'll all be on Fox's show last week when he decided to cancel the police job... "
"A lot of people go to bat for us, like linmanuel Miranda, Mark Hamill, Sean Astin."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...whore...”
“TMZ broke the story back in July Kendall said she needed protection from Thomas because he was flooding her mailbox with love letters that later turned hostile he went from professing his love for her to calling her an internet...”
“Thomas also can't own any guns during that time.”
“He must stay at least 100 yards away and he's forbidden from trying to contact her in any way, shape or form for 3 years.”
“That document was enough for the judge to grant her a permanent restraining order against Thomas Hummel.”
“Kendall wasn't in court but her lawyer, Shawn Holley, was Wednesday morning in downtown L.A. and presented a declaration from Kendall's head of security.”
“EXCLUSIVEKendall Jenner might finally get some peace of mind -- a judge has ordered the obsessed man writing her creepy love letters to stop and stay the hell away.”


“… Prostitutes... "
"TMZ broke the news as early as July. Kendall said that she needed Thomas's protection because he filled her mailbox with love letters. Later, the love letters became hostile. He changed from expressing his love for her to calling her the Internet..."
"Thomas couldn't have any guns at that time."
"He must be at least 100 yards away from her, and he is forbidden to contact her in any way, shape or form for three years."
"This document is enough for the judge to approve her permanent restraining order against Thomas Hamel."
"Kendall didn't appear in court, but her lawyer Sean Holly showed Kendall's safety director's statement in downtown Los Angeles on Wednesday morning."
"The exclusive Kendall Jenner may finally get some peace - a judge orders the obsessed man to stop writing her creepy love letters and get out of the way."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Happy birthday, Boomer!”
“Looks like a fun day for the kiddo that Phelps recently called "the best thing that ever [happened] to me."”
“RELATED: Michael Phelps shared the sweetest pic to celebrate son Boomer's birthdayWay to commit to that theme, Phelps fam.”
“Besides the cake, which featured ocean-like frosting swirls and a rope accent, there were blue decorations and various sea creatures that turned out to wish Boomer a happy birthday.”
“(The photo came post-shark attack.)”
“On Boomer's account, we also got a glamour shot of the inside of the cake, which appears to have almost as many layers as Daddy has gold medals.”
“As displayed on the cake, the party theme was "Boomer's shark attack," which seems about right for the child of the most decorated swimmer of all time.”
“Or sharks, apparently.”
“The man isn't afraid of a well-deployed triple exclamation point.”
“"What an amazing birthday cake!!!"”


"Happy birthday, Boomer!"
"It looks like an interesting day for the kid Phelps recently called" the best thing that happened to me. "
Related reports: Michael Phelps shared the sweetest photos to celebrate his son's birth in a way dedicated to the theme of the Phelps family
"In addition to the sea like frosty swirls and rope accents on the cake, there are also blue decorations and all kinds of marine creatures, all of which are to wish Boomer a happy birthday."
"(this picture was taken after the shark attack.)
"According to Boomer, we also took charming pictures of the inside of the cake. It looks like the cake has almost as many layers as Dad's gold medal."
As shown on the cake, the theme of the party is "shark attacks by baby boomers", which seems appropriate for the children of the most decorative swimmer of all time
"Or sharks, obviously."
"This man is not afraid of a well deployed triple exclamation mark."
"What a wonderful birthday cake!"



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I’m just in a place in my life where I was looking for a platform to express myself.””
““I am interested in hosting, and specifically on this show, because I feel as though I can express myself in a way people haven’t seen me before, and be able to engage in great discussions [and] have some fun,” Eve told Variety.”
““It is a new career move for me,” Eve tells Variety.”
“However, in an effort to find a replacement for Tyler, the series saw stars like Shemar Moore, Chris O’Donnell, Eric Christian Olsen and Wilmer Valderrama fill in the host chair temporarily.”
“Unlike its counterpart, “The View” which sees hosts change regularly, the panel has remained relatively similar for years with hosts Julie Chen, Sara Gilbert, Sharon Osbourne and Sheryl Underwood.”
““These women made me feel brave, they made me feel bold and energized and ready to pursue my dreams.”“The Talk” has had a difficult year since Tyler left.”
“...in them she told People ahead of her last show in August...”
“She ll continue to appear as a series regular on CBS Criminal Minds as well as hosting The CW s revival of Whose Line Is It Anyway She also does a voice on the FX comedy Archer All of them told me that they believed in me and I believe...”
“...acting and directing...”
“Eve is an accomplished and dynamic performer musician wife and stepmother who fits in seamlessly while also adding a new layer to the show as we continue to evolve season to season In June Aisha Tyler announced that she d be leaving the show after six years to focus on...”


"I'm just a place in my life. I'm looking for a platform to express myself."
"I'm very interested in hosting the show, especially on this show, because I think I can express myself in a way that people have never seen before, and be able to participate in great discussions (and) have some fun," Eve told variety
"It's a new career change for me," Eve told variety
"However, to find a replacement for Taylor, the series saw stars such as Sherma Moore, Chris O'Donnell, Eric Christian Olsen and Wilmer waldrama as temporary hosts."
"Different from the point of view, the point of view believes that the hosts are constantly changing. Over the years, the group has maintained a relatively similar relationship with hosts Julie Chen, Sarah Gilbert, Sharon Osborne and Cheryl Underwood."
"These women make me feel brave, they make me feel brave, energetic and ready to pursue my dream." Talk has been a tough year since Taylor left
“… Before the last show in August, she told people
"She will continue to appear regularly on CBS as a series of criminal ideas, as well as who is hosting CW's revival route. Anyway, she is also in the voice of foreign exchange comedy Archer, and they all tell me that they believe me, I believe..."
“… Acting and directing... "
"Eve is the wife and stepmother of an accomplished and energetic performer and musician. She is perfectly integrated into the play and adds a new layer of color to it, because we are developing every season in June. Aisha Taylor announced that she will leave the play in six years and focus on..."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Celebrities, who have appeared at summer events like Cannes Film Festival in France and Essence Festival in New Orleans, Louisiana, make staying cool and looking beautiful look easy.”
“Good news: You don't have to sacrifice beauty to avoid sweating profusely.”
“While we can all agree that quickly throwing your hair up using the hair tie you keep on your wrist doesn't usually result a stunning look, having the hair out of your face promises to make you feel better in the sweltering heat.”
“Hence, messy buns become everyone's go-to.”
“When the weather gets hot, staying cool takes precedent over looking cute.”
“ANNE-CHRISTINE POUJOULAT/AFP/Getty Images"It's getting hot in here"...so put up all your hair!”


Celebrities who appeared in summer activities such as the Cannes Film Festival in France and the New Orleans essence festival in Louisiana made it easy to keep cool and beautiful.
"The good news: you don't have to sacrifice beauty to avoid sweating."
"While we all agree that brushing your hair up quickly with a band on your wrist usually doesn't produce amazing results, taking it out of your face is sure to make you feel better in the heat."
"Therefore, the messy steamed bread has become everyone's first choice."
"When it's hot, it's more important to keep cool than to look cute."
"Annie Christina puyolat / AFP / Getty pictures" it's getting hotter here So put your hair up! "



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also click here to find out when Kingsman: The Golden Circle is playing near you and pre-order your tickets for your local Regal Cinema!”
“2 lucky winners will get the chance to win some epic Kingsman gear by clicking here or the image above!”
“Snooki, JWoww, Pauly D, Vinny Guadagnino and Sammi “Sweetheart” Giancola got together on Saturday night in Atlantic City for a surprise celebration for Cortese and her fiancé Christopher Buckner.”
“Cortese shared the emotional moment her friends surprised her on Instagram.”
“The clip shows Cortese walking into the restaurant and immediately bursting into tears when she sees the group.”
“"I love all these people so much what an amazing surprise we miss you mike @mikethesituation," Cortese captioned the video.”
“She also shared a series of photos on Instagram from the night, writing, "My roomies future hubby and best friend surprised me tonight!”
“@martoranosac .. celebrating our engagement and having a roomie reunion tonight while Pauly DJS at @poolafterdark @harrahsresort we miss you @mikethesituation love you all so much!”
“#justacoupleofbucks."”
“My roomies future hubby and best friend surprised me tonight!”


"At the same time, click here to find out when the golden circle will be staged near you, and book tickets for the local rich cinema for you!"
"2 lucky winners will have a chance to win some epic King gear click here or above the picture!"
Snooky, jwoww, Paulie D, vinegardanino and Sammy "sweetheart" giankola held a surprise celebration for Curtis and her fiance Christopher Buckner in Atlantic City on Saturday night
"Cortese shared the moment when her friends surprised her on instagram."
"This video shows that Curtis walked into the restaurant, saw the group of people, she immediately burst into tears."
"I love these people so much, and we think you're a surprise, Mike @ Mickey," Curtis wrote in the video
She also shared a series of photos of the night on instagram, which read: "my roommate's future husband and best friend surprised me tonight!"
“@martoranosac。。 To celebrate our engagement, there's a roommate party tonight, and Paulie DJ is here@ poolafterdark@harrahsresort We miss you @ Mike, we love you so much
"It's just a couple of dogs."
"My roommate, future husband and best friend surprised me tonight!"



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drop a comment below.”
““Brad’s free of Angelina, and Jimmy thinks he can make this happen.”
“New rumors are claiming that the exes might appear together in “Jimmy Kimmel Live!” for an interview.”
“Host Jimmy Kimmel, who is Pitt and Aniston’s mutual friend, reportedly wanted to make history by doing a joint interview with the exes, according to Radar Online.”
“One insider claimed that chances are “pretty good” that it is happening.”
“Kimmel, 49, “is super close to Jen, but he’s also really good friends with Pitt disciples Peter Dante and David Fincher,” the source said.”
“READ: Jennifer Aniston and Reese Witherspoon reuniting in a new TV showThe insider added that Kimmel has initiated a move to make this happen.”
““Jimmy sent a message to Brad that he’s a welcome presence at the show, even just to hang out in the bar area backstage and schmooze,” the source said.”
““Brad is a priority for Jimmy.”
“He wants his show to be Brad’s first stop from now on.”The talk show host reportedly believes that it’s time for the exes to appear in public together, especially now that Pitt is divorcing Angelina Jolie, whom many believe was the reason his and Aniston’s divorce.”


"Comment below."
"Brad got rid of Angelina and Jimmy thought he could do it."
There's a new rumor that ex girlfriends may appear together on the Jimmy Kimmel live show! "For the interview."
According to radar online, host Jimmy Kimmel, a mutual friend of Pitt and Aniston, is said to want to make history through joint interviews with his two predecessors
"An insider claimed that the possibility of this happening was" quite high. "
"Kimmel, 49, is very close to Jen, but he is also really good friends with Peter's disciples Peter Dante and David Finch," the source said
"Read: Jennifer Aniston and Reese Witherspoon meet again on a new TV show. Insiders add that Kimmel has launched an operation to achieve this."
"Jimmy sent Brad a message saying he was very popular at the show, even if it was just hanging out and chatting in the backstage bar area," the source said
"Brad is Jimmy's number one priority."
"He wants his show to be Brad's first stop from now on." According to reports, talk show hosts think it's time for two ex girlfriends to appear in public together, especially now that Pete is divorcing Angelina Jolie, which many people think is the reason for his divorce from Aniston



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“...and Harry attended a wheelchair tennis match in Toronto as part of the Invictus Games...”
“Having announced that they're expecting their first child together, due in the Spring of 2019, the newlyweds have been greeted by royal fans in Australia this week.”
“And the warm welcome is sure to continue as they travel to New Zealand, Fiji, and the Kingdom of Tonga in the coming days.”
“As they're now expecting a baby, it's exciting to see the Duke and Duchess of Sussex attending so many events together, and displaying such an impressive royal tour wardrobe along the way.”
“But what makes Meghan and Harry's appearance at the Invictus Games 2018 so significant is the fact that they first made their public debut as a couple at last year's event.”
“And it's hard to believe just how much has happened in the last year.”
“On September 23, 2017, Meghan was spotted in the crowd at the Invictus Games in Toronto, the city in which she lived while filming Suits.”
“She was there to support Prince Harry who is heavily involved in the sporting event which aims to support veterans and service people who have sustained injuries and disabilities while serving their countries AFP Contributor Getty Images The separation didn t last long though as on September 25 2017 Meghan...”
“Not only did they sit next to one another, but they also held hands, and looked very much in love throughout the event:Danny Lawson - PA Images Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
“…… Harry took part in a wheelchair tennis match in Toronto, which is part of the inviolable games... "
"After announcing that they will have their first child in the spring of 2019, the newlyweds were welcomed by Royal fans in Australia this week."
"In the coming days, they will go to New Zealand, Fiji and the kingdom of Tonga and be warmly welcomed."
"As they are now pregnant, it's exciting to see the Duke and Duchess of Sussex go to so many events together and display such impressive royal tour costumes along the way."
"But it's so important for Megan and Harry to make their debut at the invictal games in 2018 that their first public appearance was at last year's event, as a couple."
"It's hard to believe how much happened last year."
"On September 23, 2017, Megan was found in the crowd at the anti war games in Toronto when she was filming suits in Toronto."
"She's here to support Prince Harry, who's actively involved in this sporting event to support veterans and serve those who are injured and disabled while serving the country. AFP writer Getty Images reported that the separation did not last long, but on September 25, 2017, Megan... "
"They're not only sitting together, they're holding hands, and the whole world is full of love events: Denny Lawson PA images Getty Images, which was imported from {embed name}. “



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Barbara, with whom Jenelle has long had a tense relationship, maintains primary custody of Jace.)”
“...negotiations and were able to come to an agreement before the trial started on May 24 Kaemmer said...”
“Last week, the Teen Mom 2 star reached a happy resolution in a long-fought custody battle with her mother, Barbara Evans.”
“Jenelle’s attorney, Heather D. Kaemmer, told PEOPLE that the reality star and her mother had settled on a custody schedule that allows them to share time with 7-year-old Jace.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“And this past weekend, the mother and son had an “amazing” reunion when they were reunited after five weeks spent apart.”
“Image zoom Credit: Source: Jenelle Evans/Instagram“It felt amazing to finally be reunited,” Jenelle told E!”
“News about spending time with her oldest child.”
““He was so happy he didn’t even know what to do first when he got home.”
“I was nervous a little bit because I didn t want Jace thinking it was me that didn t want to visit with him but when he arrived everything was back to the way it used to be Although the mother of three she is mom to Jace son Kaiser...”


"Barbara's relationship with jennell has been tense for a long time, and she maintains the main custody of Jess."
“…… Before the trial began on May 24, the two sides negotiated and reached an agreement.... "
"Last week, the young mom 2 star made a happy decision in a long-term custody fight with her mother, Barbara Evans."
Heather D. Kammer, jennell's lawyer, told people that the reality TV star and her mother had set a guardianship schedule to allow them to share time with 7-year-old Jess
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
This past weekend, the mother and son met again five weeks after their separation. It was an "amazing" reunion
Image zooming: image source: Jenelle Evans / instagram "it's great to finally meet again," Jenelle told e! "
"The news of being with her oldest child."
"He was so happy that he didn't know what to do when he got home."
"I'm a little nervous because I don't want Jess to think that I don't want to visit him, but when he arrives, everything goes back to the way it used to be, even though the mother of three is Jess's son Caesar's mother..."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We need to properly process how it can be the most beneficial.””
“We want to make a gesture,” Craig said.”
“Five days after two bombshell reports exposed Weinstein for decades of alleged sexual misconduct ranging from harassment to rape, his wife, Georgina Chapman, announced she was leaving him.”
“However, Chapman doesn’t see herself as a victim and has reportedly been “incredibly strong” over the past few months, according to her close friend.”
“Since announcing their separation and expressing sympathy for the women who suffered due to her husband’s “unforgivable actions,” Chapman has remained mostly out of the public eye.”
“The fashion designer and Marchesa co-founder even canceled her runway show at New York Fashion Week.”
“However, according to Chapman’s best friend and business partner, Keren Craig, Weinstein’s ex-wife has been focusing intensely on her fashion to take her mind off of things.”
“In a recent interview with Grazia Craig spoke about how the past few months have influenced Chapman’s work, but emphasized that she has been strong and doesn’t think of herself as a victim.”
““Everything you see here today Georgina sketched while she was out of the office and going through a very, very tough time,” Craig said of Marchesa’s Fall/Winter 2018 collection.”
““George was just sending sketches through.”


"We need to deal with how best to do it."
"We want to make a gesture," Craig said
"Five days after two explosive reports revealed Weinstein's decades of alleged sexual misconduct (from harassment to rape), his wife, Georgina Chapman, announced that she was leaving him."
"However, according to Chapman's close friends, she does not consider herself a victim, and Chapman has been reported to have been" incredibly strong "in the past few months
Chapman has been largely out of the public eye since the announcement of their separation and sympathy for women suffering from her husband's "unforgivable acts."
"The fashion designer and co-founder of Marchesa even canceled her runway show at New York Fashion week."
"However, according to Chapman's best friend and business partner Keren Craig, Weinstein's ex-wife has been focusing on her fashion to eliminate her focus on things."
"In a recent interview, Grazia Craig talked about the impact of the past few months on Chapman's work, but stressed that she has always been strong and does not consider herself a victim."
"Everything you see here today, Georgina painted it when she wasn't in the office and went through a very, very difficult period," Craig said of the marqueisa fall / winter 2018 series
"George just passed on the sketch."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““We’re delighted that he’s joining us and ABC as we set out to uncover the amazing talent America has to offer,” added Kinane, FremantleMedia’s president of entertainment programming.”
“I believe ABC is the perfect home for Idol and I ve every confidence the show s legions of fans will love it especially Idol s best traditions of showcasing heartwarming stories remarkable talent discovery and best of all making dreams come true ABC Entertainment president Channing Dungey said she...”
“After months of talks and speculation, Ryan Seacrest will officially return to host the “American Idol” revival on ABC.”
“The network made the announcement after Seacrest broke the news on Thursday morning’s “Live With Kelly and Ryan.”Seacrest will earn about $12 million for his role on the show this season, but will not receive credit as an executive producer.”
“He will, however, have creative consultation and approval on judges and other production issues, Variety has confirmed.”
“Sources say the negotiations were protracted due to questions about his complicated schedule and other commitments.”
“Seacrest served as host for the franchise during its 15-season run on Fox, which aired its “farewell season” last year.”
“The multihyphenate will continue to co-host and executive produce “Live With Kelly and Ryan” from New York in addition to hosting and executive producing his iHeartRadio-syndicated morning radio show “On Air With Ryan Seacrest” from Los Angeles.”
““It’s genuinely hard to put into words what ‘American Idol’ means to me,” Seacrest said in a statement.”
““I’m so grateful for the show and all the career and life opportunities it’s allowed me to experience.”


"We're happy that he's joining us and ABC because we're starting to explore the amazing talent that the United States has to offer," added kena, President of entertainment at Fremantle media
"I believe that ABC is the perfect home for idols, and I am fully confident that a large number of fans of this program will like it, especially the best tradition of idols, showing warm stories, extraordinary talent discovery, and most importantly making dreams come true," said Channing Dungey, President of ABC's Entertainment Department
"After months of negotiations and speculation, Ryan Seacrest will officially return to ABC to host the revival of" American Idol. "
Seacrest made the announcement on Thursday morning's live with Kelly and Ryan. Seacrest will earn about $12 million in this season's show, but will not receive the honor of executive producer
"However, variety confirmed that he would consult and approve creative ideas on judges and other production issues."
"The source said the negotiations were protracted because of doubts about his complex schedule and other commitments."
Seacrest has been on Fox TV for 15 seasons, and last year he aired "farewell season" and hosted the show
"In addition to hosting and executing his iHeartRadio joint morning radio show" in the air with Ryan Seacrest "in Los Angeles, muhyphenate will continue to co host and perform live with Kelly and Ryan in New York."
"It's hard to express in words what 'American Idol' means to me," Seacrest said in a statement
"I'm very grateful for this show and all the career and life opportunities it has given me."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So whatever I was giving them had them lit.’AdvertisementWe can’t wait to see what will happen during the ladies’ trip to Barcelona at this end of this week, Stay tuned for more juicy RHOA!”
“They had strictly a whole plant-based meal, so they weren’t used to that.”
“But the ladies who attended were sure fun to watch anyway in the latest RHOA episode.”
“Porsha’s party started with shots on the patio, and a plant-based menu followed afterwards.”
“This definitely led to some drunken fun.”
“Cynthia Bailey invited the gang to a trip to Barcelona and Porsha admitted that there is much more going on than RHOA producers let fans to see.”
“She said that her dinner was not filled with beef but on the other hand, ‘it was beef all around that table.’‘The audience didn’t even get to see a majority of it because, as you can tell, we were on fire that night.”
“The dinner was long.”
“They had to edit it down to what you saw, and it still was on fire.”
“It was fun’ said Porsha.”


"So no matter what I give them, they will be ignited." We can't wait to see what will happen to the women's team in Barcelona this weekend. Please look forward to more wonderful RhoA
"They eat whole plant meals strictly, so they're not used to it."
"But the ladies present must be interesting in the latest episode of RhoA."
"Posha's party started with a photo taken on the patio, followed by the plant menu."
"It's sure to bring some drunken fun."
"Cynthia Bailey invited these people to travel to Barcelona, and Polsa admitted that there was a lot to do besides what RhoA producers had shown fans."
"She said she didn't have beef for dinner, but on the other hand," there's beef all over the table. " The audience didn't even see most of the beef because you can see that we were on fire that night. "
"The dinner was long."
"They had to edit it to look like you saw it, but it was still on fire."
"It's interesting," said Bertha



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...s Vineyard He and Trainwreck and Snatched star Schumer whose new comedy I Feel Pretty is due out April 20 have been on an extended honeymoon most recently in Milan and Venice...”
“Fischer whom Schumer married in a small unannounced ceremony last month in Malibu California became known in culinary circles as sous chef at Mario Batali s restaurant Babbo in Manhattan and went on to win a 2016 James Beard Award for Beetlebung Farm Cookbook A Year of Cooking on Martha...”
“The Rockville Centre-raised comedy star, 36, who married celebrity chef Chris Fischer on Feb. 13, posted an Instagram Stories video Sunday in which she speaks with her father, Gordon Schumer.”
“At one point, the topic turns to whether Amy Schumer is adopting her husband’s last name.”
““Are you still Amy Schumer or are you Amy Fischer now?” Gordon Schumer asks, according to a transcription in multiple outlets.”
““I’m not Amy Fischer!” his daughter replies, laughing.”
““Do you remember who Amy Fisher is?”
“The Long Island Lolita,” referring to the infamous Merrick native with a slightly different last name who, as a 17-year-old on May 19, 1992, shot Mary Jo Buttafuoco, then wife of her 38-year-old lover, Massapequa auto mechanic Joey Buttafuoco.”
““No, I’m keeping my last name,” Amy Schumer assured her father.”
““I’m keeping your last name.”Fisher, whom the press dubbed the Long Island Lolita, pleaded guilty to aggravated assault and served 7 years at the Albion Correctional Facility in New York.”


“… The vineyard he and the train crash and snatch star Schumer who's new comedy I think is beautiful, will be held on April 20, recently extended honeymoon in Milan and Venice... "
"Last month, Schumer held a small, unannounced wedding in Malibu, California. Fischer is famous in the culinary world as the assistant chef of barber at Mario Batali restaurant in Manhattan, and won the 2016 James Bild Award for" a year of cooking for Martha, the beetle bonger farm cookbook... "
The 36 year old comedian married celebrity chef Chris Fischer on February 13 and released an instagram stories video on Sunday in which she talks to her father, Gordon Schumer
"Once, the conversation turned to whether Amy Schumer took her husband's surname."
"Are you still Amy Schumer or Amy fisher? "According to a transcript from a number of media outlets, Gordon Schumer asked
"I'm not Amy Fisher! His daughter replied with a smile
"Do you remember who Amy Fisher is?"
"Lolita of Long Island" refers to the infamous local of Merrick, whose surname is slightly different. On May 19, 1992, when she was 17 years old, she shot and killed Mary Jo butafuko, the wife of her 38 year old lover, Joey butafuko, a car repairman in massapeka
"No, I keep my last name," Amy Schumer assured her father
"I keep your last name." Fisher, known to the press as Lolita Long Island, pleaded guilty to serious injury and served seven years in New York's Albion prison



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Instead of buying a normal bouquet of flowers, West decked their home out with unique floral arrangements that hung from the ceiling.”
“It must have been difficult to pick yet another meaningful gift, but he managed to pick the perfect thing.”
“Crazy sh*t happens to us all of the time, but how f****** lucky are we that we get to experience this crazy thing called life with one another?”
“Without you I would be lost!”
“You're a f****** rider!”
“I'm so thankful for us getting closer over the last year.”
“Khloé continued:I am so impressed by the woman, wife and mother you have become.”
“Her message went on to acknowledge how much the sisters have been through over the years, and how they are lucky to be able to be there for each other, even when their lives take unexpected turns.”
“With no credit wanted either.”
“People have no idea how selfless of a human being you are.”


Instead of buying a bunch of ordinary flowers, West decorated their home with unique flowers hanging from the ceiling
"It must have been difficult to choose another meaningful gift, but he chose the perfect one."
"Crazy things happen to us all the time, but how lucky are we to experience this kind of crazy thing called each other's life?"
"I would have lost my way without you!"
"You're an f * * driver!"
"I am very grateful that we have come closer and closer in the past year."
"Khlo é went on: I'm your wife and mother, and I'm impressed."
"Her message goes on to acknowledge how much the sisters have gone through over the years and how lucky they are to be around each other, even if their lives change unexpectedly."
"You don't need a credit card, either."
"People don't know what a selfless person you are."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There were rules and the rules needed to be followed and when they weren’t, you were punished.”Read more: Jen Harley Accuses ‘Jersey Shore Family Vacation Part 2’ of Editing Fight with Ronnie Ortiz-MagroCheck out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
““The show is about all of us coming together,” explained O’Day according to E!”
“If you have a problem with your partner, don’t assume.”
“I’ve learned so much being in it — I’ve learned don’t assume anything.”
““It’s pretty crazy because it was my first real relationship.”
“News.”
““I’ve learned so much,” he told E!”
“And it ended up just like becoming like this chemistry happened within the house with a few of the cast-mates and Pauly and I were one of them.”He admitted this was his first relationshipThe DJ opened up about learning from dating the singer.”
“News “dating, learning through a dating coach how to go out there and approach people that are better suited for us and kind of get over the issues that we were having.”
“The two still had a good time falling in love on the show.”


"There are rules, rules to follow, and when they don't, you're punished." Read more: janhalley accused the editor of 'Jersey coast family vacation Part 2' with Ronnie Ortiz Magloire cutting off the memo on Facebook
"This show is about all of us coming together," Audi explained, according to e! "
"If you have problems with your partner, don't assume."
"I learned a lot from it - I learned not to assume anything."
"It's crazy, because it's my first real love."
"News."
"I've learned a lot," he told me
"It turned out to be like a chemical reaction with a couple of actors at home, and Paulie and I were one of them." He admitted it was his first relationship, and DJ opened up to learn from dating a singer
"News" dating, through a dating coach to learn how to go out, meet people who are more suitable for us, and overcome our problems
"It's fun for them to fall in love on the show."



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Salsano is executive producing via her 495 Productions.”
“The setting of the new season — and its exact title — are still being finalized.”
“Jersey Shore Family Vacation features original Jersey Shore housemates Deena Nicole Cortese, Paul “Pauly D” Delvecchio,” Jenni “JWOWW” Farley, Vinny Guadagnino, Ronnie Ortiz-Magro, Nicole “Snooki” Polizzi and Mike “The Situation” Sorrentino who reunite in Miami for the vacation of a lifetime.”
“Recently renewed for a second season, it is one of three new MTV reality series from the prolific producer, along with the upcoming Jersey Shore Family Vacation and Winter Break: Hunter Mountain.”
“One of these original series premieres was Floribama Shore, from Jersey Shore creator Salsano.”
“In the span of those nine months, MTV’s 18-49 numbers have risen 20% year-over-year, the most among the top 40 cable networks, with original series premieres up 34% vs year ago.”
“After years of declines, MTV has posted nine consecutive months of year-over-year growth in primetime Live+same day ratings among adults 18-49, its longest streak since 2000.”
“Primetime-Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight-to-Series orders See AllJersey Shore Family Vacation, from creator/executive producer SallyAnn Salsano, is part of the recent ramp-up of unscripted programming at MTV that has fueled the network’s ratings comeback under president Chris McCarthy.”
“MTV has renewed Jersey Shore Family Vacation for a second season ahead of the Jersey Shore revival’s April 5 debut as MTV’s first ever day-and-date global premiere.”


"Salsano produced through her 495 works."
"The set-up of the new season - and the exact title - is still being finalized."
Jersey coast family vacation features Jersey coast original roommates Dina Nicole Curtis, Paul Paulie D, Delvecchio, Jennie jwoww, Farley, Winnie guadanino, Ronnie Ortiz, Marco, Nicole snow, kipolizzi and Mike's situation who reunited in Miami for a lifetime holiday in Sorrentino
"Recently, the second season has continued, one of three new MTV reality series by prolific producers, as well as the upcoming Jersey coast family vacation and winter vacation: Hunter mountain."
"One of the original series premieres is floribama Shaw from Jersey coast creator salsano."
"In the past nine months, MTV's 18-49 numbers have increased by 20% over the same period last year, which is the largest growth among the top 40 cable TV networks. The premiere of original series has increased by 34% over the same period last year."
"After years of decline, MTV's prime time live + day ratings among adults aged 18-49 have increased year-on-year for nine consecutive months, the longest consecutive ratings since 2000."
"A complete guide to the prime time panic your pilot and direct to series orders see alljersey shore family vacation, from creator / executive producer Sally Ann salsano, is the latest scriptless show at MTV, driving the network's ratings back in President Chris McCarthy."
"MTV will renew the contract for the second season of the Jersey coast family holiday, which is the first global Premiere of MTV's Jersey coast Renaissance on April 5."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s an attempt to add a new spin on the proceedings, but a) what is Dirty Dancing: The Musical?”
“Johnny wistfully tells her to keep dancing and watches her go.”
“Johnny Castle still has an impressive record collection, but we rarely see him make use of a turntable.”
“...ve Had The Time of My Life are now sung by the characters and the Kellerman band...”
“Some new songs find their way in with Debra Messing and Bruce Greenwood each taking their turn on They Can t Take that Away from Me and Katey Sagal delivering her rendition of Fever More notably many of the classic numbers from the original film including the finale track I”
“(Despite the fact that a stage musical production of Dirty Dancing exists, this is the most traditional musical version to date; in the stage show, the actors primarily dance to prerecorded tracks and don’t sing).”
“This update takes it one step further and has characters actually sing their numbers.”
“It skillfully employed musical montage, using well-edited sequences set to “Wipeout” and “Hey Baby” to lead the audience through Baby’s dance lessons.”
“The original film featured musical sequences, with its chart-topping soundtrack underscoring many key moments and the titular dance numbers dominating the storytelling.”
“Image zoom Credit: Everett Collection/ Guy D'Alema/ABCA musical!”


"It's an attempt to add a new spin program, but a) what's Dirty Dancing: musicals?"
"Johnny eagerly told her to keep dancing and watch her go."
"Johnny castle's record collection is still impressive, but we rarely see him using turntables."
“…… The happiest times of my life are now being sung by the Kellerman band and the characters... "
"With Debra messaging and Bruce Greenwood singing their own songs, some new songs became popular. They can't erase that from me and Katey Sagal, who sang "fever." what's more, many of the classic numbers come from the original movie, including the last track "I."
"Despite the existence of dirty dances produced by stage music, this is the most traditional version of music to date; in stage performances, actors mainly dance according to pre recorded tracks instead of singing."
"This update goes a step further, allowing the characters to actually sing their numbers."
It skillfully uses music montage, using carefully edited sequences of "annihilation" and "Hey baby" to guide the audience through baby's dance lessons
"The original film features music sequence, and its music score is at the top of the list, highlighting many critical moments, while the real dance numbers dominate the story telling."
Credit for image zooming: Everett collection / guy dalema / abka musical



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“Joker...”
“Pixar’s Día de los Muertos saga, “Coco,” the Oscar frontrunner, led the pack with 13 nominations for the 45th Annie Awards, followed by GKid’s powerful indie fave, “The Breadwinner,” with 10.”
“Both are expected to win the top categories for feature and indie feature at the February 3rd ASIFA-Hollywood ceremony at UCLA’s Royce Hall.”
““Coco” also picked up nominations for directing (Lee Unkrich and co-director Adrian Molina), character design, two each for character animation and storyboarding, writing (Molina and Matthew Aldrich), Michael Giacchino’s music, production design, effects, editing, and voice acting for newcomer Anthony Gonzalez as Miguel.”
““The Breadwinner,” about a young girl forced to become a boy in Afghanistan, also collected nominations for directing (Cartoon Saloon’s Nora Twomey), Mychael and Jeff Danna’s music, two voice acting bids for Saara Chaudry and Laara Sadiq, character design, production design, storyboarding, writing (Anita Doron), and editing.”
“Overall, GKids grabbed 16 nominations — for “The Breadwinner,” Napping Princess,” “Mary and the Witch’s Flower,” and “The Big Bad Fox & Other Tales” — with Pixar and DreamWorks getting 15 and nine, respectively.”
“The other nominees for animated feature include DreamWorks Captain Underpants and The Boss Baby Pixar s Cars 3 and Illuminations Despicable Me 3 The big snub here was Warner Bros The LEGO Batman Movie which only managed three nominations for directing Chris McKay editing and voice acting Zach Galifianakis as...”
“In addition to The Breadwinner GKids scored two other noms in the indie feature category Napping Princess and Big Bad Fox Other Tales The others included In This Corner of the World and Loving Vincent The best short nominees were Dear Baskeball from Disney animation legend Glen Keane and Lakers...”
“For a complete list of nominations, visit the Annie’s websiteSign Up Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
"Clown..."
"Pixar's D í a de Los Muertos legend," Oscar leader coco led the 45th Annie awards with 13 nominations, followed by gkid's powerful independent fan "breadwinner" with 10 nominations
"Both awards are expected to win the best feature and independent feature awards at the Asia West Hollywood Awards ceremony at UCLA's Royce Hall on February 3."
Cocoa has also won two nominations for director (Leon Ritchie and co director Adrian Molina), character design, character animation and storyboard, writing (Molina and Matthew Aldrich), Michael giacino's music, product design, effects, editor, and newcomer Anthony Gonzalez's dubbing as Miguel
"The breadwinner" is about a young girl who is forced to become a boy in Afghanistan. The film has also been nominated by director (NORA tomey of cartoon salon), music by Mitchell and Jeff Dana, two dubbing performances by Sarah jodrey and Lala Sadik, character design, production design, storyboard, writing (Anita Dolan) and editor
"Overall, gkids received 16 nominations - breadwinner, Princess nap, Mary and the witch flower and the great evil Fox and other stories - Pixar and DreamWorks received 15 and 9 nominations respectively."
"Other nominations for animated feature films include DreamWorks captain underwear and boss baby Pixar's car 3 and lighting despicable me 3. Here's Warner Brothers LEGO Batman movie, of which only three are nominated by director Chris Mackay, editor and dubbing agent Zac galifiana kis as..."
"In addition to the breadwinner, gkids also won two other names in the independent story categories of" Sleeping Princess "and" big bad Fox ". The others are included in" this corner of the world "and" falling in love with Vincent ". The best short film nominators are Disney animation legend Glenn Keane and the Laker's dear Basque ball..."
"To get the full nomination list, please visit Annie's website to register for the latest movie and TV news!"



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But now, I can live in my room.””
““It was a room just to basically go to sleep in and then wake up and do other things in,” she says.”
“With a little guidance from online interior design service Laurel & Wolf and PBteen, she was able to transform her mismatched corner of the world into a free-spirited space where she can work, learn and grow.”
““I had a few things taped on the wall and I had a lot of pieces that weren’t very coordinated,” she says.”
““It’s the center of it — kingdom and castle.” But also similar to her peers, her space was lacking sophisticated design direction.”
““My room is really the center of how I run my personal empire,” she says.”
“Yara Shahidi is not your average 17-year-old — she stars in ABC's Black-ish, advocates for girls' rights, and is an academic all-star — but just like any other teen, her bedroom is her sanctuary.”


"But now, I can live in my room."
"It's a room that basically just goes to bed and then wakes up and does other things," she said
"With a little guidance from online interior design services laurel & Wolf and pbteen, she was able to turn her mismatched corner of the world into a free space where she could work, learn and grow."
"I put something on the wall, and there's a lot of things that don't go together," she said
"It's the center of it - the Kingdom and the castle." But like her peers, her space lacks a complex design direction
"My room is really the center of my personal Empire," she said
"Yala shahidi is not an ordinary 17-year-old girl - she plays ABC's black ISH, advocates girls' rights, and is an all star in academia - but like other teenagers, her bedroom is her refuge."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Don’t forget to tune into “Descendants 2” when it simultaneously premieres Friday, July 21 (8 p.m. EST/PST) across six networks within the Disney|ABC Television Group, including Disney Channel, ABC, Disney XD, Freeform, Lifetime and Lifetime Movies.”
“The live stream will be hosted by Radio Disney’s Morgan Tompkins and YouTube sensation Charisma Star.”
“Check back here at 4 p.m. PST (7 p.m. EST), as we will be live-streaming the Pre-Parade moment here on the Disney Parks Blog.”
“If you can’t make it in person, don’t worry!”
“Mal (Dove Cameron), Evie (Sofia Carson), Carlos (Cameron Boyce), Jay (Booboo Stewart) and Uma (China Anne McClain), along with Emmy Award-winning director Kenny Ortega will be the Mickey’s Soundsational Parade Grand Marshals on Thursday, July 13, at 4 p.m. PST (7 p.m. EST) at Disneyland park.”
“Things are about to get a little wicked when the Villain Kids (aka VKs) from the upcoming Disney Channel Original Movie “Descendants 2” visit the Disneyland Resort.”


"On Friday, July 21 (8:00 p.m. EST / PST), Disney ABC TV Group's six networks premiered" grandchildren 2 "at the same time, including Disney Channel, ABC, Disney XD, freeform, lifetime and lifetime movies. Please don't forget to watch it."
"The live broadcast will be hosted by Disney radio's Morgan Tompkins and Youtube blockbuster glamour star."
"Please come back here at 4 p.m. PST (7 p.m. EDT), because we're going to broadcast the time before the parade live on Disneyland's blog."
"If you can't go in person, don't worry!"
"Mar (dove Cameron), evey (Sophia Carson), Carlos (Cameron Boyce), Jay (boob Stewart) and UMA (China's Anne McLean) and Emmy Award-winning director Kenny Ortega will be at Disneyland on Thursday, July 13, at 4pm PST (7pm EST) "Grand Marshal of strange music tour."
"It's going to get a little bit sinister when the villain kids (also known as VK) from the upcoming Disney Channel Original Movie" posterity 2 "come to Disneyland for a holiday."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch that preview here:Also Read: 'Family Guy' Boss Seth MacFarlane Remembers His Mayor Adam West: 'You're Irreplaceable'Both “Carpool Karaoke” episodes premiere tonight, Aug. 22 at 9 p.m. ET/6 p.m. PT on Apple Music.”
“Seymour from Little Shop of Horrors Oh and they almost got in a car accident that s just a matter of time with this distracting gimmick...”
“Also Read Game of Thrones Director Hints at Violent Fate for Arya or Sansa Stark Also on Tuesday Apple and the adapted series executive producer James Corden shared a multi minute sneak peek of Seth MacFarlane and Ariana Grande s turn in the SUV when the duo belted out Suddenly...”
“And no, it doesn’t contain any spoilers from Sunday’s Season 7 finale.”
“The game certainly cracked them up, at least — watch the video above.”
“In an extended preview clip from Apple Music’s next “Carpool Karaoke” episode, the two “Game of Thrones” actresses drive around town reading song lyrics from “Hakuna Matata” and Sir Mix-a-Lot’s “Baby Got Back” in the very serious voice of the former Hand of the King.”
“Sophie Turner and Maisie Williams are keeping Ned Stark’s (Sean Bean) legacy alive, one “Lion King” song at a time.”


"Take a look at the preview here: also read" Seth MacFarlane, the boss of family boy, remembers his mayor Adam West: "you are irreplaceable." these two episodes of carpool karaoke will premiere at Apple music tonight, 9:00 p.m. EDT / 6:00 p.m. Pacific time. "
"Seymour of terror shop, they almost had an accident. It's only a matter of time. With this distracting trick..."
The director of "game of Thrones" hinted at the violent fate of Arya or Sansa stark, and apple and adaptation series executive producer James Corden shared a few minutes of Seth McFarlane and Arianna grand peeping on an SUV on Tuesday, when they suddenly broke out
"No, there's no spoiler in it for the season 7 finale on Sunday."
"This game must have broken them down, at least - watch the video above."
"In an extended preview of Apple's next episode of carpool karaoke, the two" game of Thrones "actresses drive around town, reading" hakuna Matata "and" baby's back "in very serious voices
"Sophie Turner and Macy Williams are preserving the legacy of ned Stark (Sean bean), one by one the lion king."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out her post below.”
“Back in March, Rose expressed her wish to work through whatever relationship issues they were having.”
“That's a point she made loud and clear when she uploaded a heartfelt post to Instagram Monday afternoon (May 14).”
“Addressing the idea that she's a "gold digger" or someone simply after rich men, Rose expressed her love for 21 while explaining all that she thinks makes him awesome.”
“"I Love this man so much," she begins in the post.”
““I know the Internet portrays me to be some heartless person or they feel like I’m incapable of love but I love him so hard.”
“He is not only one of the most talented people I have ever met but he is so real, humble and smart as hell."”
“In the last half of the caption, which is for an image of herself and 21, Rose issues a message to those who'd like to make assumptions about her relationship status based on who she pops up in pictures with.”
“This bit could be referencing a pic she posted of herself and Lil Pump hanging out at the 2018 Rolling Loud Festival on Sunday (May 13).”
“A short while later, one Insta user made a comment possibly insinuating that Rose was involved with the Miami rapper and Rose promptly had him blocked.”


"Look at her post below."
"As early as March, rose said he wanted to solve any relationship problems between them."
"That's a point she made loud and clear when she posted a heartfelt post on instagram on Monday (May 14) afternoon."
When it comes to whether she's a "gold digger" or a man after a rich man, rose expresses her love for the 21-year-old and explains everything she thinks he's great
"I love this man so much," she began in the post
"I know that the Internet portrays me as a ruthless person, or they think I don't have the ability to love, but I love him very much."
"Not only is he one of the most talented people I've ever met, but he's so real, modest and smart."
"In the second half of the title, this is a picture of herself and 21-year-old, and Ross sends a message to people who want to assume who she is in a relationship with based on what she pops up in the picture."
"This may refer to a photo she posted on Sunday (May 13) at the 2018 rolling sound Festival, in which she was with lil pump."
"Shortly after, an insta user commented that Ross might be implicated in a Miami rapper, and rose immediately blocked him."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since rekindling their romance, the Roar singer has been seen frequently jetting off to London to spend time with the screen star.”
“Dad The 41 year old star revealed that he wants to have more children during a chat with fans Many questions The actor chatted with his fans via Instagram s new Ask Me Anything feature Read all about it He covered a variety of topics during his chat including his...”
“And Orlando Bloom, 41, appears to be hinting things have become particularly serious between himself and the 33-year-old singer, as he revealed to fans on Wednesday that he has a strong desire to become a father again.”
“The actor, who shares seven-year-old son Flynn with ex-wife Miranda Kerr, made the revelation when a fan using Instagram's new Ask Me Anything feature enquired if he wanted more offspring, to which he responded: 'Yes, I love being a dad.'”
“Getting serious: Orlando Bloom has hinted things could be getting very serious between him and on-again girlfriend Katy Perry.”
“Pictured together in June 2018The British heartthrob's revelation on social media comes as it was reported that California-born Fireworks singer Katy wants to move to London to be closer to him.”
“Though they already both have homes in Los Angeles - hers is in Hollywood while his is in Malibu - the two have been spending time together in England recently.”
“And UsWeekly has quoted sources as saying that they look even happier whenever they're together in the UK.”
“...favourite books The work never stops The Lord Of The Rings actor also shared details of the film he s shooting Last month Katy was spotted in the English capital grabbing dinner with her actor beau after she attended his West End play Killer Joe...”
“However, their break was only temporary as they reunited this spring.”


Ever since rekindling their romance, the growler has been seen flying to London to spend time with the screen star
"Dad, the 41 year old star, revealed that he wanted to have more children and asked a lot of questions when chatting with his fans. The actor chatted with his fans through instagram's new" ask me anything "function and read all the content about it. He talked about a lot of topics, including his..."
"Orlando Bloom, 41, seems to be hinting that things between himself and the 33 year old singer have become particularly serious because he revealed to fans on Wednesday that he has a strong desire to be a father again."
"The actor, who has a 7-year-old son Flynn with his ex-wife Miranda Kerr, revealed the news when a fan asked him if he wanted more offspring using instagram's new feature" ask me what "and replied:" yes, I love being a dad. "
"Get serious: Orlando Bloom hinted that his relationship with his girlfriend Katie Perry could become very serious."
"This photo was taken in June 2018, when it was reported that California born fireworks singer Katie wanted to move to London and get closer to him."
"Although they both have homes in Los Angeles - she's in Hollywood and he's in Malibu - the two have been spending time together in the UK recently."
"And as long as they're in the UK together, they look happier," US weekly quoted sources as saying
“… The ring actor also shares the details of his movie he shot last month. Katie was found having dinner with her actor Bo in the British capital, and she attended his West End play killer Joe
"However, their holiday is only temporary because they are reunited this spring."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In response, one Twitter user comically asked, "Why does it look like Jay Z & Beyoncé are about to drop a country version of Bound 2?"”
“Bey and Jay appear to be on a motorcycle again for their promotional video.”
“Comments started flooding in on the IG photo, such as, " KANYE ASKED FOR HIS IDEA BACK LOL KANYE AND KIM DID A MUSIC VIDEO LIKE THIS ALREADY."”
“Watch below.”
“Remember that one?”
“According to fans, this photo resembles that of Kanye West’s music video, “Bound 2”, where the couple rides on a motorcycle.”
“On March 12, Beyonc é shared one specific photo for her tour on Instagram, and fans have noticed something quite familiar about it.”
“To hype up the news even more, Queen B herself shared promotional photos for her tour on social media.”
“This is really exciting news for the Beyhive.”
“Needless to say, people freaked out!”


"Why does jay z & Beyonc é seem to be abandoning the rural version of bound 2?" one twitter user jokingly asked
"Bei and Jay seem to be riding motorcycles to watch their promotional videos again."
"Reviews started pouring in funny photos like," kenye asked for his ideas to come back, haha, kenye and Kim made such a music video
"Pay attention to the bottom."
"Remember that?"
"According to fans, this photo is very similar to Kanye West's music video" bound 2 ", the couple riding a motorcycle."
"On March 12, Beyonce shared a specific photo of her tour on instagram, and fans noticed something quite familiar."
"In order to further hype the news, Queen B herself shared promotional photos of her tour on social media."
"It's really exciting news for beehives."
"Needless to say, everyone was scared!"



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: YouTube / KelseaBalleriniVEVO”
“"I hope everyone hears something in it that brings them to a place of nostalgia and is as excited as I am to begin this next chapter together."”
“The sweeping song details an epic love story that came to an end, and while listeners may have had one image in their minds while listening, the song's video told a surprising and heart-wrenching story that definitely delivered on the emotion.”
“Up Next: Kelsea Ballerini Is Taking a Page out of Carrie Underwood's Wedding PlaybookFor Ballerini's portion of the video, shot in Carmel, California, she sings atop beautiful scenery wearing a flowing gown.”
“The rest of the clip tells the story of a couple who met, fell in love, married and had a child before one partner tragically passed away.”
“In a behind-the-scenes peek shared by E!”
“News, Ballerini detailed the inspiration behind the song, noting that while she wrote it from a breakup, the song's general message is one of loss.”
“"It brings me back to the heartbreak I wrote it from, it makes me think of my fans and the journey we've shared, and now I sing it from the perspective of a legendary love story," she said.”
“More: Kelsea Ballerini Makes Unexpected Announcement on Social MediaDuring a recent press event in Nashville, the 23-year-old shared that she had a vision for the music video the moment she heard the song's demo.”
“Ballerini recently announced that her second album, Unapologetically, will be released Nov. 3.”


"Image source: YouTube / kelseaballerinivevo"
"I hope everyone can hear something from it, take them to a nostalgic place, and start the next chapter together as excited as I am."
"The song that swept the audience tells an epic love story in detail, and the story comes to an end. Although the audience may only have one picture in mind when listening, the video of the song tells a story of surprise and heartache, which absolutely conveys this kind of emotion."
Next: Kelsi Ballerini is turning a page from Carrie Underwood's wedding script. As a video clip of Ballerini shooting in Carmel, California, she sings in her flowing robe in the beautiful scenery
"The rest tells the story of a couple who meet, fall in love, marry and have a child before a partner dies."
"Peeping behind the scenes of e share!"
Ballerini described in detail the source of inspiration behind the song, pointing out that although the song was created from a breakup, the general message it conveys is a sense of loss
"It reminds me of the heartbreak when I wrote this song, it reminds me of my fans and our journey together, and now I sing it from the perspective of a legendary love story," she said
"More: Kelsi Ballerini unexpectedly announced on social media that at a recent news conference in Nashville, the 23-year-old shared her vision of the music video when she heard the demo of the song."
Ballerini recently announced that her second album, no regrets, will be released on November 3



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The disgraced Hollywood producer is being investigated by police in London and New York City after several women came forward with claims of Weinstein’s sexual misconduct.”
“Harry is not an object, he is a human, you should always remember that.”
“The incident, which was captured on camera by some audience members, happened when the former One Direction singer was singing his hit “Kiwi” at the Hollywood Bowl during the We Can Survive concert to benefit breast cancer awareness.”
“As he got down on his knees near the front of the stage, a fan grabbed at his crotch.”
“Styles appeared briefly disturbed by it and quickly swatted away the person’s hand, continuing his performance, but a moment later as he headed back towards the opposite edge of the stage, he covered his groin with his hand, clearly not willing to get grabbed for a second time.”
“WTF!!!”
“When your favorite artist is close to you, this does not justify you touching him in this way.”
“#RespectHarry pic.twitter.com/0PdUGR6nN2 — ً (@___VXXIIS) October 22, 2017“You can tell it freaked him out a little because as he continued performing, he avoided the section that fan was standing in,” an eyewitness told Yahoo Celebrity UK.”
“The hashtag #RespectHarry quickly trended on Twitter after the encounter, with fans taking to social media to express their opinions and condemn the phantom groper.”
““Harry deserves appreciation, support and respect from us.”


"The infamous Hollywood producer is under police investigation in London and New York City after several women accused him of sexual misconduct."
"Harry is not an object, he is a person, and you should always remember that."
"This incident was photographed by some audiences when the former singer was singing his hit song" kiwi fruit "in the Hollywood Bowl, and we could survive concert was going on to raise people's awareness of breast cancer."
"As he knelt in front of the stage, a fan grabbed his crotch."
"Stiles seems to have been temporarily disturbed, and he quickly took the man's hand and continued his performance, but after a while, when he walked towards the edge opposite the stage, he covered his groin with his hand and obviously didn't want to be caught a second time."
“WTF！！！”
"When your favorite artist is close to you, it doesn't justify touching him like this."
"Dear Harry pic.twitter.com/0PdUGR6nN2 -ً (@ uuuxiis) October 22, 2017 "you can say it made him a little crazy, because when he continued to perform, he avoided the part of Fan Bingbing station," a witness told Yahoo celebrity UK
"After the encounter, the" respect Harry "tag quickly became popular on twitter, and fans expressed their opinions on social media to denounce the ghost tramp."
"Harry deserves our appreciation, support and respect."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There’s a part of me that’s really sad I can’t be part of the show, but Heidi and I have joked that maybe we could swap an episode.””
“He’s gonna figure it out.”Image zoom Credit: Todd Williamson/GettyThe former Dolphins quarterback quickly became a fan favorite on Very Cavallari thanks to his dry humor, and Cavallari says he’s now fully embraced his new role.”
““We’ve definitely switched roles which has been really interesting, but it’s great,” Cavallari, 31, told PEOPLE at the Los Angeles pop-up of her store Uncommon James at The Grove.”
““I couldn’t do any of this without him.”
“He’s home with the kids, picking the boys up from school and really allowing me to be able to have the time and freedom to do all this.”
“He’s been really supportive.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The slower pace of life is a huge change for Cutler, 35, who up until 2017 had a nonstop football career.”
“On the first season of Very Cavallari, the couple — who are parents to sons Camden, 6, and Jaxon, 4, and daughter Saylor, 3 — often joked about the athlete’s excess of free time.”
““I call him my farmhand because he’s been planting trees around the house.”
“He’s been taking care of all the animals,” says Cavallari, who recently moved with her family into a new home in the Tennessee countryside.”


"Part of me was really sad that I couldn't be on the show, but Heidi and I joked that maybe we could exchange an episode."
"He'll figure it out." Photo zooming credit: Todd Williamson / Getty, the former dolphin quarterback, quickly became a favorite of Cavallari fans with his dry humor. Cavallari said he has now fully accepted his new role
"We did change roles, it was really fun, but it was great," 31 year old cavalari told people at her new store in grove in Los Angeles
"I can't do anything without him."
"He's at home with the kids, picking them up from school, really giving me time and freedom to do all this."
"He's really supportive of me." Get push notification of news, functions, etc. “
"The slowdown in the pace of life is a huge change for the 35 year old Cattler, whose football career has not stopped until 2017."
"In the first season of very cavalry, the couple - parents of their 6-year-old son Camden, 4-year-old son Jackson and 3-year-old daughter Sailor - often joke that athletes have too much free time."
"I call him my farmer because he has been planting trees around the house."
"He's been taking care of all the animals," said cavalari, who recently moved into a new home in rural Tennessee with her family



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I respect that choice because I didn’t see what everyone else saw.”
“I probably am still having a little post traumatic stress disorder right now but I’m not mad that he wasn’t going to take me.”
“But here’s the thing, I was just hoping Ross won so up until like halfway during the deliberations I was like, ‘Wait a second.”
“I really supported him.”
“I wanted him to play his best game.”
““I wanted him to win.”
“She saved Mathews and sent Mark McGrath and Ariadna Gutiérrez packing.”
“...next to her during the finale...”
“Because I felt like we had such a great game together and I would have rather have lost to Ross than win next to someone that I might have just beat just because Winokur won the final HOH competition which gave her the advantage to decide who would be sitting...”
“I was playing because I wanted Ross to win.”


"I respect that choice because I don't see what other people see."
"I may have PTSD now, but I'm not angry that he doesn't take me."
"But here's the thing. I just hope rose wins, until halfway through the debate, I think," wait a minute. "
"I'm really behind him."
"I want him to do his best."
"I want him to win."
"She saved Matthews and asked Mark McGrath and Ariadna Gutierrez to pack."
“… Next to her in the last episode... "
"Because I think we're playing well together, I'd rather lose to Ross than win next to someone I might have just beaten, because vinokur won the last game, which gives her an advantage to decide who will sit..."
"I play because I want Ross to win."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And the fight is not over.””
““We don’t think Mr. Cosby is guilty of anything.”
“And not only on #MeToo, but in a court of law.” She’s the only woman among more than 50 others whose case against Cosby has resulted in a conviction.”
““I feel like my faith in humanity is restored.” Constand and Cosby’s story started more than 15 years ago in Philadelphia.”
“She was 29 years old at the time, and worked for the women’s basketball team at Temple University.”
“Cosby was the university’s most famous alum and a trustee.”
“They met at a basketball game in 2002.”
“Constand grew up in Toronto, Canada.”
“She was a star high school basketball player and had dreams of playing professionally.”
“Over the next two years, the pair had a friendly relationship.”


"The battle is not over yet."
"We don't think Mr. Cosby is guilty of any crime."
"Not just in meto, but in court," she was the only woman convicted in more than 50 cases against Cosby
The story of konstand and Cosby began 15 years ago in Philadelphia
"At that time, she was 29 years old and worked in the women's basketball team of Temple University."
"Cosby is the most famous alumnus and trustee of the University."
"They met at a basketball game in 2002."
Constante grew up in Toronto, Canada
"She is a star high school basketball player with a dream of playing professionally."
"Over the next two years, the relationship was good."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'I think that’s probably been the most important thing for me so far.'”
“'Whether I just want to cry for a minute or I just need her to hold (Ryan) for a second or whatever it is, she’s just there to support me in any way she can,' said Haylie.”
“Duff, posted new photos of her cute baby daughter Ryan Ava to Instagram as she and fiance Matt Rosenberg took their newborn on her first family vacation to Hawaiian island Kona on Tuesday.”
“The sixteen-week-old tot looked adorable and happy in the sweet snaps, which her smitten parents shared to social media.”
“Cutie: Haylie Duff shared a photo of sixteen-week-old daughter Ryan Ava to Instagram on Tuesday, writing 'Baby's first vacation!'”
“Sharing a cute photo of Ryan to Instagram, Duff captioned the snap - which appeared to be a selfie as the little girl sat in her lap - ' Baby's first vacation'.”
“Ryan wore a cute pink ruffled bathing suit as she smiled into the camera, looking completely at ease as she snuggled up to her mom.”
“The 7th Heaven actress gave birth to the couple's first child on May 11 in Los Angeles.”
“Haylie also shared a close-up- snap of her wide-eyed daughter, who flashed a sweet smile in her cute white shirt.”
“Sweet smile: Duff gave birth to her first child in Los Angeles on May 11Haylie's finance Rosenberg also shared a cute photograph of himself enjoying some nap time with his baby girl.”


"I think it's probably the most important thing for me so far."
"Whether I want to cry for a minute or have her hold (Ryan) for a second, she will support me as much as possible," Haley said
"Duff and fiance Matt Rosenberg uploaded a new photo of their lovely little daughter, Ryan AVA, to instagram on Tuesday when they were on their first family vacation in Kona, Hawaii."
"The 16 week old looks cute and happy in a sweet snapshot shared with social media by her infatuated parents."
Cute: Haylie Duff shared a picture of her 16 week old daughter, Ryan AVA, on instagram on Tuesday, and wrote "baby's first holiday!"
Duff shared a lovely picture of Ryan on instagram and added the title "baby's first holiday". This picture looks like a self portrait of a little girl sitting on her lap
"Ryan is wearing a lovely pink flounced swimsuit, smiling at the camera and nestling beside her mother. She looks very comfortable."
"The seventh heaven actress gave birth to the couple's first child in Los Angeles on May 11."
"Haley also shared a close-up of her big eyed daughter in a lovely white shirt with a sweet smile."
"Sweet smile: on May 11, Duff gave birth to her first child in Los Angeles, and Heili's financial officer, Rosenberg, shared a lovely picture of herself and her baby girl enjoying a nap."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“OH Erin… now you will finally have the peace you wanted so badly here on earth …Rest In It serenely now.. too soon — Henry Winkler (@hwinkler4real) April 23, 2017”
“Upon hearing the news of her passing, Henry Winkler who played Fonzie and Ron Howard tweeted their condolences.”
“Her last project was the 2010 film Not Another B Movie.”
“Her acting credits include Family Affair, The Smith Family, Gunsmoke, The Love Boat, Murder, She Wrote, Diagnosis Murder, Dickie Roberts: Former Child Star and The Bold and the Beautiful.”
“She also reprised her role in the short-lived 1982 series Joanie Loves Chachi alongside Scott Baio, which lasted two seasons.”
“The show ran for 11 season, with Moran portraying Joanie from 1974 to 1984.”
“Standard toxicology tests were performed and the results are pending however no illegal narcotics were found at the residence.”The actress rose to fame in the ’70s after appearing as Ron Howard’s Richie Cunningham’s little sister on Happy Days.”
““A subsequent autopsy revealed that Mrs. Moran likely succumbed to complications of stage 4 cancer.”
““A joint investigation into Mrs. Moran’s death was conducted by the Harrison County Sheriff’s Department and the Harrison County Coroner’s office,” the statement reads.”
“The cause of death was released Monday in a joint statement from the Harrison County coroner’s office and sheriff’s department.”


"Oh, Irene Now you can finally get the peace you long for on earth Now have a quiet rest.. Too early - Henry Winkler (@ hwinkler4real) April 23, 2017
"After hearing the news of her death, Henry Winkler and Ron Howard, who play FONZ, tweeted their mourning."
"Her last project was a 2010 film, not another B-rated film."
Her acting skills include "family affairs", "the Smiths", "gun smoke", "love boat", "murder", "diagnostic murder", "Dick Roberts: former child star", "courage and beauty"
She also replayed her role with Scott baio in the 1982 short play Joanie loves Chachi, which lasted two seasons
"It's been 11 seasons, and Moran played Joanne from 1974 to 1984."
"Standard toxicology tests have been carried out and the results are still waiting, but no illegal drugs have been found in the residence." The actress became famous in the 1970s, after playing the sister of rich Cunningham, Ron Howard's sister, in happy times
"Subsequent autopsy revealed that Mrs. Moran was likely to die from complications of stage 4 cancer."
"The Harrison County Department of justice and the Harrison County coroner's office conducted a joint investigation into the cause of Mrs. Moran's death," the statement said
"The Harrison County coroner's office and the Department of Justice issued a joint statement Monday announcing the cause of death."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“DESIblitz lists 5 Indian films that viewers should watch on the streaming service in 2021.”
“That means you can sample Oscar-nominated films from the comfort of your own living room,5 film indiani Netflix in arrivo da guardare nel 2021(since Jan, 2021) Netflix has an extensive film library from India.”
“Best Netflix Middle East movies: the top films you should be watching right now(since Jan, 2021) Netflix Middle East movies run the gamut of tastes and genres, either as Netflix Originals or third parties.”
“Progress comes from challenging what we hear and considering different views.”
“Today’s Premium Stories(months ago) Reducing news to hard lines and side-taking leaves a lot of the story untold.”
“5 Upcoming Netflix Indian Films to Watch in 2021(since Jan, 2021) Netflix has an extensive film library from India.”
“My TV is broken, so I might as well.”
“In the meantime we will work on fixing this.”
“Did you click that link the correct way?”


"Desiblitz lists five Indian films that viewers should watch on streaming services in 2021."
"This means that you can taste Oscar nominated films in your comfortable living room. In 2021 (since January 2021), Netflix has a huge film library from India in arrivo Da guardardnel."
"Best Netflix Middle East movies: the top movies you should watch now (from January 2021) Netflix Middle East movies come in all kinds of flavors and types, whether they are original Netflix movies or third-party movies."
"Progress comes from challenging what we hear and considering different perspectives."
"Today's top news (a few months ago) simplified the news into hard line and side attack, leaving many unknown stories."
"Five Netflix Indian films to be released in 2021 (since January 2021) Netflix has a large film library from India."
"My TV doesn't work, so I can too."
"At the same time, we are committed to solving this problem."
"Did you click the link the right way?"



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was also informed that her father, Edwin White, died in a car accident while hill was around 10-years-old.”
“Since reuniting with White, Hill has discovered that she has a half-brother, Zachary.”
“Related: 'I Hate Myself For Loving You': Faith Hill Leaves Sunday Night FootballHill and McGraw live together in Franklin, Tennessee.”
“Faith Hill's real name first name is Audrey, with Tim McGraw's being Samuel.”
“...husband Samuel of Franklin Tennessee...”
“Related Faith Hill Tim McGraw Divorce Rumours Are Ridiculous The couple refused to reveal the identity of the woman although it was later discovered that a message a White s funeral read She leaves her daughter Audrey McGraw and her...”
“Hill, married to Tim Mcgraw, secretly attended White's funeral in Florida on 3rd February, 2007.”
“Hill had only recently gotten to know her mother, Paula White - the woman who had put her up for adoption, shortly before she died in her sleep on 28th January, 2007.”
“Faith Hill, the legendary country singer/songwriter, found out about the recent passing of her biological mother.”


She also learned that her father, Edwin white, died in a car accident when hill was about 10 years old
Since her reunion with white, Hill found out that she had a half brother, Zachary
"Related report: 'I hate myself and love you': Faith Hill left Sunday night football hill and McGraw live together Franklin, Tennessee."
"Faith Hill's real name is Audrey, and Tim McGraw is Samuel."
“… Tennessee Franklin's husband, Samuel
"The rumors about Faith Hill Tim McGraw's divorce are ridiculous. The couple refused to reveal the identity of the woman, although it was later found that white's funeral said that she had left her daughter Audrey McGraw and her..."
Hill married Tim McGraw and secretly attended White's funeral in Florida on February 3, 2007
Hill only recently met her mother, Paula white, who sent her for adoption shortly before she died in her sleep on January 28, 2007
"Faith Hill, the legendary country singer / songwriter, discovered the recent death of her biological mother."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I am committed to a transformative and hopeful 2018.”She also checked herself into an alcohol treatment facility.”
“I want to offer my sincere apologies to anyone I might have offended with my behavior.”
“...on...”
“More than two months ago, the Real Housewives of New York City star was arrested in Palm Beach, Florida, on Christmas Eve and allegedly attacked a police officer.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Obviously it was a really bad night for me and something I am not proud of,” de Lesseps told The New York Times while reflecting on the incident.”
“Next week, de Lesseps, 52, will make her debut in cabaret show #CountessAndFriends, which is centered around her life — including her Dec. 24 arrest.”
““I can’t avoid the whole story of what happened to me in Palm Beach,” shared de Lesseps, who has since quit smoking.”
““I’m trying to keep it light while also taking it seriously,” she said about the show, debuting Feb. 27 at Feinstein’s/54 Below.”
““Craaaazy for thinking I could get out of those handcuffs,” she said.”


"I am committed to a transformative and hopeful 2018." She also sent herself to an alcohol treatment facility
"I would like to express my sincere apology to anyone who might have offended me."
“… In... "
"More than two months ago, the real housewife of the New York City Star was arrested on Christmas Eve in Palm Beach, Florida, and was said to have attacked a police officer."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Obviously, it was a very bad night for me and I'm not proud of it," dreiseps told the new york times as he reflected on the incident
"Next week, dreisepps, 52, will make her debut in the song and dance show count and friends, which revolves around her life - including her arrest on December 24."
"I couldn't avoid everything that happened in Palm Beach," shared dreiseps, who later quit smoking
"I'm trying to be relaxed and take it seriously at the same time," she said at Feinstein's under 54 premiere on February 27
"I thought I could get rid of the handcuffs. It's so sad," she said



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : ‘I’m the third wheel’: Writer who is desperate to be a mum admits feeling ‘jealous’ of her surrogate...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Yep, it’s just as mind-boggling as it sounds.”
“For the past three years, the Modern Family actress has been locked in a bitter legal dispute with her ex-boyfriend Nick Loeb, who filed the lawsuit against Sofia on behalf of her own frozen eggs.”
“Sofia, 46, and Nick, 43, had dated for two years before splitting in May 2014, ending their engagement.”
“While still dating in 2013, the pair signed a document which stated that they could not use the embryos without the other party’s consent.”
“Nick and Sofia dated for two years and was engaged (Picture: WireImage)But in 2015, a year after their split, Nick filed a right-to-live lawsuit in California.”
“This was later dropped but he then filed a new suit in Louisiana as it’s a pro-life state and recognises embryos as humans or ‘juridical persons’.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementIt’s reported that Nick has named the two female embryos “Isabella” and “Emma”.”
“The businessman reportedly claims that if the embryos aren’t brought to life, they are being denied the right to an inheritance fund set up in their name.”


"More:" I'm in the third round ": writers eager to be mothers admit to feeling 'jealous' of their surrogate mothers..."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"Yeah, that sounds incredible."
"For the past three years, the modern housewife has been involved in a fierce legal dispute with her ex boyfriend Nick Loeb, who sued Sophia on behalf of her frozen eggs."
"Sophia, 46, dated Nick, 43, for two years, then broke up in May 2014, ending their engagement."
"Although the two were still dating in 2013, they signed a document stating that they could not use the embryos without the other's consent."
"Nick and Sophia dated for two years and got engaged (image source: WireImage), but in 2015, one year after their breakup, Nick filed a right to life lawsuit in California."
"The bill was later repealed, but he later filed a new lawsuit in Louisiana, which is a life supporting state that recognizes embryos as human beings or" legal persons. "
According to reports, Nick named the two female embryos "Isabella" and "Emma"
According to reports, the businessman claimed that if the embryo could not be revived, they would be deprived of the right to set up a heritage fund in their name



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After the last film in the Divergent series, Allegiant, failed to bring in money at the box office, Lionsgate decided to turn the final installment, Ascendant, into a TV movie.”
“...last time in the fourth and final Divergent film you might have to wait a little longer...”
“I think that if Ansel and I hadn t known each other from Divergent our relationship in this movie would not be what it is RELATED VIDEO Shailene Woodley Makes Her Relationship with Rugby Player Ben Volavola Instagram Official But for fans hoping to see them reunite on screen one...”
““There’s something really beautiful about working with someone again, and again, and again because the more you get to know somebody on a personal level the more free you feel artistically,” she said.”
“Image zoom Ansel Elgort and Shailene Woodley | Credit: Sean Zanni/Patrick McMullan via GettyWoodley previously opened up about how their longtime friendship helped their on-screen chemistry.”
“And of course, they later went on to star as love-interest in the highly-successful film The Fault in Our Stars.”
“Elgort and Woodley famously starred together in the Divergent series, playing brother and sister in a dystopian society.”
“Meanwhile, Elgort kept his look classic in a Ralph Lauren tux.”
“She paired her look with black thigh-high boots.”
“Woodley, 26, channeled the “Heavenly Bodies: Fashion and the Catholic Imagination” theme in a futuristic silver Ralph Lauren dress with white ruffle details on the sleeves.”


"After the last film in the divergent series, allegiant, failed to bring in box office revenue, Lion Gate decided to adapt the last film of the rise into a TV movie."
“… Last time in the fourth and last divergent movie, you might have to wait a little longer... "
"I think if Ansel and I didn't get to know each other from their differences in this movie, our relationship wouldn't be a related video. Shireen Woodley made her relationship with rugby player Ben Walla Walla an official instagram video, but for fans who want to see them reunite on screen one..."
"It's really wonderful to work with someone over and over again, because the more people you know on a personal level, the more free you are in art," she said
"Ansel Elgort and shailene Woodley photo source: Sean zanni / Patrick McMullan via gettywoodley previously disclosed how their long-term friendship helped them generate chemical reactions on the screen."
"Of course, they later starred in a very successful film," our star's fault, "with love as the theme
"Argot and Woodley co star in the differences series, playing brother and sister in an anti Utopian society."
"At the same time, elgert kept his classic look in Ralph Lauren's evening dress."
"She matched her look with black boots."
Woodley, 26, is wearing a futuristic silver Ralph Lauren dress with White Ruffle details on the sleeves, explaining the theme of "celestial bodies: fashion and Catholic imagination."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: BravoTELL US – SHOULD LISA FIRE JAX FOR THE WAY HE BEHAVED?”
“ https://t.co/nlz4RpXVRC — Jax (@mrjaxtaylor) April 10, 2018So it would appear Jax did not lose his job at SUR nor was he fired from Vanderpump Rules after his shocking meltdown.”
“On Monday night’s episode, Jax, 38, blew a fuse while working at SUR and started cursing and yelling at everyone, including his boss Lisa Vanderpump.”
““F–k you all,” yelled Jax in front of Lisa and customers at SUR.”
““F–k you all, you f–king lying sacks of s–t.”
“F–k you all.”Lisa tried to calm him down and get him to leave but Jax was having none of it.”
“As for what set him off, it had to do with a number of issues with his costars.”
“He was upset with Scheana Marie for trying to hook up his girlfriend Brittany Cartwright with Adam, another SUR bartender.”
“Jax was also angry that he was being accused of making up the rumor about James Kennedy and Kristen Doute hooking up in Mexico.”
“Understandably, Lisa was highly upset with Jax’s behavior.”


Photo source: bravotell, should we - Lisa fire Jax for his actions? "
“  https://t.co/nlz4RpXVRC-Jax (@ mrjaxtaylor) April 10, 2018, so it seems that Jax did not lose his job at Sur, nor was he fired by the van der Pol rules after the shocking collapse. "
On Monday night's show, Jax, 38, suddenly lost his temper while working at sur and started cursing and yelling at everyone, including his boss Lisa vanderpump
"Hello, all of you," Jakes called in front of Lisa and sur's customers
"All of you, you sacks of garbage in bed."
"How are you all." Lisa tried to calm him down and let him go, but Jakes didn't do it at all
"As for what interests him, it has to do with some questions from his partners."
"He's angry with Joanna Marie because she wants to hook up his girlfriend Brittany Cartwright with another sur bartender, Adam."
"Jacques is also angry that he is accused of fabricating rumors that James Kennedy and Christine Dutt are colluding in Mexico."
"It's understandable that Lisa is very upset about Jacques's behavior."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It hurts real bad because people don’t know me, and I have no control over it, and this is the way I am,” he says.”
““I take Xanax, Propranolol for high blood pressure medication and I took oxycodones for my mouth.”And he’s hoping to get a message across to his fans claiming he needs to seek professional help for drug addiction.”
“I say, ‘I invoke the right to speak to my attorney,’ and they disregarded that, they revoked that immediately.”
““[I] stepped outside.”
““[They] forcefully grabbed me out,” claims Carter.”
“He was then approached by police after a motorcyclist had reported him for reckless driving.”
“After tweeting about missing his Saturday show with Flo Rida in Kansas City, Missouri, due to “transportation issues,” Carter says he changed routes to head to Alabama, and that’s when he was stopped at an AutoZone in Georgia to fix his alignment after getting a new tire.”
“...the car all night for eight hours he claims...”
“Carter says the car he bought was a lemon so the alternator was shot and then it kept dying After discovering the windows were stuck in the down position and the car s locking system gave out Carter put my girlfriend in the back of the car and I guarded...”
“We all left the morning of Sept. 11 and watched the Trade Centers get hit across the Hudson River, and I saw it with my own eyes and I saw people jumping out of the buildings and burned,” says Carter.”


"It's really painful because people don't understand me and I can't control it, that's what I am," he said
"I use xanax for high blood pressure and oxycodones for my mouth." He wants to send a message to his fans that he needs to seek professional help to get rid of drugs. "
"I said," I invoked my right to speak to my lawyer, "and they ignored it and immediately withdrew it."
"(I) went out."
"They forced me out," Carter said
"After a motorcyclist reported him for reckless driving, the police later found him."
Carter tweeted that he missed Saturday's performance with Florida in Kansas City, Missouri, due to "traffic problems.". He said he changed his route to Alabama, when he stopped in a car District in Georgia and adjusted the route after changing a new tire.
“… The car had been driving for eight hours and he said
"Carter said that the car he bought was a lemon, so the generator broke down. Later he found that the window was stuck in the down position, and the lock system of the car broke down, so it broke down all the time. Carter put my girlfriend in the back of the car, and I'm guarding it... "
"We all left on the morning of September 11 to see the trade center attacked across the Hudson River, and I saw it with my own eyes, and I saw people jump out of the building and burn down," Carter said



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Merci de donner une note globale à ce site :”
“Que pourrions-nous améliorer?”
“MSN Nous vous remercions pour vos commentaires...”
“مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Commentaires fr Choisir une langue Canada français fr Canada English en À la une Télévision Célébrités Cinéma Musique Vidéo Jeux en ligne Envoyer un commentaire à...”
“Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية”
“English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi...”
“...português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition...”
“...msn accueil divertissement par Microsoft Actualités recherche web Passez directement à la navigation Passez directement au contenu Se connecter Modifier la langue et le contenu Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil...”


"Merci de Donner une note global website:
"Do you mean the fragrance of your flowers?"
“MSN Nous vous remercions pour vos commentations…”
The work carried out in various aspects, from 1575555; Respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective Respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective· Ambassador Jacques nline said
“Sverige”Sverige SVENSSKa Türk the the the the the the Sverige  Svenssssv National Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Service Engineering Environment Service Engineering Service Engineering, UK The United States, the United States, the United Kingdom, the United States, the United States, the European countries, the countries of Venezuela, the countries of Venezuela, the countries of Venezuela, the countries of Venezuela, the countries of Vietnam, the environment of Vietnam, at present, different laws are adopted to purchase from different countries Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Purchase Buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy buy
"English Irish English Italian Italian Italian magyarrorsz á g Magyar Malaysian English Mexican Spanish Dutch English New Zealand English Norwegian Norsk bokm å L Ö sterreich Deutsch per ú Espa NIA ol Philippine English Polska Polska Portuguese Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South African English Swiss Fran å AIS Suomi Suomi..."
“…… Portugal Canada English Canada French India English india india india india india india india india india india india india india india India Indonesia International Edition
“… msn accureil divertissement par Microsoft implementationés recherche web Passez directementála navigation Passez directement au contenu Se connecter Modifier la langue et le contenu  Afrique French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French French



**Something goes wrong**
“She’s repped by CAA, Curtis Brown, 3 Arts and attorney Gregory Slewett.”
“Jerry Bruckheimer is producing and Johnny Depp reprises with Javier Bardem, Geoffrey Rush and Orlando Bloom also in the mix.”
“Disney’s fifth installment of Pirates is being directed by the Kon-Tiki duo Joachim Rønning and Espen Sandberg.”
“She is shooting the sequel to the latter film, Maze Runner: The Scorch Trials.”
“She starred in The Truth About Emanuel and then in The Maze Runner.”
“The British actress got her big break in the cast of the original UK series Skins.”
“EXCLUSIVE: Kaya Scodelario is in early talks for the female lead in Pirates Of The Caribbean: Dead Men Tell No Tales.”


"She's represented by the CAA, Curtis Brown, three artists and lawyers, Gregory Slater."
"Jerry brookheimer is making it, and Johnny Depp and Javier Baden, Jeffrey rush and Orlando Bloom are doing it again."
"Disney's fifth movie, pirates, is directed by Joachim lunning and ESPON Sandberg, the Connecticut duo."
She is working on the sequel to the latter film, the labyrinth runner: the trial of anxiety
"She starred in the truth about Emmanuel and the labyrinth runner
"The British actress made a big breakthrough in the cast of the original British drama skin."
"Exclusive: Kaya skodrio is in early negotiations for the heroine of Pirates of the Caribbean: the dead can't speak."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It...”
“I invite you to step into my world and enjoy MY LOVE AND FLARE FOR FASHION AND STYLE!”
“I am very optimistic about what life has to offer, I go for the best in life andI believe in aspiring to inspire other women with the same zeal that I have.”
“My siblings call me "ndomma" meaning“beautiful”, some of my friends call me "catalog", my husband calls me "my fashionista wife" and Icall myself “Kartia Velino”.”
“My parents have ten children of which I am the sixth child.”
“My three boysare all grown: 21, 16, and 14; and I am at that point in my life where I am actually able to follow mydream.”
“), Ihonestly believe that this is the perfect time for me to showcase my love and flare for fashion andstyle with the perfect backdrop of the maturity and self-confidence that I now possess.”
“Looking forwards however (notice how I didn’t say looking backwards?”
“...it remained just a dream for quite a long time tucked away someplace in my heart waiting to blossom...”
“Anyway I had always wanted to be a model back then but because I never had the support or professional guidance that was required to transform this dream into reality I was never able to do much about it and...”


"It..."
"I invite you to come into my world and enjoy my love and shine for fashion and style!"
"I am very optimistic about what life can offer, I pursue the best things in life, and I believe I am willing to inspire other women with the same enthusiasm."
My brothers and sisters call me "dermma", which means "beautiful", some of my friends call me "catalog", my husband calls me "wife of fashion geek", and I call myself "kartia Velino"
"My parents have ten children, and I'm the sixth."
"My three sons are all grown up, 21, 16 and 14; and I'm at a time in my life when I can really realize my dreams."
"), I firmly believe that this is the best time for me to show my love and shine for fashion and style. I now have a perfect background of maturity and confidence."
"But look forward (notice why I didn't say look back?"
“…… It's just a dream, hidden somewhere in my heart, waiting to bloom... "
"Anyway, I always wanted to be a model at that time, but because I never got the support or professional guidance to make this dream come true, I haven't been able to do a lot of things, and..."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“4.”
“Isaiah is both a trainer and fitness model and enjoys exercising for health and fun.”
“We think they are an amazing couple and perfect for each other in every way.”
“One thing is for sure: with a compassionate heart, great body and beautiful face, Sparks won the lottery.”
“Many have asked this question since news of their relationship broke earlier this summer and while the two seem to be blissfully in love and over the moon about their child-to-be, there is so much to learn about the model that stole this singer’s heart.”
“Who exactly is Dana Isaiah?”
“Isaiah is thrilled to be expecting his first child with sparks early next spring.”
“According to Sparks, Isaiah has wanted to share the good news with everyone but respected his wife’s desire for privacy.”
“Because of her understanding of life in the public eye and the scrutiny that comes with it, Sparks waited to announce her pregnancy with the new dad-to-be Isaiah until September of 2017.”
“Sparks found out about her pregnancy only a month after she and Isaiah’s impromptu wedding.”


“4.”
"Isaiah is both a coach and a fitness model. He likes to exercise for health and fun."
"We think they are a great couple and fit each other well in every way."
"One thing is for sure: sparks won the lottery with a compassionate heart, a strong body and a beautiful face."
"Since the news of their love affair came out earlier this summer, many people have raised this question. Although they seem to be very happy in love and full of hope for their future children, there is still a lot to learn for the model who has taken away the singer's heart."
"Who is Dana Isaiah?"
"Isaiah is very happy to have his first child early next spring."
"According to sparks, Isaiah wants to share the good news with everyone, but respects his wife's desire for privacy."
"Because of her understanding of life in the public eye and the resulting censorship, sparks didn't announce that she was pregnant with her father to be, Isaiah, until September 2017."
"Sparks found out she was pregnant a month after her impromptu wedding with Isaiah."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the full interview below.”
“McHale also mentioned that he kept his relationship with Austin McKenzie private to "protect the person I was with."”
“I've always supported LGBT organizations and things like that because I felt like I had a vested interest in this where I wanted to help out," he continued.”
“"The organizations I've been supporting and all that sort of work has been apparent, at least to me.”
“People knew," he responded to a question of whether he was hiding his sexuality.”
“"If somebody was a big fan and following everything I was doing [on social media], like the people I interact with on Twitter on a daily basis, I think there was zero surprise.”


"See the full interview below."
McHale also mentioned that his personal relationship with Austin McKenzie was to "protect the people I'm with."
"I have always supported LGBT organizations and similar things because I feel I have a vested interest and I want to help here," he continued
"The organization I've been supporting and all this work is obvious, at least for me."
"People know," he answered a question about whether he was hiding his sexual orientation
"If someone is a big fan of me and follows what I do (on social media), like the people I interact with every day on twitter, I think it's a zero surprise."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The fence will display fan messages and artefacts archived by Paisley Park.”
“Minnesota officials have announced plans to install a tribute fence inside Paisley Park, Prince’s home and studio, in preparation for fans returning on the second anniversary of his death.”
“Prince was 57 when he was found alone and unresponsive in an elevator at his Paisley Park estate on 21 April, 2016.”
“Public data released six weeks after his death showed he died of an accidental overdose of fentanyl, a synthetic opioid 50 times more powerful than heroin.”
“A confidential toxicology report provides some insight into just how much fentanyl was in his system.”
“Experts who are not connected to the Prince investigation said the numbers leave no doubt that fentanyl killed him.”
““The amount in his blood is exceedingly high, even for somebody who is a chronic pain patient on fentanyl patches,” said Dr Lewis Nelson, chairman of emergency medicine at Rutgers New Jersey medical school.”
“He called the fentanyl concentrations “a pretty clear smoking gun”.”
“The report says the concentration of fentanyl in Prince’s blood was 67.8 micrograms per litre.”
“Fatalities have been documented in people with blood levels ranging from three to 58 micrograms per litre, the report says.”


"The fence will show fan messages and cultural relics archived in Paisley park."
Minnesota officials have announced plans to install a memorial fence in Paisley Park, the prince's home and studio, in preparation for fans returning on the second anniversary of the prince's death
"On April 21, 2016, at the age of 57, prince was found alone in the elevator of Paisley Park Manor and did not respond."
Public data released six weeks after his death showed that he died of an accidental overdose of fentanyl, a synthetic opioid 50 times stronger than heroin
"A confidential toxicology report provided some information about the level of fentanyl in his body."
"Experts who have nothing to do with the prince's investigation say the figures make it clear that fentanyl killed him."
Dr. Lewis Nelson, director of the Department of emergency medicine at Rutgers University's New Jersey school of medicine, said: "his blood levels are very high, even in patients who have been taking fentanyl patches for a long time."
He called the concentration of fentanyl "a very obvious smoking gun."
"The concentration of fentanyl in the prince's blood is 67.8 micrograms per liter," the report said
"Deaths have been recorded in people with levels between 3 and 58 micrograms per liter of blood," the report said



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Jennifer Garner Wants the Next Person She Dates to Be 'In It for the Long Run' (Exclusive)Jennifer Garner Sends Ben Affleck Heartwarming Father's Day MessageBen Affleck and Lindsay Shookus Are Still Going Strong -- Is Marriage Next?”
“In a new interview with CBS Sunday Morning, the 46-year-old actress says intense tabloid scrutiny -- specifically, stories regarding her highly publicized marriage and eventual split from Ben Affleck -- put pressure on her private life.”
“Garner recalls a time when there were as many as 15 to 20 cars parked outside her home on the weekends, looking for any information they could dig up on her and her family.”
“"Looking back on that, I really feel the stress of it," says Garner, who shares three kids, Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9 and Samuel, 6, with Affleck.”
“"I really -- I could cry talking about it."”
“"What I think I've learned is that the scrutiny in your private life puts a pressure to make something happen," she continues.”
“"You feel a pressure to hurry up and get married, 'cause you think that’ll end the, 'Are they engaged?”
“Are they not?'”
“And that's true in the reverse, as well.”


(exclusive) related gallery
"Embedded code restart" content: Jennifer Garner hopes that the next person she dates can "Trek" (exclusive) Jennifer Garner sends a warm father's Day message to Ben Affleck. Ben Affleck and Lindsay shokus are still going well - is the next one marriage? "
The 46 year old actress said in a new CBS interview Sunday morning that the tabloid censorship of her - especially about her much publicized marriage and her eventual breakup with Ben Affleck - has put pressure on her private life
"Ghana recalled that on one occasion, as many as 15 to 20 cars stopped at her door on weekends, looking for any information they could find about her and her family."
"In retrospect, I really feel the pressure," said Garner, who has three children with Affleck: Violet, 12, Serafina, 9, and Samuel, 6
"I really - I'll cry about it."
"I think what I've learned is that in your private life, supervision puts pressure on you to make things happen," she continued
"You feel pressure to get married quickly, because you think it will end the marriage. Are they engaged?"
"Isn't it?"
"The other way around."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Typically I exploit pure minimize Aloe Vera or vitamin E oil.”
“I exploit something from foam cleansers to Burt’s Bees Oil Cleanser.”
“What’s your tip for making these pairings work?I do it on a regular basis, and it is all trial and error!”
“RB/Bauer-Griffin/GC Photos You typically combine surprisingly prints, colours and textures collectively.”
“You continue to wish to really feel like your self and in your setting.”
“That finally decides it.”
“A number of it has to do with “Why am I doing this?” Is it about being enjoyable, vibrant and pleasant or as a result of everybody else is doing it?”
“How do you resolve which dangerous developments to attempt and which to keep away from?Though I wish to step out of my consolation zone, I nonetheless must really feel snug.”
“I truly wore one to the wrap celebration for Black-ish—whereas everybody else had clothes on, I used to be in my tracksuit.”
“Our pal, designer, Melody Ehsani has actually cool monochrome tracksuits.”


"I usually develop pure aloe or vitamin E oil."
"I developed something from foam cleanser to Bert bee Oil Cleanser."
"What's the secret to making these pairings successful? I always do this. It's all trial and error! "
"Rb / Bauer Griffin / GC photos usually combine amazing prints, colors and textures."
"You still want to really feel yourself in your environment."
"That's the decision."
Many of them are related to "why should I do this?"? "Is it for enjoyment, energy and pleasure, or is it because everyone else is doing it?"
"How do you address the dangers of development and try to stay away from them? Although I want to get out of my comfort zone, I have to feel comfortable. "
"I really wore one to go to the black celebration, and everyone else was dressed. I used to wear sportswear."
"Our friend and designer, melody Ehsani, actually has cool monochrome sportswear."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Oldman was previously nominated for his turn in “Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy” in 2012.”
“The police investigated Fiorentino s claims and charges were never filed with Oldman describing her account as replete with lies innuendos and half truths People watching along immediately reacted on Twitter to Oldman s win as well as to accused rapist Kobe Bryant s who picked up an Oscar for...”
“The actor was essentially a shoo-in to win the Best Actor award after picking up trophies at the Golden Globes, BAFTAs and Screen Actors Guild Awards in the past few months.”
“He beat out competition like Daniel Kaluuya in “Get Out” and Timothée Chalamet in “Call Me By Your Name,” who was set become the youngest Best Actor honoree in almost 80 years.”
““Movies, such is their power, captivated a young man from south London and gave him a dream,” he said onstage in his acceptance speech before thanking his mother.”
““Put the kettle on, I’m bringing Oscar home.”VALERIE MACON via Getty Images Gary Oldman and Gisele Schmidt arrive for the 90th Annual Academy Awards.”
“Oldman’s win arrives amid a growing backlash against the actor, as allegations of domestic violence against him have resurfaced.”
“The English actor was accused of choking and beating his then-wife Donya Fiorentino in 2001 with a telephone while their young children watched.”
“Best Animated Short Film...”
“II also picked up awards for Best Sound Editing and Mixing at the ceremony...”


"Oldman was previously nominated for his role in 2012 as" tinker, tailor, soldier, spy. "
"The police investigated the charges in Florence, but they never brought any charges against oldman. Oldman said that his account was full of lies, innuendo and half truths. People immediately responded to oldman's victory and the accused rapist Kobe Bryant on twitter. Kobe Bryant because..."
"In the past few months, the actor has won the Golden Globes, the British Academy of film awards and the Screen Actors Guild Awards, which is basically the only way to win the best actor award."
He beat Daniel kalouya and Timothy é e chalamet, who became the youngest Best Actor winner in nearly 80 years in call me by your name
"Movies, that's their power, attracted a young man from South London and gave him a dream," he said on stage before thanking his mother
"Put the kettle on and I'll take Oscar home." Valerie Macon reports through Getty pictures that Gary Oldman and Giselle Schmidt have arrived at the 90th Academy Awards
"As oldman won, there was growing opposition to him because the charges of domestic violence against him surfaced again."
"The British actor was accused of strangling and beating his then wife, Donia Florence, over the phone in 2001 while their young children watched," he said
"Best animation clip..."
"I also won the best sound editing and mixing award at the award ceremony..."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“His publicists have not responded to the claims.”
“Doctors wanted him to remain in hospital, but when they were unable to provide a private room Prince and his entourage left.”
“They said his plane made an emergency landing in Illinois on Friday so that the singer could be taken to hospital for a "save shot" - typically administered to counteract the effects of an opiate.”
“TMZ, the American celebrity gossip site, claimed that the star had been treated for a drug overdose days before his death.”
“His body was found unresponsive at the estate where he lived and worked in a recording studio.”
“The singer - real name Prince Rogers Nelson - was confirmed dead at Paisley Park in Minnesota, days after being rushed to hospital after falling ill on tour.”
“A cause of death was not immediately determined and police are investigating.”
“Tributes continued to pour in from around the world for the pop superstar, who died after being found collapsed in a lift at his home in Minnesota.”
“A post-mortem examination will take place on Friday on the body of Prince, after the pioneering musician died at his home aged 57 amid reports he was treated for a drug overdose just days before his death.”


"His PR staff did not respond to these claims."
"The doctors wanted him to stay in hospital, but when they couldn't provide a private room, the prince and his entourage left."
They said his plane made an emergency landing in Illinois on Friday so that the singer could be taken to hospital for "life-saving injections" - usually to counteract the effects of opium
TMZ, the US celebrity gossip website, said the star had been treated for a drug overdose a few days before his death
"His body was found in a recording studio where he lived and worked, and there was no response."
The singer, whose real name is Prince Rogers Nelson, was certified dead in Paisley Park, Minnesota, a few days after being taken to hospital during the tour
"The cause of death has not yet been determined immediately. The police are investigating."
"The world continues to mourn the pop star who was found dead in an elevator at his home in Minnesota."
"An autopsy will be carried out on Prince's body on Friday after the pioneer musician died at home at the age of 57 and was reported to have been treated for a drug overdose a few days before his death."



**Something goes wrong**
“Submit...”
“Her husband reciprocated by saying how much he loves his wife over and over.”
“'Married at First Sight' 2017 Finale News: Decision Night Unleashes Revelations, Which One Was Surprising?”
“Email Print Img No-img Menu Whatsapp Google Reddit Digg Stumbleupon Linkedin Comment"Married at First Sight" ended season 5 with a big decision for three couples.”
“So, who among Cody and Danielle, Sheila and Nate, and Anthony and Ashley stayed together?”
“Whose revelation ended up surprising the viewers?”
“Cody and Danielle struggled with a lack of intimacy and romance in their marriage.”
“The latter made her feelings known to her husband when she said she is not sure if there is still a future for them.”
“Cody acknowledged that they can choose divorce as an option, which no longer surprised his wife.”
“Cody, however, declared that he would like to stay married as he told Dr. Pepper Schwartz on Decision Day of "Married at First Sight" season 5.”


Submit
"In return, her husband said how much he loved his wife, over and over again."
"Love at first sight marriage" 2017 finale news: what's unexpected about the revelation of "decision night"
"Email print img no img menu WhatsApp Google reddit digg stumpon LinkedIn comments' love at first sight marriage 'ends season 5 with a major decision by three couples."
"So, who lives with Cody and Danielle, Sheila and Nate, Anthony and Ashley?"
"Whose revelation surprised the audience in the end?"
"Cody and Danielle struggle with the lack of intimacy and romance in their marriage."
"The latter let her husband know how she felt, and she said she was not sure if they had a future."
Cody admitted that they could choose to divorce, which no longer surprised his wife
However, Cody told Dr. Pepper Schwartz on the decision day of the fifth season of love at first sight that he was willing to stay married



**Something goes wrong**
“For your security, we've sent a confirmation email to the address you entered.”
“Thank you!”
“It’s almost eerie how there are scenes that have an emotional resonance and a meaning, especially now.”
“Emotionally, you can’t help recontextualize it, now that she’s gone.”
““We don’t adjust what happens to her in this movie.”
““I felt very strongly that we don’t try to change her performance,” he told the New York Times in September.”
“...he didn t alter the movie at all...”
“When the credits roll a dedication to the late Fisher appears on screen In loving memory of our princess Carrie Fisher Although there were rumors that Fisher s role in The Last Jedi would be changed to account for her absence in Episode IX director Rian Johnson has said that...”
“In Leia’s final scene, she boards the Millennium Falcon with Rey (Daisy Ridley) — both seeming to know that Luke is gone — to fly off into the galaxy once again.”
“Leia gets a heartwarming reunion with her twin brother Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) — or at least his Force projection — and seems to pass the torch of leadership to Poe (Oscar Isaac).”


"For your safety, we have sent a confirmation email to the address you entered."
"Thank you
"It's almost creepy how many scenes resonate and make sense, especially now."
"Emotionally, now that she's gone, you can't help re Textualizing it."
"We don't adjust what happened to her in this movie."
"I feel very strongly that we are not trying to change her performance," he told the New York Times in September
“… He didn't change the movie at all... "
"As the subtitles roll, dedication to the late Fisher appears on the screen in memory of our princess Carrie Fisher, despite rumors that Fisher's role in the last Jedi will be changed to explain her absence in Episode 9, director Ryan Johanson said..."
"In Leia's last act, she and ray (Daisy Redley) board the Falcon - both seem to know that Luke is gone - and fly to the galaxy again."
"Leia and her twin brother Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) have a warm reunion - or at least his projection of the force - that seems to pass the torch of leadership to Poe (Oscar ISAAC)."



**Something goes wrong**
“On Thursday, they were spotted kissing again while they were out shopping with friends.”
“They’ve also reportedly moved into a new apartment together, bringing their romance to an over-the-top luxury building in Manhattan.”
“Grande, meanwhile, is weeks away from the release of her new album, Sweetener, on Aug. 17.”
“The pair have been spending time together in the Big Apple amid Davidson’s break from Saturday Night Live.”
“I think that went in one ear and out the other.”Image zoom Credit: Jawad Elatab/SplashNews.comThe newly engaged couple, who have been packing on the PDA lately, were photographed locking lips in New York City while out on a shopping trip on Friday.”
“...and Pete is a really young man...”
“I did a huge coverup adding a forest of trees Mesa told New York Post s Page Six adding After we were done I told Pete Hey dude let s just stop with the girlfriend tats until after Grande s your wife The tattoo artist continued Relationships come and go...”
“...inking of his ex girlfriend Cazzie David s face...”
“Image zoom Pete Davidson and Ariana Grande Credit Robert Kamau GC Images Robert Kamau GC Images Image zoom Pete Davidson and Ariana Grande Credit Robert Kamau GC Images Davidson also enlisted Jon Mesa a tattoo artist and co owner of Chinatown s No Idols Tattoo Shop to cover up an...”
“In June, Davidson got a tattoo of a black bunny mask, which looks similar to an accessory Grande wore on the cover art for her last album Dangerous Woman, and the initials “AG” on his hand.”


"On Thursday, they were found kissing while shopping with friends."
"It's reported that they also moved into a new apartment together, bringing their romance to a top luxury building in Manhattan."
Meanwhile, grand has a few weeks to go before the release of his new album "sweetener" on August 17
"During Davidson's Saturday night live break, the two spent time together at the big apple."
"I think it went in one ear and out the other." Image zooming source: Jawad elataB/ SplashNews.com The newly engaged couple, who have been packing on a PDA recently, were photographed with their lips locked while shopping in New York on Friday
“… Pete is really a young man... "
"I made a huge cover up and added a forest, mesa told the New York Post on page 6, adding that after we finished, I told Pete hey, man, let's stop tattooing with our girlfriend until grand's wife tattoo artist continues to come and go..."
“… The ink on his ex girlfriend Katie David's face... "
"Image zooming Peter Davidson and Ariana grand credit Robert Carmo GC image Robert Carmo GC image zooming Peter Davidson and Ariana grand credit Robert Carmo GC image Davidson also recruited tattoo artist Jon mesa and co owner of Chinatown" no idol "tattoo shop to cover up
In June this year, Davidson got a tattoo of a black rabbit mask, which looks like the accessory on the cover of grand's last album "dangerous women", with the abbreviation "Ag" on his hand



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pamper: Eva enjoyed a pampering session before revealing she is set to move into a new home as she expands her familyMassage: There she enjoyed a deep neck massage as an attendant worked on her manicure and pedicure...”
“Catching the sun The actress 42 looked healthy and happy as she enjoyed some lunch after pampering herself with a salon session in Beverly Hills Baby bump Dressing to impress the Desperate Housewives star sported a form fitting black Naked Wardrobe dress that highlighted her delicate decolletage She treated herself...”
“...up her pampering session Leggy lady Eva kept comfortable in gold flip flops as she went about her day Shopping spree She treated herself to a shopping spree at Kyle by Kyle Richards Store before heading off to the salon Posting on her story which stays active for 24 hours...”
“Elegant The actress appeared happy and relaxed as she went about her day after announcing plans to leave her Los Angeles home after 10 years Wrapped Eva kept warm from the unseasonably colder weather in Los Angeles with the long sleeve dress throwing on a casual black cardigan after finishing...”
“She took to her Instagram story this week to share a series of videos of herself inside her spacious LA home, as she revealed she was sad to be leaving her place of residence for the past decade behind as she moves on to a new family home.”
“Eva is moving out of her Los Angeles property after 10 years and preparing to move into a family home.”
“There she enjoyed a deep neck massage as an attendant worked on her manicure and pedicure.”
“...to a shopping spree at Kyle by Kyle Richards Store before heading off to the salon...”
“Making sure to keep as comfortable as possible, the mother-to-be stepped out in patterned flipflops for her casual trip out.”
“The whole house is empty.”


"Spoiled: EVA enjoyed a spoiled treatment, and then revealed that she was moving into a new home, because she expanded her family information: there, she enjoyed a deep neck massage, because a waiter was working on her nails and feet..."
"The 42 year old actress, who is basking in the sun, made a deep impression on herself at a salon in Beverly Hills. She enjoyed her lunch and looked healthy and happy. This desperate housewife star is wearing a fitting black naked wardrobe dress, highlighting her exquisite striptease towards herself. "
“… At her pampered meeting, EVA, the long legged lady, stays comfortable in her golden flip flop because she has a day of shopping spree. She asks herself to go shopping in the Kyle Richards store and then go to the salon to publish her story. Stay active 24 hours... "
The day after the actress announced her plans to leave her Los Angeles home, she was very happy and relaxed. Ten years ago, EVA was wearing a long sleeve dress and a casual black cardigan to keep warm in the abnormal cold weather in Los Angeles. After wearing her clothes, she put on a casual black cardigan... "
"This week, she shared a series of videos from her spacious home in Los Angeles on instagram, because she revealed that she was very sad to leave the place where she had lived for the past 10 years in the process of moving to her new home."
"In 10 years, EVA will move out of the Los Angeles property and be ready to move into a family home."
"There, she had a deep neck massage because a waiter was manicure her nails and feet."
“… Go shopping at Kyle Richards and then go to the Salon... "
"To stay as comfortable as possible, the mother to be went out in a patterned flip-flop and started her leisure journey."
"The whole house is empty."



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The show which will feature Olympios both in front of and behind the camera will be about dating in this millennial world we re in she divulges adding I think people just get so worked up about creating like dating pages or I feel like it just becomes such a...”
“But she is happy to share details of an upcoming scripted show, a collaboration between herself and How to Lose a Guy in 10 Days producer Christine Peters.”
“In two subsequent interviews on Good Morning America and Bachelor in Paradise, Olympios, who did not return to the show when production restarted, elaborated on her blacked-out state during the controversial hook-up, while also insisting she has no ill will toward Jackson or the show's production team.”
“As a woman, this is my worst nightmare and it has now become my reality.” While Olympios initially hired a lawyer to look into the incident, she subsequently dropped the investigation after Warner Bros.’ own found that no misconduct had occurred on set.”
““Although I have little memory of that night, something bad obviously took place, which I understand is why production on the show has now been suspended and a producer on the show has filed a complaint against the production.”
““I am a victim and have spent the last week trying to make sense of what happened on June 4,” Olympios began.”
“Rumors swirled that Olympios was perhaps too intoxicated to give her consent, a hunch that appeared to be validated by Olympios’ first public statement on the matter.”
“The dalliance in question was between Olympios and DeMario Jackson, another “villain” character from the latest Bachelorette season.”
“But according to those first reports, a sexual interaction on set had crossed the line, forcing ABC to send home the cast and crew pending further investigation.”
“Paradise, a show on which ex-Bachelor and Bachelorette contestants drink and date until Chris Harrison tells them to stop, has always been wilder than its relatively buttoned-up sister shows.”


"There's an Olympus show in front of the camera and behind the camera about dating in our millennial world," she revealed. "I think people are very interested in creating dating like websites, or I think it's becoming so
"But she's happy to share with you the details of the upcoming screenplay, her collaboration with producer Christine Peters, and how to lose a man in 10 days."
"In the two subsequent interviews with Good Morning America and singles in heaven, Olympus did not return to the show when it resumed. She elaborated on her fainting state in the controversial collusion and insisted that she had no malice against Jackson or the production team."
"As a woman, it's my worst nightmare, and now it's my reality." Although Olympus initially hired a lawyer to investigate the matter, she abandoned the investigation after Warner Brothers found out that there was no misconduct on the set
"Although I have little memory of that night, obviously something bad happened, which is why the production of the show is now suspended, and a producer of the show has complained about the production of the show."
"I'm a victim, and last week I've been trying to figure out what happened on June 4," Olympus began
"The rumor that Olympus might be too drunk to agree seems to have been confirmed by Olympus' first public statement on the matter."
The flirtation took place between olympus and demario Jackson, another villain in the latest season of bachelor
"But according to initial reports, the sex on the set has crossed the line, forcing ABC to send the actors and crew home for further investigation."
Paradise is a show where ex bachelors and bachelors drink and date until Chris Harrison tells them to stop. It's always wilder than the relatively conservative sister show



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— all ending up in the Bad Place.”
“Michael shoves Shawn through a portal before the demon can explain what he meant about the humans’ families — and Doug Forcett!”
““Like radishes?” Doug asks.”
““Eat something besides lentils,” Michael suggests.”
“Even when they assure him that he’s likely earned more than enough points to get into the Good Place, and can now lighten up a bit, he can’t conceive of how that would work.”
“But it doesn’t take long for them to see that Doug’s become “a happiness pump,” sacrificing for others unthinkingly.”
““This little guy goes right for the squeaker.”Michael and Janet — disguised as ace journalists “Michael Scoop” and “Janet … Scoop” — are initially impressed with how much Doug “gets it,” and think he could be just the man to model for humankind the way to save our souls.”
““I’ve been mauled several times,” he admits, while gesturing to a cute small dog.”
“...miserable inconsequential life eating only radishes and lentils drinking his own filtered waste and allowing himself to be pushed around by every jerk kid and stray canine that wanders onto his property...”
“As played by the masterful Michael McKean getting a chance to be funny again after his long stint as a stick in the mud on Better Call Saul Doug s the definition of virtuous to a fault Terrified of eternal damnation he s spent the past 46 years leading a...”


"All the results were bad."
"Michael pushes Sean through a portal before the devil can explain what he means by human family - and Doug Fossett!"
"Like radish? "Asked Doug
"Eat something other than lentils," Michael suggested
"Even if they assured him that he'd probably earned enough points to get into a good position and that it would be easier now, he couldn't imagine how that would work."
"But it wasn't long before they saw Doug become a" happiness pump "and sacrifice for others without thinking about it."
Michael and Janet disguised as "Michael scupper" and "Janet At first, he was deeply impressed by the extent to which Doug "got" and thought that he might be a model for human beings to save the soul
"I've been beaten several times," he admitted, gesturing to a cute puppy
“…… Miserable and insignificant life, only eating radish and lentils, drinking their own filtered garbage, and being pushed back and forth by every bastard child and stray dog who wanders to their own home.... "
"As the master Michael McCann plays, after his long struggle in the mud, he has another chance to become funny. This is Saul Doug's definition of virtue. He is afraid of eternal curse. For the past 46 years, he has led a..."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“‘I think we're even closer now because Kourtney and I, even if we don't disagree on some parenting tips, we'll discuss them thoroughly and we respect each other's rules, but we pick up the slack for each other too,’ she continued.”
“In an interview with E!”
“News yesterday afternoon at a KKW Beauty fan event, the 37-year-old - who is already a mother to children North, Saint and Chicago - opened up about asking for help and guidance from first-time mother Kylie.”
“‘Lately, it's been Kylie,’ she said when questioned who she goes to for advice on being a new mum.”
“‘Kylie is up on all the new gadgets and the new baby stuff.’This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“However, the make-up mogul was quick to praise sister Khloé, who also became a new mum to baby True Thompson in May.”
“‘But Khloe and I probably have the most similar parenting style and I will usually go to one of my best friends Larsa Pippen because she has four kids for mom advice,’ she added.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"I think we're closer now because kurtany and I, even if we don't disagree on some parenting proposals, we'll have a thorough discussion, we respect each other's rules, but we'll make up for each other," she continued
"Accepting e!"
"Yesterday afternoon, at an activity for kkw beauty fans, the 37 year old girl, who is already the mother of children in North holy city and Chicago, asked her first love mother Kelly for help and guidance."
"Recently, it's Kelly," she said when asked who she went to for advice on becoming a new mother
"Kelly is developing all the new things and baby products. This content was imported from instagram. "
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"However, the make-up tycoon quickly praised sister Heroe, who became the mother of real Thompson in May this year."
"But Chloe and I probably have the most similar parenting style. I usually go to my best friend, Lasha Pippen, because she has four children and can ask her mother for advice," she added
"This content was imported from instagram."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“The 23rd Annual Critics Choice Awards will air on the CW Thursday, January 11, at 8 p.m.”
“Meanwhile, Patrick and fellow race car driver Ricky Stenhouse Jr. called it quits on their five-year relationship in December 2017.”
“According to an insider, the duo ended their romance due to tension the model had with the quarterback’s family.”
“As previously reported, Rodgers and Munn split in April 2017 after three years together.”
“It’s early but they are really hitting it off.”A source also claimed to Us Weekly that the two athletes are dating.”
““This is on the extreme down low, as they both want to keep this quiet for now.”
““Danica and Aaron were all over each other, kissing and couldn’t seem to keep their hands off each other,” an eyewitness claimed to the site, noting that the NFL pro and the NASCAR driver had dinner together after Christmas at his favorite restaurant, Chives, in Green Bay, Wisconsin.”
“The news comes one day after the sports gossip blog Terez Owens reported that the Office Christmas Party star’s ex Rodgers, 34, was spotted on a date with Patrick, 35.”
“The following month, she penned a candid essay for Entertainment Weekly about the “abuse of power” in Hollywood and expressed her staunch support for the “#MeToo” movement.”


"Wait a minute."
"The 23rd annual critic's Choice Award will be broadcast on CW TV station at 8pm on Thursday, January 11."
"Meanwhile, Patrick and Racer Ricky Stenhouse Jr. announced the end of their five-year relationship in December 2017."
"According to people familiar with the matter, the two ended their relationship because of the tension between the model and the quarterback's family."
"As mentioned earlier, Rogers and Munn broke up in April 2017 after three years together."
"It's still early, but they really hit it off." A source also told us weekly that the two athletes were dating
"It's at an extremely low level because they all want to remain silent for the moment."
"Danica and Allen are together, kissing each other, and they can't seem to get their hands off each other," a witness told the website, noting that the NFL professional and the National Motor Racing Association driver had dinner after Christmas at his favorite shallot restaurant in Green Bay, Wisconsin
The day before, Terez Owens, a sports gossip blog, reported that the 34 year old former Rodgers, the office Christmas party star, had been found dating 35 year old Patrick
The following month, she wrote a frank article for entertainment weekly about Hollywood's "abuse of power" and expressed her strong support for the "meto" movement



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the trailer above.”
“The Magic School Bus Rides Again premieres exclusively on Netflix on September 29.”
“And along the way, the kids bring their science investigations into the 21st century.”
“Field trips this year are wilder than ever, into the clouds, across the Internet, riding the continents – even a plunge into the depths of the sun itself.”
“Fiona is the younger sister of the famed Professor Frizzle and she has taken over the classroom.”
“The song is featured in the new trailer, along with Tomlin’s Ms Frizzle (now Professor Frizzle) and Kate McKinnon as Fiona Frizzle.”
“The Hamilton phenom and multi-Tony winner Miranda is the voice of the classic theme song for The Magic School Bus Rides Again.”
“Lily Tomlin also is set to reprise her role from the original series, which aired on PBS.”
“The Magic School Bus theme song is getting a make-over for Netflix’s revival of the 1990s’ kids series, thanks to Lin-Manuel Miranda.”


"Look at the trailer up there."
"On September 29, magic school bus premiered exclusively on Netflix again."
"Along the way, children have brought their scientific research into the 21st century."
"This year's field trips are more crazy than ever, going deep into the clouds, across the Internet, riding on continents - even deep into the sun itself."
"Fiona, the sister of the famous professor Frith, has taken over the classroom."
The song is in a new trailer, Ms. frizzle of Tomlin (now professor frizzle) and Kate McKinnon is Fiona frizzle.
"Hamilton phenomenon and duotoni award winner Miranda is the voice of magic school bus riding on the classic theme song."
"Lily Tomlin will also play her part in the original PBS series."
"Thanks to lynmanuel Miranda, this amazing school bus theme song is now a cover for Netflix to revive the children's series of the 1990s."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED STORIESAnthony Bourdain, as Remembered by Friends and Colleagues: See the PhotosAsia Argento Denies Allegations Against Her, Says It Was Anthony Bourdain's Idea to Pay Off AccuserRestaurant CEO Who Knew Anthony Bourdain Donates Earnings to Suicide Hotline...”
““We wish we were there to shoot it with him, and he really would have written the hell out of that episode."”
“"He’s really off on a journey to parts unknown," Tengalia added in her speech.”
“Only the first episodes will include Bourdain's narration, as the rest had not been completed before his death.”
“CNN announced the last season of the travel show will premiere on Sept. 23, and will include five episodes of Bourdain’s travels to Kenya, Indonesia, West Texas, Spain and New York City’s Lower East Side, plus two additional episodes to honor the host.”
“His body was discovered by close friend and fellow chef, Éric Ripert, with whom he had been traveling for “Parts Unknown.” His cause of death was ruled a suicide.”
“Bourdain was found dead in a French hotel room on June 8.”
“"Tony was nominated for this Emmy many times, but it had always eluded him, the one he had always coveted, so it is with tremendous bittersweetness that I accept it on his behalf," Bourdain's producer, Lydia Tenaglia, said onstage as she clutched the writing trophy.”
“His shows, “Anthony Bourdain: Parts Unknown” and its digital spinoff “Anthony Bourdain: Explore Parts Unknown” earned additional trophies for best informational series or special, picture editing for a non-fiction program, sound editing for a non-fiction program and sound mixing for a non-fiction program.”
“The celebrity chef and food journalist was posthumously honored with Emmys for outstanding writing for a nonfiction program and outstanding informational series or special.”


"The related story of Antony buldan, as friends and colleagues remember: see the photo of Asian Argento denying the charges against her, saying it was Antony buldan's idea to pay the plaintiff's CEO who knew Antony buldan donated money to the suicide Hotline..."
"We wish we could do it with him. He'll really make a mess of that episode."
"He's really going to travel in the unknown," tenggalia added in his speech
"Only the first episode will include bourdin's narrative, because the rest is not finished before he dies."
Last season's travel show, which premiered on September 23, will include five episodes of Bourdon's trip to Kenya, Indonesia, West Texas, Spain and the lower east side of New York, and two more episodes to pay homage to the host, CNN announced
His body was found by his close friend and chef colleague, Eric Ripert, who traveled with him to the "unknown part.". His death was determined to be suicide
"On June 8, bourdin was found dead in a room in a French hotel."
"Tony has been nominated for Emmy many times, but he has never been the one he has been coveting, so I accepted the nomination on behalf of him with great bitterness and joy," buldan producer Lydia tenaglia said as she gripped the writing trophy on stage
His program "Anthony boldan: the unknown" and its digital derivative "Anthony boldan: exploring the unknown" won the additional trophies of the best information series or special programs, picture editing of non fiction programs, sound editing of non fiction programs and sound mixing of non fiction programs
"The famous chef and food journalist won an Emmy Award for his excellent writing in non fiction programs and excellent information series or special programs."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more in the video below.”
“I'm sorry for any inconvenience this causes, but hope everyone who sees the show will agree it was worth the wait."”
““I’ll be spending the next few weeks taking the time to properly prepare the show to be an experience I am proud to share with you.”
“"Due to unavoidable production delays, major elements of my tour stage design could not be available for me to rehearse on until this week,” Perry said in a statement at the time.”
“(@Stevies_Wonder) September 20, 2017RELATED: Katy Perry Spends Labor Day With Ex-Boyfriend Orlando BloomPerry's tour was originally supposed to start on Sept. 7 in Columbus, Ohio, but was pushed back last month due to "production delays."”
“...pic.twitter.com/wqNALbsUYV — VP Is A Howard Grad.”
“Katy Perry covering Janet's "What Have You Done For Me Lately" on her [current] Witness Tour.”
“Perry, who performs 20 of her greatest hits and six different costume changes during the show, donned a black-and-white number as she put her best spin on Jackson's choreography from her performance of the song at the 1987 GRAMMY awards.”
“The 32-year-old singer covered Jackson's 1986 classic, "What Have You Done for Me Lately," during Tuesday's opening night of Witness: The Tour in Montreal.”
“What has Katy Perry done for Janet Jackson lately?”


"Please see more in the video below."
"I'm sorry for any inconvenience, but I hope everyone who has seen the show agrees that it's worth waiting for."
"In the next few weeks, I'll take the time to prepare for the show and I'm proud to share it with you."
"Due to inevitable production delays, the main elements of my tour stage design will not be available for me to rehearse until this week," Perry said in a statement at the time
（@Stevies_ (wonder) September 20, 2017: Katie Perry and her ex boyfriend Orlando bloomperry spent labor day together. Perry's tour was originally scheduled to start in Columbus, Ohio on September 7, but it was delayed last month due to "production delay"
“... pic.twitter.com/wqNALbsUYV -The vice president is a Howard graduate. "
"Katy Perry reports on Janet's" what have you recently done for me "during her (current) witness tour."
Perry performed 20 of her most popular songs and changed six different costumes. She performed the song at the 1987 Grammy Awards ceremony, making her best contribution to Jackson's choreography
The 32 year old singer reported on Jackson's 1986 classic "what have you done for me lately" on Tuesday's premiere night of witness: a trip to Montreal
"What did Katie Perry do for Janet Jackson recently?"



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The reason why is because they want something unrealistic.”Watch Dr. Dubrow talk about the most botched surgery he’s ever come across.”
“In fact, 30 percent of my patients who sat down yesterday,” Dr. Nassif said.”
““Many times.”
“Outside of their show, the surgeons admitted they don’t always agree to treat potential patients, and regularly turn people away if they’re not good candidates.”
“...transplanted onto her eyebrows...”
“The doctors said they also had to treat a man who had most of his nose bitten off by a dog while the most bizarre case of the series goes to the first ever woman to get her pubic hair...”
““So she went home on his advice and stabbed her breasts, and it turned into a giant disaster.”
“...rupture them the implant company will pay...”
“This season on Botched I had a patient who had a really bad breast problem and didn t have enough money to have it fixed so the plastic surgeon said Well if you go home and stab your implants and...”
“But basically it meant that she couldn’t eat normal food.”Dr. Dubrow said his was a female patient who’d stabbed her own breast implants on the advice of a surgeon.”


"The reason is that they want something unrealistic." Watching Dr. dubro talk about the worst surgery he's ever had
"In fact, 30% of my patients sat down yesterday," Dr. nasif said
"Many times."
"Outside of their show, surgeons admit that they don't always agree to treat potential patients, and they often turn them away if they're not good candidates."
“… To her eyebrows... "
"Doctors said they had to treat a man who had been bitten off most of his nose by a dog, and the strangest case in the series was the first woman to get pubic hair..."
"So she took his advice and went home, stabbed herself in the chest, and it turned out to be a huge disaster."
“… Take them apart and the company will pay... "
"This season I had a patient with a very serious breast problem and didn't have enough money to fix it, so the plastic surgeon said if you go home and stab your implant and
"But basically, it means she can't eat normal food." Dr. dubro said he was a female patient who had stabbed her breast augmentation on the advice of a surgeon



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GETTY Prince Harry married Meghan Markle in a stunning Royal Wedding ceremony at St George’s Chapel...”
“...you probably do need somebody s permission to wear your old uniform Historian Hugo Vickers It is understood that the permission covered the fact that Harry has a beard...”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“We will use your email address only for sending you newsletters.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“Prince Harry was given special permission from the Queen to sport facial hair while wearing uniform.”
“It is customary to be clean-shaven when dressed in Army uniform.”
“Both the newly-appointed Duke of Sussex and the Duke of Cambridge wore the frockcoat uniform of the Blues and Royals during Harry's wedding to former Hollywood actress Meghan.”
“In a statement, Kensington Palace said: "Her Majesty The Queen gave her permission for Prince Harry to get married in his uniform."”
“GETTY REUTERS Queen granted Prince Harry special permission to sport a beard while wearing uniform REUTERS After leaving the Army in 2015 Prince Harry was promoted to the rank of major I think if you ve retired from the Army...”


"Prince Getty Harry and Megan Marcel had a wonderful royal wedding at St. George's Church..."
“…… Putting on your old uniform may actually require someone's permission, which historian Hugo Vickers understands to cover the fact that Harry has a beard... "
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"We will only use your email address to send you a press release."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"When Prince Harry is in uniform, he has special permission from the queen to comb his hair on his face."
"It's customary to shave when you're in uniform."
"At Harry's wedding to former Hollywood actress Megan, the new Duke of Sussex and the Duke of Cambridge are both wearing blue army and royal tuxedos."
"Her Majesty allows Prince Harry to marry in uniform," Kensington Palace said in a statement
"Queen Getty Reuters has granted Prince Harry special permission to grow a beard while wearing his uniform. After leaving the army in 2015, Prince Harry was promoted to major. I think if you have retired..."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While celebrating Kylie Jenner‘s 21st birthday last week, Khloé Kardashian shared a video of her newly single sister sitting next to Disick at the birthday bash.”
“She cut him off.”
“PEOPLE confirmed earlier this month that Kardashian, 39, and Younes Bendjima, 25, had called it quits.”
“Now, a source tells PEOPLE Disick “hated Younes” and is “happy things are over.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Seeing Kourtney date Younes definitely played into his partying,” said the source of Disick, 35, who initially reacted to Kardashian and Bendjima’s blossoming romance with tit-for-tat trysts in Cannes last year.”
““He’s never gotten over her and was really hoping to get her back when she first started dating Younes,” the source adds.”
“Of course, Disick has been dating 19-year-old Sofia Richie since the fall — but according to the source, he would “get back together with Kourtney in a heartbeat.”“Sofia makes him happy but they are also very on and off,” the source says.”
““It wouldn’t be surprising if Scott tried to pursue things again with Kourtney down the line.”But a second source tells PEOPLE that Kardashian is “happy being single for now.”“Kourtney is doing great,” the source says.”
““She isn’t seeing Younes.”
“After all the drama with Scott over the years, she wasn’t going to put up with any drama from Younes.”


"Last week, in celebration of Kelly Jenner's 21st birthday, Carol Kardashian shared a video of her newly single sister sitting next to Disick at a birthday party."
"She interrupted him."
"It was confirmed earlier this month that Kardashian, 39, and Eugene benjima, 25, had announced their separation."
Now, a source tells people that disc "hates younes" and "the happy thing is over.". Get push notification of news, functions, etc
"Seeing Courtney's date, yones is sure to go to his party," said a source for 35 year old Disick, who initially responded to the romance of Kardashian and benjima's tit for tat tryst in Cannes last year
"He never forgot her, and when she first dated younes, he really wanted her back," the source added
"Of course, Disick has been dating 19-year-old Sophia Ritchie since the fall - but according to sources, he will" get back together with kurtany right away. " "Sofia made him happy, but they were also intermittent," the source said
"It's no surprise if Scott tries to pursue a career with Courtney again." But another source told people that Kardashian "is happy to be single now." "Courtney did a good job," the source said
"She didn't see you."
"She and Scott have been having a lot of trouble over the years, but she won't tolerate any of yones's farces."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She said: “I think I look more like Bella.””
“And she actually thinks she has a different look-a-like altogether.”
“...successful model Iza says that she can only see it herself when she has her hair tied back in a ponytail...”
“When I signed with MiLK they posted a picture with the caption The new curvy Gigi Hadid so that s the moment I realized it might be true Although many people can t believe how similar she looks to the...”
“Speaking to Refinery 29, Iza confessed: “The first time someone mentioned it was on Instagram.”
“Iza has been getting a lot of attention for her Hadid-like look since her modeling images for body confidence swimwear company Alpine Butterfly were released, but the first comments were made a while ago.”
“Aside from being the same age, Gigi is also half-Dutch, as her mum Yolanda hails from the small town of Papendrecht.”
“Similarities for the photogenic pair are not just surface level.”
“Fans have been commenting how Iza has Gigi’s trademark full lips, high arched eyebrows, blonde hair and penchant for posing with sunglasses pushed halfway down her nose.”
“Iza IJzerman, 22, works as a model and a blogger in the Netherlands and bears an uncanny resemblance to the Victoria Secret model.”


"I feel more like Bella," she said
"She actually thinks she looks totally different."
“…… Yiza, a successful model, said that she could only see her hair in a ponytail... "
"When I signed up with milk, they posted a picture with the new curvilinear Gigi Hadid on it, so at that moment, I realized that it might be true, even though many people couldn't believe how much she looked like..."
"The first time someone mentioned it was on instagram," IZA admitted in an interview with refinery 29
"IZA's Hadid look has been in the spotlight since the release of her model image for body confidence swimsuit company Alpine butterfly, but the first comments were made not long ago."
"Besides her age, Gigi is semi Dutch because her mother, Yolanda, is from the town of papendrecht."
"The similarities between the two pairs are not just superficial."
"Fans have been commenting on how IZA has Gigi's iconic plump lips, high arched eyebrows, blonde hair and likes to pose in sunglasses."
"IZA ijzerman, 22, works as a model and blogger in the Netherlands and has incredible similarities with Victoria's Secret model."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FROM PEN: Grammy News and Notes: Album of the Year Nominees...”
““When the post game makes you forget about what happened during the actual game,” he captioned a sweet Instagram photo of them together.”
“Could they be the perfect couple?”
“Drake Brings Rosalyn Gold-Onwude to NBA Awards: What to Know About His Latest DateDrake handled the hosting duties Monday night during the first annual NBA Awards, but he very well might have been upstaged by his date!”
“The “No Complaints” rapper, 30, arrived at New York City’s Pier 34 alongside Rosalyn “Ros” Gold-Onwude, an NBA sideline reporter most recently with the Golden State Warriors.”
“Drake made the scene in a black and white Tom Ford tuxedo, while Gold-Onwude, 30, opted for a strapless cherry-red gown, nude heels, and a gold clutch.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“While it remains to be seen whether or not the supremely photogenic pair are an item or just hoop-loving pals, here’s everything you should know about Drake’s NBA Awards date.”
“She’s an Ivy LeaguerOriginally from Queens, New York, Gold-Onwude won two basketball state titles while attending Christ the King High School.”
“Her skills netted her a basketball scholarship to California’s Stanford University, where she was named Pac 10 Defensive Player of the Year and made three trips to the Final Four.”


"From pen: Grammy news and notes: album of the year nominations..."
He posted a sweet picture of them together on instagram, which read: "when the game is over, you forget what happened in the actual game."
"Will they be the perfect couple?"
Drake brought Rosalyn gold to the NBA awards ceremony: what do you know about his latest date? Drake presided over the first NBA annual awards ceremony on Monday night, but he was probably robbed of the limelight by his date
The 30-year-old rapper arrived at pier 34 in New York City, alongside Rosalyn "ROS" gold onwude, who recently worked as an NBA sideline reporter for the Golden State Warriors
"Drake appeared in a black and white Tom Ford evening dress, while 30-year-old gold onwude chose a strapless cherry red robe, nude heels and a gold clutch."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Although it remains to be seen whether this pair of super photographed partners are a sport or just friends who like basketball, here's everything you should know about Drake's NBA award date."
"She's a member of the Ivy League. She's from Queens, New York. When she went to King of Christ high school, she won the state basketball championship twice."
Her skills earned her a basketball scholarship from Stanford University in California, where she was named PAC 10 defensive player of the year and made it to the top four three times



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Bye, Felicia!”
“Asiah is a bit disappointed because Naz and Lola Monroe are the mediators amongst the crew and she has a strong feeling she will need their help just in case the ladies get out of control.”
“Can the girls vow to have a good time on their trip and leave the drama behind in Los Angeles?”
“Things go south of the border after Asiah invites this spicy group to support her at a very important photoshoot campaign in Mexico.”
“Check out the top highlights of episode seven below.”
“Nazanin Mandi and Lola Monroe cancel on the girls’ tripAsiah Collins, model, and wife of Kid Ink, invites all the girls to Cancun.”
“However, Nazanin Mandi has to withdraw her RSVP.”
“After pushing back her nuptials to R&B crooner, Miguel she chooses to focus on the completion her own upcoming EP.”
“Lola Monroe also chooses to secure the bag over the girls’ trip.”
“She stays behind to work on her music project and listening party that she has to put together for media and record executives—it’s the beginning of her comeback.”


"Good bye, Felicia!"
"Assia is a bit disappointed because natz and Lola Monroe are the mediators on the set, and she feels strongly that she needs their help in case the ladies get out of control."
"Can the girls swear to have a good time on the journey and stay in Los Angeles?"
"After Assia invited the spice girls to support her at a very important photography event in Mexico, things got worse."
"Take a look at the highlights of episode seven."
"Nazarin Mandy and Lola Monroe canceled the girls' tripathia Collins, the model, the child's wife, and invited all the girls to Cancun."
"However, Nazarin Mandy has to withdraw her RSVP."
"After postponing the wedding to the R & B singer, Miguel chose to focus on his upcoming EP."
"Lola Monroe also chose to protect her bags during the girls' journey."
"She stayed to work on her own music projects and concerts, and she had to prepare for the media and record company executives, which was the beginning of her comeback."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As the tennis court champion concluded, "Your youngest of five, Serena."”
“...of drugs...”
“After giving birth to her first child daughter Alexis Olympia Ohanian Jr earlier this month the tennis pro has penned a heartwarming letter to her own mom about what it has been like to see life through through her point...”
“...of view...”
“"You are one of the strongest women I know," she began to Oracene Price in a letter published on The Washington Post's website.”
“As the letter continued, Williams described the early physical likeness between her and her newborn.”
“"She has my arms and legs!”
“My exact same strong, muscular, powerful, sensational arms and body," the athlete continues.”
“"I don't know how I would react if she has to go through what I've gone through since I was a 15 year old and even to this day."”
“Serena Williams Best Quotes on Motherhood As the tone of the letter shifted Williams recalled the times she was likened to a man because of her strong stature or false accusations that her performance on the court was the result...”


As the tennis champion concluded, "the youngest of your five kids, Serena."
“… Drugs... "
"After giving birth to her first daughter, Alexis Olympia Ohanian, earlier this month, the tennis professional wrote a warm letter to her mother, telling her how she felt about looking at life from her own point of view..."
“… Vision... "
"You're one of the strongest women I know," she began to tell price in a letter posted on the Washington Post website
In the letter, Williams described her early appearance with her newborn
"She has my arms and legs!"
"I'm also strong, muscular, strong, with a feeling arm and body," the athlete continued
"I don't know how I would react if she had to go through what I've been through since I was 15."
"Serena Williams quoted the best quote about motherhood when she changed the tone of her letter. Williams recalled that she had been compared to a man because of her strong figure, or someone had framed her performance on the court as such..."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Tiffany Haddish Explains How to Take a Selfie With Beyoncé...”
“A good night indeed.”
“(Photo by Kevin Winter/Getty Images) Kevin WinterAside from delivering a hilarious commentary on #OscarsSoWhite with Rudolph, Haddish also made headlines at the Oscars for curtseying before Meryl Streep, as one does, and asking the legendary actress to play her mother in the sequel to Girls Trip.”
“HOLLYWOOD, CA - MARCH 04: Actors Tiffany Haddish (L) and Maya Rudolph speak onstage during the 90th Annual Academy Awards at the Dolby Theatre at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4, 2018 in Hollywood, California.”
“As Haddish said on SNL: “I feel like I should be able to wear what I want, when I want, however many times I want, as long as I Febreze it.” Preach.”
“Oh, and this time around, she accessorized with Uggs.”
“(Photo by Jason LaVeris/FilmMagic) Jason LaVerisHey, what could be more special than Hollywood's biggest night?”
“LOS ANGELES, CA - JULY 13: Actress Tiffany Haddish attends the premiere of "Girls Trip" at Regal LA Live Stadium 14 on July 13, 2017 in Los Angeles, California.”
“But if you thought that would be the last time you saw the dress, you'd be wrong: Haddish chose to wear the halter-top dress once again to hand out the Oscar for Best Animated/Live Action Short with Maya Rudolph at the 2018 Academy Awards.”
“SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE -- Episode 1730 -- Pictured: Host Tiffany Haddish during the Opening Monologue in Studio 8H on Saturday, November 11, 2017 -- (Photo by: Will Heath/NBC/NBCU Photo Bank via Getty Images) NBCSo, she donned the Alexander McQueen number to appear on SNL.”


"Related report: Tiffany hadish explains how to take a selfie with Beyonce..."
"What a good night."
(Kevin winter / Getty pictures) in addition to making a funny comment about the Oscars with Rudolph, hadish also made the headlines for cursing in front of Meryl Streep. He invited the legendary actress to play her mother in the sequel of "journey of girls."
"Hollywood, California - March 4: Actors Tiffany hadish (left) and Maya Rudolph speak at the 90th Academy Awards ceremony at the Dolby theatre in Hollywood and Highland Center, Hollywood, California, on March 4, 2018."
As hadish said on SNL, "I think I should be able to wear what I want, no matter when I want to wear it, no matter how many times I want to wear it, as long as I can wear it."
"Oh, this time, she made accessories with uggs."
(Jason lavillis / movie magic) Jason lavish, what's more special than the biggest night in Hollywood
"Los Angeles, California - July 13: actress Tiffany hardish attends the premiere of" journey to girls "in Los Angeles, California on July 13, 2017."
"But if you think that's the last time you'll see this dress, you're wrong: hadish again chose to wear a halter top to present the best animated / live action Oscar with Maya Rudolph at the 2018 Oscars."
"Live on Saturday night - episode 1730 - host Tiffany hadish's opening monologue in 8h studio on Saturday, November 11, 2017 -- (photo: will heath / NBC / nbcu Photo Gallery via Getty Images) NBCSO, she appears on SNL wearing Alexander McQueen's number."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“And now we know that it was Kylie Jenner who told Khloé Kardashian the shocking news.”
“In a new teaser clip for the next episode, Kendall, Kourtney, Kim, Kylie and Scott Disick react to the cheating allegations, with Kim telling producers, “there’s a video of Tristan making out with a girl last night.”
“Khloe’s gonna die.”
“She’s literally going to go into labour over this”.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Though none of the sisters are together when the news breaks, they share messages with each other to piece together what’s happened.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Now we know it was Kelly Jenner who told Kardashian the shocking news."
"In a new tease clip in the next episode, Kendall, Courtney, Kim, Kelly and Scott Disick respond to the charges of cheating, and Kim tells the producer," there was a video of Tristan making out with a girl last night. "
"Chloe will die."
"She's really going to give birth to this."
This content was imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Although the two sisters were not together when the news came out, they shared information with each other and pieced together what happened."
"This content was imported from YouTube."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mendes shut down rumors that he was dating Camila Cabello in March.”
“The fashion model previously dated Justin Bieber and was linked to Drake in 2016.”
“They meet up whenever they’re in the same city, FaceTime a lot and text each other several times a day.”The duo were also openly affectionate at the Halloween party she hosted with Kendall Jenner and Justine Skye at Delilah in West Hollywood on October 31.”
““They were hanging out at Rita Ora’s afterparty, making out with each other and they went home together.”The insider added, “Hailey is really into Shawn and thinks he is the nicest, sweetest guy.”
““Hailey and Shawn are really dating,” the source said.”
““It’s pretty casual because of the distance but they are definitely dating.”It’s still unclear when they got together, but a source told Us in November that the “Treat You Better” singer, 19, and Baldwin, 21, were cozy at the 2017 MTV Europe Music Awards.”
““Hailey and Shawn are still dating, but they live on opposite sides of the country,” the insider tells Us.”
“SHAWN MENDES AND HAILEY BALDWIN IN TORONTO pic.twitter.com/8vpivNVNdZ — sarah (@sarahelizabth13) December 21, 2017Although the new couple has been spending the week together, a source tells Us Weekly that they are dating, but it’s not serious yet.”
“Twitter user @sarahelizabth13 shared the photos of the moment on her account, including a selfie she took with the “Stitches” singer and other snaps she took of the pair walking together.”
“A fan spotted the pair while they were at the Toronto Christmas Market on Thursday, December 21.”


"Mendes dismissed the rumor that he was dating Camilla Cabello in March."
"The fashion model was dating Justin Bieber and was in touch with Drake in 2016."
On October 31, in Hollywood West, Delilah held a Halloween party with Kendall Jenner and Justin skey, and they also expressed their deep love
"They went out after Rita ora's party, made out, and went home together." "Haley really likes Sean and thinks he's the most amiable person," the person familiar with the matter added
"Haley and Sean are really dating," the source said
"It's casual because it's too far away, but they must be dating." It's not clear when they got together, but a source told us in November that the 19-year-old "kind to you" singer and 21-year-old Baldwin were very happy at the 2017 MTV European music awards
"Haley and Sean are still dating, but they live on the other side of the country," the source told us
Sean Mendes and Haley Baldwin in Toronto pic.twitter.com/8vpivNVNdZ -Sarah (@ sarahelizabth13) December 21, 2017 although the couple have been together for a week, a source told us that they are dating, but it is not serious. "
Twitter user @ sarahelizabth13 shared photos of the time on her account, including her selfie with the "sew up" singer and other photos she took of the two walking together
A fan discovers the couple at the Toronto Christmas fair on Thursday, December 21



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“During his concert at the Oracle Arena in Oakland, California, on Saturday, the 48-year-old rapper put an extra special smile on the face of one female superfan in the audience -- two-time cancer survivor Christina Cruz.”
“Jay-Z stopped his show after noticing Cruz's glittering sign, which read, "I Beat Cancer 2X 2 C U!”
“I LOVE U!!!”
“SELFIE OR HUG?"”
“As soon as he saw it, he invited Cruz to join him onstage.”
“"You beat cancer twice, I gotta give you at least a hug," he exclaimed.”
“"You must know, you beat cancer twice, you can do anything.”
“In those dark times, you just remember to smile.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"On Saturday, the 48 year old rapper gave a special smile on the face of a female super fan in the audience at the Oracle arena in Oakland, California - twice cancer survivor Christina Cruz."
Jay-Z stopped his performance after noticing Cruz's flashing logo, which said, "I beat cancer 2x2cu!"
"I love you!"
"Selfie or hug?"
"As soon as he saw it, he invited Cruz to come on stage with him."
"You've conquered cancer twice, and I'll at least give you a hug," he cried
"You must know that if you beat cancer twice, you can do anything."
"In those dark times, you just remember to smile."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Burke and her first husband, Garth Fisher, are parents to daughter Neriah, 18, and Sierra Sky, 16.”
“They share two children together, daughter Heaven Rain, 11, and son Shaya Braven, 10.”
“Burke and Charvet started dating in 2006 and tied the knot in August 2011.”
“...a loving family together...”
“It took me a long time to differentiate between giving up and letting go and even longer to recognize when it was time to do so The author noted that nothing sensational or scandalous contributed to the breakup and the former couple are committed to finding new ways to remain...”
“She wrote about the split on her ModernMoms blog three days later, admitting that she is “deeply saddened” by the separation “because I loved being married.”
“...alum: “It’s easier said than done, ask me in six months or so, but I’m not taking [the baggage] with me.”Burke filed for divorce from the Melrose Place star, 45, on April 6 after six years of marriage.”
“...the Wild On...”
“But my goal and my prayer is to move forward with an open heart and to take beautiful memories and to learn from the challenges that I faced and not to bring all the baggage which is mine and pass it on to someone else whenever that day comes Added...”
“I mean, you know, I just recently filed for divorce so this is all very fresh and vulnerable for me,” Burke revealed.”


Burke and her first husband, Garth Fisher, are the parents of 18-year-old daughter neria and 16-year-old selasky
"They have two children, 11-year-old daughter Tianyu and 10-year-old son Shaya Bravin."
"Burke and chavette started dating in 2006 and got married in August 2011."
“… A loving family together... "
"It took me a long time to distinguish between giving up and letting go, and even longer to realize when to give up. The author points out that there is no element of sensationalism or scandal in the breakup, and the former couple are committed to finding new ways to keep it up.... "
Three days later, she wrote about the breakup on her blog, modern moms, admitting that she was "deeply saddened" by the breakup, "because I like to get married."
“…… Alum: "it's easier said than done. Ask me about it in about six months, but I don't take it." After six years of marriage, Burke filed for divorce with the 45 year old Melrose square star on April 6
“… The wilderness is... "
"But my goal and prayer is to move forward with an open heart, take away the good memories and learn from the challenges I face, instead of bringing all my burdens to others, no matter when that day comes..."
"I mean, you know, I just filed for divorce recently, so it's all fresh and fragile for me," Burke revealed



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"We will see Kristin push herself as a boss of a new and expanding brand while combating the pressure to succeed.”
“The former Hills star and her husband, Jay Cutler, are starring in a new unscripted series, Very Cavallari.”
“And although we'll have to wait a few more months to see it, the 31-year-old fashion designer shared the first official sneak peek of what's to come via Instagram on Thursday.”
“"Ahhh!!”
“Here it is!”
“Your exclusive sneak peek at my new show #VeryCavallari coming to E!”
“...this summer," the Laguna Beach alum captioned the teaser video.”
“"Don't forget to follow @verycavallari and stay tuned for more!"”
“E!”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"We will see Christine fight the pressure of success and push herself to become the boss of a new and expanding brand."
"The former hills star and her husband, Jay Cutler, are starring in a new screenless series, very cavalari."
"Although we'll have to wait a few months to see it, the 31 year old fashion designer shared his first official peek on instagram on Thursday."
"Aha!"
"Here it is
"You're the only one watching my new show, verycavallari
"This summer," Laguna Beach alumni wrote in the video
"Don't forget to follow @ verycavallari, keep following more!"
“E！”



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“(h/t ABC News)This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“In honor of the anniversary this past weekend, some of the animated classic's stars reminisced on social media.”
“Scott Weinger, the voice of Aladdin, took to Twitter to melt our hearts with a message to Jasmine (Linda Larkin).”
“"Hey Princess @MissLindaLarkin can you believe #Aladdin was released 25 years ago today?"”
“...he wrote.”
“"I'd lie to you about being a prince just to fly you around the world on a Magic Carpet all over again."”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Hey Princess @MissLindaLarkin can you believe #Aladdin was released 25 years ago today?”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"(H / T ABC News) this content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their e-mail address."
"Last weekend, in order to commemorate the anniversary, some of the cartoon's stars made reminiscences on social media."
"Aladdin's voice Scott Weinger sends a message to Jasmine (Linda Larkin) on twitter, which melts our hearts."
"Hey, Princess @ misslin dalkin, can you believe that Aladdin was released 25 years ago today?"
“…… He wrote
"I'll lie to you that I'm a prince, just to make you fly all over the world on the magic carpet."
"This content was imported from twitter."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Hi, Princess @ misslin dalkin, can you believe that Aladdin was released 25 years ago today?"



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"When We're Together" MenzelBellGadGroff 2:50 7.”
“"That Time of Year" (Reprise) Gad 0:52 6.”
“After Elsa and Anna had been isolated from each other, the latter began annually sliding cards and dolls of Olaf under the former’s door.”
“Anna and Elsa find Olaf and cheer him up by revealing that they do have a tradition: Himself.”
“Elsewhere, Olaf manages to escape the wolves, but loses the fruit cake to a hawk and gives up by a tree not too far from the kingdom.”
“They gather the residents of Arendelle to go look for Olaf.”
“Sven returns to Kristoff and informs him (in vain), Anna, and Elsa of Olaf's plight.”
“Meanwhile, Anna and Elsa discover some forgotten items in their attic.”
“With only a fruit cake, Olaf attempts to travel through the woods and is attacked by wolves.”
“They slide down a hill and Olaf and Sven end up separated by a chasm.”


"When we're together" Menzel bergaggrove 2-507
"That time of the year" (Reprint) GAD 0:526
After Elsa and Anna were quarantined, Anna began to slide Olaf's cards and dolls under her door every year
"Anna and Elsa find Olaf and tell him they have a tradition: himself."
"Elsewhere, Olaf managed to escape the wolves, but threw the fruitcake to an eagle, which was abandoned by a tree not far from the kingdom."
"They called the residents of arendel to find Olaf."
"Sven went back to Christopher and told him (in vain), Anna and Elsa about Olaf's plight."
Meanwhile, Anna and Elsa find something forgotten in their attic
There was only one fruitcake. Olaf tried to cross the woods and was attacked by wolves
"They slide down the mountain, Olaf and Sven are finally separated by a gap."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Not blew my load.””
“What I meant to say was, I popped my question a bit early.”
“Kit Harington announced his engagement to his Game of Thrones costar Rose Leslie on September 27, and now we get to see her engagement ring.”
“The 30-year-old actress was spotted at London’s Heathrow airport looking fresh faced with a big diamond on her ring finger.”
“The couple has HBO to thank for their relationship.”
“They began dating in 2012 after first meeting on set and playing love interests until (spoiler alert!)”
“Rose’s character, Ygritte, was killed off.”
“Kit, who plays Jon Snow, alluded to a forever future with Rose earlier this year.”
“”Ygritte is the only woman for Jon.”
“Always,” he exclusively told Us Weekly in July.”


"It's not my burden."
"What I want to say is that I asked my question ahead of time."
"Kit Harrington announced her engagement to his game of Thrones partner rose Leslie on September 27, and now we can see her engagement ring."
"The 30-year-old actress was found wearing a big diamond on her ring finger at Heathrow Airport in London. She looks beyond recognition."
"The couple's relationship is thanks to HBO."
"They met for the first time on set in 2012 and started dating and playing love games until (spoiler alert!)"
"Ross's character, igrit, was killed."
"Kit plays Jon Snow, and earlier this year he mentioned the future with Ross forever."
"Igrit is Jon's only woman."
"Always," he told us exclusively in July



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the premiere alone, they face possible bullet holes in the windows, unsightly facades, and 100 years worth of potential damage — and that’s all before they step inside.”
“But I’m always looking for growth, always looking into tomorrow,” he says.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Chi Town Flip which follows husband and wife team Bryan and Maira Segal as they transform homes in the Windy City follows the same model as Tarek and Christina s successful series and will be the first launched by the production company the El Moussas formed last year before they...”
“...separated...”
““We’ve been working together for a really long time, It’s our job.”
“Obviously, we know each other really well,” says Tarek of the former couple’s dynamic as business partners.”
“They’re co-executive producing the series, which he notes they began working on “before separation.”
“So it’s been a long, long process.”But they’re not simply seeing the project through before parting ways.”
“Tarek tells PEOPLE exclusively, he’s not ruling out the possibility of working together again down the line.”


"At the premiere alone, they were faced with bullet holes in the windows, ugly exterior walls, and 100 years of potential damage - all before they stepped inside."
"But I've been looking for growth, looking forward to tomorrow," he said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Chi Town flip is launched after the couple team Bryan and Maira Segal renovated the house in Fengcheng. It is the same as Tarek and Christina's successful series. It will be the production company founded by El moussas last year. In their..." The first one launched before
“… Separated... "
"We've been working together for a really long time, it's our job."
"Obviously, we know each other very well," Tariq said of the former couple's vitality as business partners
He said they were co executives of the series, and they started writing the series "before they separated."
"So it's a long process." But they don't simply go through the project before they go their separate ways
"Tariq told people exclusively that he did not rule out the possibility of working together again."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See Etheridge discuss her battle with cancer below.”
““We take a bath every night and smoke and talk and wind down and sleep a very, very good night's sleep -- and sleep is extremely important."”
“The GRAMMY-winning singer became an activist for the drug after using it for medicinal purposes during her battle with cancer and says her kids now refer to it as medicine.”
“WATCH: Melissa Etheridge Says Brad Pitt Was Almost Her Sperm Donor“My children have a very clear understanding of cannabis,” the 55-year-old mom of four told Yahoo during an interview for their Weed & the American Family report.”
“When I hold it without shame or confusion they can understand it as simple as if I was pointing to a bottle of Percocet and saying That s mama s medicine You take the naughtiness out of it and it s not something kids then run to I have smoked...”
“...with my older two Etheridge continued referring to 20 year old daughter Bailey and 18 year old son Beckett...”
“It was funny at first and then they realized it s a very natural end of the day and it brings you closer so I d much rather have a smoke with my grown kids than a drink The Kansas native underwent a lumpectomy and several rounds of chemotherapy and...”
“...radiation after being diagnosed with breast cancer in 2004”
“Although doctors prescribed various prescription drugs to help her deal with the side effects of treatment, she took the advice of singer and close pal David Crosby and instead turned to medicinal marijuana.”
“WATCH: Melissa Etheridge Defends Brad Pitt, Says She ‘Lost a Friend’ When He Married Angelina Jolie“It was a wake-up call for me,” she said.”


"Let's take a look at her fight against cancer."
"We take a bath every night, smoke, chat, relax and have a very, very good sleep - sleep is very important."
"The Grammy award-winning singer used the drug for medical purposes during her fight against cancer and later became an activist, saying her children now call it a drug."
"Observation: Melissa esserlich says Brad Pitt is almost her sperm donor. My children have a very clear understanding of marijuana, "the 55 year old mother of four told Yahoo
"When I hold it without shame or confusion, they can understand it very simply. It's like I point to a bottle of percocet and say," this is my mother's medicine. You've got rid of its mischief. It's not something that children run to me to smoke... "
“… My two brothers, territchie, continue to mention their 20-year-old daughter, Bailey, and 18-year-old son, Beckett. "
"It was fun at first, but then they realized that it was the natural end of the day, it brought you closer, so I'd rather smoke with my adult children than have a drink. This Kansas native had a lumpectomy and a few rounds of chemotherapy, and then..."
"Radiotherapy after diagnosis of breast cancer in 2004"
"Although doctors prescribed various drugs to help her deal with the side effects of her treatment, she followed the advice of singer and close friend David Crosby and switched to medicinal marijuana."
Observation: Melissa Ethridge defends Brad Pitt by saying she lost a friend when Brad Pitt married Angelina Jolie. "It's a wake-up call," she said



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In May 2018 they announced they were expecting their first child together.”
“In 2017, she married her partner of six years Tim Loden.”
“Starting in 2017, Yvonne Strahovski began appearing in the critically acclaimed Hulu series The Handmaid's Tale.”
“In 2015, she appeared in 10 episodes of The Astronaut Wives Club.”
“In 2014, she appeared in 12 episodes of the rebooted 24.”
“She appeared in season 7 and 8 of the TV series Dexter.”
“She was the voice and model of Miranda Lawson in the Mass Effect video game trilogy.”
“Her other notable film projects include the 2012 comedy The Guilt Trip, 2014's horror epic I, Frankenstein and 2016's All I see Is You.”
“This led her to appear in other Hollywood productions like the suspense thriller Killer Elite (2011), where she played the sultry love interest of Jason Statham.”
“As talented as beautiful, Strzechowski mesmerized both men and women viewers, the first being mainly drawn by her sleek and sexy physique, while the latter by her comedic and dramatic flair.”


"In May 2018, they announced that they were pregnant with their first child together."
"In 2017, she married her partner of six years, Tim Loden."
"Since 2017, Yvonne strahovsky has appeared in the highly acclaimed Hulu series the story of the maid."
"In 2015, she starred in 10 episodes of astronaut Wives Club."
"In 2014, she starred in 12 episodes of restart 24."
"She appeared in season 7 and season 8 of the TV series Dexter."
"She's the spokesperson and model for Miranda Lawson in the mass effects video game trilogy."
"Her other well-known film projects include the comedy" journey of sin "in 2012, the horror epic" Frankenstein "in 2014 and" I only see you "in 2016
"It makes her appear in other Hollywood works, such as the suspense thriller Killer Elite (2011), where she plays Jason Stassen's sultry love interest."
Stezechovsky is brilliant, attracting both male and female audiences. The first audience is mainly her sleek and sexy physique, while the second audience is her comic and dramatic talent



**Something goes wrong**
“(Exclusive)Related Gallery...”
“But then I tried it on and felt very meh about it."”
“The 30-year-old reality TV star got engaged to Jared Haibon, a fellow Bachelor in Paradise alum, back in June after a Ross and Rachel-style, will-they-won't-they situation that plagued the couple for years.”
“Over the weekend, Iaconetti came to New York City to find her perfect wedding dress.”
“The bride-to-be was clearly over the moon to be finding her gown!”
“She posted an adorably giddy snap outside her hotel before heading to Kleinfeld's to try on dresses with Diane from Say Yes to the Dress.”
“"I'm going wedding dress shopping today!!!"”
“...she captioned a shot of her grinning ear to ear in a white structured top, light wash jeans and clear, chunky heels.”
“InstagramIaconetti also posted a pic of one of her reject dresses -- "it felt like curtains" -- on Instagram too.”
“"Jared, don’t look!”


(exclusive) related gallery
"But then I tried and it was comfortable."
"The 30-year-old reality star was engaged to another alumnus of paradise, Jared haibon, in June after a rose and Rachel style love affair, which has plagued the couple for many years."
"Last weekend, iaconetti came to New York City to look for her perfect wedding dress."
"The bride to be is obviously looking for her dress!"
"She pasted a lovely dizzy picture outside the hotel, then went to Kleinfeld department store and tried the skirt that started with" say yes to the skirt. "
"I'm going to buy wedding dress today!"
“…… She used subtitles to describe a picture of her smiling face, in which she was wearing a white structured jacket, light washed jeans and clear stilettos
"Instagram iaconetti also posted a picture of her rejected skirt on instagram -" it felt like a curtain“
"Jared, don't look!"



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“After the 23-year-old pop star's team announced on Monday that the remaining 12 concerts on thePurpose world tour would be canceled, Braun took to Instagram to praise those behind the tour and apologize for having to cut it short.”
“WATCH: Justin Bieber Cancels All Remaining Purpose Tour Dates Due to 'Unforeseen Circumstances'"An incredible run.”
“Congrats to @justinbieber on an incredible tour and thank you to the entire cast and crew for your unending support," he captioned a photo of the Purpose logo.”
“"To the fans from all over the world who took part over the last 16 months over 6 continents, thank you.”
“To Justin, who gave it his all, night after night, thank you."”
“After showing gratitude to the fans that were able to see Bieber perform, it was time to say sorry to those that had tickets to canceled concerts.”
“"And to those that won't be able to see it, on behalf of myself, Justin, and the team, we are sorry.”
“That was never our intent," Braun continued.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"After the 23-year-old pop star's team announced on Monday that the remaining 12 concerts of the world tour would be cancelled, Braun praised those who supported the tour on instagram and apologized for having to shorten the concert."
"Observation: Justin Bieber canceled all remaining destination tour dates because of" unforeseen circumstances "and" incredible running. "
"Congratulations @ Justin Bieber on an incredible tour, and thank you for your endless support for the entire cast and staff," he captioned the purpose logo photo
"Thanks to the fans from all over the world who have played on six continents in the past 16 months. Thank you."
"Thanks to Justin. He gave everything day and night. Thank you."
"After thanking the fans who have been able to see Bieber's performance, it's time to say sorry to those who have cancelled tickets for the concert."
"For those who can't see, on behalf of me, Justin and the team, we're sorry."
"It was never our intention," Braun continued



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...https://t.co/KzllU43mkI — Ellen DeGeneres (@TheEllenShow) February 2, 201834.052234 -118.243685”
“It’s profound to be understood.” Thank you, Portia.”
“Please look at the time stamp on the story to see when it was last updated.”
“LOS ANGELES — Ellen DeGeneres couldn’t help but shed tears on the set of “The Ellen Show” Thursday when wife Portia de Rossi gave her a very special birthday present for her 60th birthday.”
““It’s your 60th birthday and this gift had to be really special and it had to represent who you are and what you really care about,” Portia told her.”
““Not just now, but what you’ve always cared about.”
“De Rossi played a video showing scenes from the life of Dian Fossey, one of Ellen’s personal idols since she was a child.”
“Fossey is well known for her work defending and documenting the mountain gorillas of Rwanda’s Virunga Mountains.”
“DeGeneres, who has worked for years to help rescue animals around the world, has said for the last two years that she wishes she could be doing more, de Rossi said.”
“That was the inspiration for the gift that brought tears to her wife’s eyes.”


“... https://t.co/KzllU43mkI-Ellen  DeGeneres (@ the EllenShow) 201834.052234-118.243685 "February 2
"It's very deep to understand." Thank you, Portia
"Look at the time stamp on the story and see when it was last updated."
Los Angeles - on Thursday, Ellen DeGeneres burst into tears at the scene of the "Ellen show," and her wife, Portia de Rossi, gave her a very special birthday present for her 60th birthday
"Today is your 60th birthday, and this gift has to be very special. It has to represent who you are and what you really care about," Portia told her
"Not now, but what you always care about."
"De Rossi played a video showing the life of Dean Fossey, one of Allen's idols since childhood."
"Fossi is known for protecting and documenting mountain gorillas in the Virunga mountains of Rwanda."
"DeGeneres, who has been working for many years to help save animals around the world, has been saying for the past two years that she wants to do more," De Rossi said
"The inspiration for this gift made her wife cry."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementSeason 13 of The Voice premieres on Monday on NBC.”
“According to reports Hudson is not getting along with the other judges, the contestants, or the crew.”
“In a video titled The Real Coaches of The Voice, a fun spoof of the Real Housewives franchise, Shelton and Hudson are butting heads when they have both turned their chair and are trying to convince contestants to choose between the two.”
“The promo features snide comments from Shelton when he talks about Hudson’s rookie win as a coach on The Voice U.K.“I feel like Jennifer Hudson is coming from the minor leagues into the big-time boys here,” says Shelton.”
““She was on The Voice UK, and she won, but this is different.”Which Coach will be the SHORE thing?”
“#TheVoice returns September 25.”
“A post shared by NBC's The Voice (@nbcthevoice) on Aug 11, 2017 at 4:59pm PDTThe Dreamgirls star and former American Idol contestant is not intimidated by the country superstar’s remarks.”
“She is confident that her time on the British version of the show has prepared for a win in the States.”
“The question is, though, is the feud just all in fun for a promo video, or are Hudson’s diva ways really causing problems on the set?”
“A source claims she is being intolerable by screaming at people to get her way, being disruptive, and causing delays.”


Voice's 13th season ad will premiere on NBC on Monday
"It's reported that Hudson doesn't get along well with other judges, contestants or staff."
"In a video called the real coach of sound, Sheldon and Hudson bump their heads in the funny spoof of the real housewife series when they both turn their chairs and try to convince the contestants to choose between the two."
"When Jennifer Hudson talked about Hudson's rookie winning, he said," I feel like players from the minor leagues have come to the boyhood here, "Shelton said.
"She's in VOA, she won, but it's different." Which coach will be on shore? "
"The voice returned on September 25."
"At 4:59 p.m. on August 11, 2017, NBC's the voice (@ NBC thevoice) shared a post. The dream girl star and former American Idol player were not intimidated by the country superstar's remarks."
"She believes that her time on the British edition is ready to win in the United States."
"But the question is, is the dispute just a joke about a promotional video, or does Hudson's heroine style really cause trouble on the set?"
"One source said that what she couldn't bear was to yell at people and ask them to act in their own way, causing disorder and delay."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"The rest we can fix.”See more in the video below.”
“He actually has perfect vision in both eyes, which is all we care about," she said.”
““He’s doing great.”
“RELATED: Kim Zolciak Reveals 'All Is Good' Days After Son Kash's Surgery for Dog BiteZolciak opened up about Kash's serious injuries on Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen on Sunday, revealing that he was "doing awesome."”
“When life hands you lemons make Lemonade ❤️ #IBelieveInAngels #GodIsSoGood."”
“Kash has taught me so much through this experience.”
“"THANK YOU ?”
“"So thankful to Dr Joseph Williams (chief of plastic surgery) and Dr Berland (Tomas Eye Group) their quick decisions and impeccable work doesn't go unnoticed," she continued.”
“In no time he will heal up perfectly and you will never know this happened!"”
“We are so incredibly thankful and blessed!”


"We can take care of the rest." Please see more information in the video below
"The fact that he has perfect vision in both eyes is what we care about," she said
"He did a good job."
"Related reports: jinzorchak revealed that 'everything is fine' a few days later, his son Cassie's dog bitzorchak's operation opened Cassie's seriously injured watch. What happened was broadcast live with Andy Cohen on Sunday, revealing that he was' doing a great job '"
"When life gives you lemonade ❤️ #Ibelieve in angels ා godissogold. "
"Cash has taught me a lot through this experience."
"Thank you?"
"Thanks to Dr. Joseph Williams (head of plastic surgery) and Dr. Berland (Tomas eye group), their quick decisions and perfect work won't be ignored," she continued
"He'll be well soon, and you'll never know what's going on!"
"We are so grateful to God!"



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Good morning, welcome, congratulations, you made it!” I heard a chipper server say as he showed a group of four to their table.”
“...buttermilk waffles to of course avocado toast...”
“Nothing very bad could happen to you there.”Times have changed, to say the least.”
“The quietness and the proud look of it.”
“Calms me down right away.”
“...go to Tiffany s...”
“Explaining the store s draw later in the film and almost word for word in Capote s novella she says that when she s feeling awful The only thing that does any good is to jump in a cab and...”
“The street is hers alone; the coffee and pastry are hers alone; the window displays, even, are hers alone.”
“...is about ritual and the search for simple almost pastoral pleasures in a dense and hectic city...”
“Though her character Holly Golightly opaquely drawn as a high end call girl is something of a down on her luck striver an outsider looking in and up the scene is not about longing or aspiration so much as it...”


"Good morning, welcome, Congratulations, you made it! "I heard a waiter named chipper say he was bringing a group of four to their table."
“… Buttermilk waffles are avocado toast, of course. "
"Nothing bad will happen there." Times have changed, to say the least
"Peace and pride here."
"Calm me down at once."
“… Go to Tiffany s... "
"Later, in the movie and Capote's novella, she explained the shop's signboard. She said that when she felt bad, the only good thing was to jump into a taxi and then..."
"She's the only one in the street; she's the only one in the coffee and pastry; she's even the only one in the window display."
“… It's about rituals and looking for simple almost pastoral music in a dense and busy city... "
"Although her character holly Golight is portrayed as a high-end call girl, a bit like an unlucky fighter, an outsider looks around in the camera, not so much a desire as a desire..."



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“©Instagram”]“You expend a ton of energy on resistance work and I make sure we do lots of moves with ropes and pulling sandbags too.”
“[image type=”none” float=”none” alt=”Khloe shows off her new abs on Instagram” title=”Khloe shows off her new abs on Instagram” info=”popover” info_place=”top” info_trigger=”hover” info_content=”©Instagram” lightbox_caption=”Khloe shows off her new abs on Instagram.”
“She does not whine or complain, she just comes in ready to work and she doesn’t stop.”
“©Rupert Thorpe”]He says: “Kim is hardcore.”
“[image type=”none” float=”none” alt=”Gunnar poses in his Beverly Hills workout studio” title=”Gunnar poses in his Beverly Hills workout studio” info=”popover” info_place=”top” info_trigger=”hover” info_content=”©Rupert Thorpe” lightbox_caption=”Gunnar poses in his Beverly Hills workout studio.”
“Kim comes to Gunnar five times a week and surprisingly he describes her as one of his hardest workers.”
“...makes it fun...”
“...image type none float none alt Gunnar demonstrates beatdowns title Gunnar demonstrates beatdowns info popover info_place top info_trigger hover lightbox_caption Gunnar demonstrates beatdowns The scene is straight out of a Hollywood movie and it s clear why so many stars have Gunnar on speed dial he takes exercise seriously but...”
“The bright yellow monster sits at the entrance to the gym and Gunnar attaches battle ropes to the bars at the front for one of Kim’s favourite workout moves – the beatdown.”
“But there’s just enough room for his key workout tool – a HUMMER.”


"] instagram"] "you put a lot of energy into resistance training, and I'm sure we'll do a lot of moves with ropes and sandbags as well."
"[image type =" None "float =" None "ALT =" Khloe shows her new ABS on instagram "title =" Khloe shows her new ABS on instagram "info =" Popper "info / u place =" top "info / u trigger =" hover "info / u content =) instagram" Lightbox / u caption = "Khloe shows her new ABS on instagram."
"She doesn't complain, she doesn't complain, she just comes in and gets ready to work, and she doesn't stop."
"Gold is the iron," he said
“[image type=”none“float=”none“alt=”Gunnar poses in his Beverly Hills workout studio“title=”Gunnar poses in his Beverly Hills workout studio“info=”popover“info\u place=”top“info\u trigger=”hover“info\u content=”©Rupert Thorpe“lightbox\u caption=”Gunnar poses in his Beverly Hills workout studio“。”
"Kim comes to gonna five times a week and surprisingly describes her as one of his hardest working employees."
“… Make it fun... "
“… Picture type none float none ALT Gunnar show beating Title Gunnar show beating info Popover info place top info trigger hover Lightbox capture Gunnar show beating scenes directly from Hollywood movies, it's clear why so many stars use Gunnar to dial numbers quickly, he attaches great importance to exercise, but... "
"This bright yellow monster is sitting at the entrance of the gymnasium. Gunner ties the battle rope to the front railing. It's one of Kim's favorite exercises - knock down."
"But his key fitness tool, Hummer, has just enough space."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“More From Alex Leadbeateradvertising...”
“He once asked Tom Cruise about his supposedly fake-butt in Valkyrie (he swore it was all real).”
“At the end of Game of Thrones Season 7, the Night King uses his newly acquired dragon to bring down the east end of the Wall, finally unleashing an army of wights and White Walkers on the Seven Kingdoms.”
“But if this is him entering the final stage of his Westeros death plan, we’re left asking what he would have done if Daenerys hadn’t turned up beyond the Wall with Viserion in the first place.”
“Of course, the Wall coming down is a major event that has felt like a narrative inevitability since the ancient, 700 foot-high behemoth was first introduced.”
“And it now being breached (if not completely felled) serves - along with the confirmation of Jon’s true lineage and claim to the Iron Throne - feels like the official signal Game of Thrones is entering its final act.”
“Plainly, the Wall had to fall otherwise the story’s conclusion lacks its essential part.”
“...advertisingAs such, theorising how it may happen and allow the armies of the dead to go from Wildling-bothering pest to immediate, mortal-coil threatening certainty has been one of the biggest debates in Thrones fandom over the past few seasons.”
“Prior to Season 7 the expectation was that Bran s mark given to him by the Night King during a vision of his forces would remove the magic placed on the structure by the Children of the Forest the Wall s origins are the stuff of myth but it s...”
“...assumed to be a shared effort of the Westerosi natives and the first men...”


"More from Alex leadbeateradvertising..."
"Once he asked Tom Cruise about his fake ass in Valkyrie (he swore it was true)."
At the end of the seventh season of game of thrones, the night King uses his newly acquired dragon to knock down the east end of the city wall, and finally releases an army of vichtians and white walkers to the seven kingdoms
"But if this was the last stage of his westroth death plan, we would ask what he would do if danielis didn't show up outside the wall and Vicario came first."
"Of course, the collapse of the Great Wall is a major event. Since the first appearance of this 700 foot tall ancient behemoth, people have felt that it is an inevitable narrative."
"Now that it's broken (if not completely down) and Jon's true blood is confirmed and his demand for the iron throne, it feels like the official signal game of power is entering the final act."
"It's clear that the wall has to fall, otherwise the conclusion of the story lacks the necessary parts."
“…… That's how advertising, theoretically explaining how it happens and allowing the dead army to go from wild harassment of pests to direct, lethal coil threat certainty, has been one of the biggest debates among fans of throne in the past few seasons
"Before the seventh season, the expectation is that the mark left by the night king when he saw bran's troops will be removed. The origin of the magic wall imposed by the forest children on the building is a myth, but it is..."
“… It is believed to be the result of the joint efforts of the westrossi natives and the first people... "



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“What are your thoughts on Katy's look?”
“Plus, the two reunited just a couple months later, raising suspicions that they may not be done for good!”
“...the split get the best of her...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source BACKGRID At the time their reps told Page Six Before rumors or falsifications get out of hand we can confirm that Orlando and Katy are taking a respectful loving space at this time Source BACKGRID But the singer definitely didn t sit back and let...”
“So I’m a paid woman and I’m ready for a beautiful man.”Source: BACKGRIDEarlier this year, Katy split from actor Orlando Bloom after ten months of dating.”
“By the way, I love men.”
“I got paid, pretty much, more than any guy that’s been on that show.”
“You know why?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDIn May, she told KTU radio, “I’m really proud that as a woman I got paid.”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"What do you think of Katie?"
"In addition, the two met only a few months later, which makes people suspect that they may not meet again forever!"
“… Division makes her the best... "
"The article continues in the background of advertising sources. When their representatives tell page 6 that rumors or fraud are out of control, we can confirm that Orlando and Katie are taking the space of respecting love. At this time, the source background, but the singer certainly did not sit down and let..."
"So I'm a paid woman, and I'm ready for a beautiful man." Source: backgrid earlier this year, Katie broke up with actor Orlando Bloom after dating for 10 months
"I love men, by the way."
"I was paid more than almost anyone else on that show."
"Do you know why?"
The article continues in the following ad source: backgrid in May, she told ktu radio, "as a woman, I'm really proud that I've been paid."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His popularity and personality have transcended into the world of professional sports on many occasions, with athletes recreating some of his most famous wrestling promos and Flair himself often called on to serve as a motivational speaker.”
“Flair, 68, has spent the past five decades in the world of professional wrestling with a reputation as one of the most charismatic personalities in the history of that business.”
“PW Insider's Mike Johnson reported that Flair is hospitalized near his home in Atlanta.”
“As first reported by Pro Wrestling Sheet, Flair was hospitalized on Saturday morning for heart-related issues, with Zanoni initially reporting the situation involved "routine monitoring."”
“Melinda Morris Zanoni, the CEO of Legacy Talent and Entertainment, tweeted out the latest on Flair's situation late Sunday night.”
“After initially downplaying the seriousness of the issue, a representative for Flair has made a plea for public support.”
“Flair was hospitalized and admitted to an intensive care unit over the weekend.”
“ -- Two-time WWE Hall of Famer Ric Flair has been placed in a medically induced coma while he awaits surgery, a WWE representative confirmed to ESPN on Monday afternoon.”


"His popularity and personality have surpassed professional sports on many occasions. Athletes have reproduced some of his most famous wrestling videos, and his talent is often required to be an inspirational speaker."
Fryer, 68, has been engaged in professional wrestling for the past 50 years and is known as one of the most attractive figures in the history of wrestling
"Mike Johnson of PWC insiders reported that fryer was hospitalized near his home in Atlanta."
"As professional wrestling first reported, flair was hospitalized on Saturday morning with heart related problems, and zanoni's initial report involved" routine monitoring. "
"Melinda Morris zanoni, chief executive of legacy talent and entertainment, tweeted the latest news about fryer on Sunday night."
"After initially downplaying the seriousness of the problem, a representative of flair asked for public support."
"Fryer was in the intensive care unit last weekend."
On Monday afternoon, a WWE representative confirmed to ESPN that two time WWE Hall of Fame member ric flair was in a drug-induced coma while waiting for surgery



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(both with husband Jionni LaValle) and Farley to 14-month-old son Greyson Valor and 3-year-old daughter Meilani Alexandra (both with husband Roger Mathews).”
““He’s gonna read this and say ‘thanks ma.’ ”The 4 ft. 8 in.”
“...couldn t be prouder...”
“On Saturday, the Jersey Shore star posted a sweet tribute to her first-born child on Instagram, showing in split photos just how much her little one has grown over the years.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““OMG.”
“Happy 5th Birthday to my son who changed my life for the better,” Polizzi, 29, wrote.”
“You are my world and I m so proud to be your mommy I remember when I first laid eyes on you and knew I would protect you with all of my being until the day I die the gushing mama continued joking that Lorenzo would be mocking her for...”
“...writing this...”
“...star also appears to be concerned that her son might pass her in height one day.”


"(both with husband geoni LaVale) and Farley against 14-month-old son Grayson vallo and 3-year-old daughter Melanie Alexandra (both with husband Roger Matthews)
"He'll read the letter and say, 'thank you, mom,' four feet eight."
“… I'm very proud... "
"On Saturday, the Jersey coast star posted a sweet tribute to her first child on instagram, showing in split photos how much her child has grown over the years."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"My God."
"Happy fifth birthday to my son, who has made my life better," Polizzi, 29, wrote
"You are my world. I am very proud to be your mother. I remember when I first saw you, I knew I would protect you with all my life until the day I died. My mother continued to joke that Lorenzo would laugh at her..."
“… Write this... "
“…… Starr also seems to be worried that one day her son will be taller than her



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'But Liz is extremely proud of her youthful looks and she told him there's nothing wrong with a woman her age being sexy.'”
“'He's at the age where everything his mum does is embarrassing, and he just can't understand why she can't cover up a bit more.”
“The 53-year-old actress showed off her washboard stomach and amazing body in the light-hearted summer snap.”
“Elizabeth wrote in the caption that she was enjoying the fun fitness session at her countryside home, after previously leaving fans hot under the collar with a topless swimming session.”
“Amazing Elizabeth Hurley had her jaw dropping figure on full display in a revealing pink bikini on Saturday as she took to Twitter to post a snap of the playful session with a hula hoop In the snap Elizabeth looked incredible in a pink bikini with delicate frilled detailing as...”
“...she kept her brown shoulder length tresses in loose summer waves...”
“The Royals star had the red hula hoop pushed out past her front as she wrote in the caption: 'Harder than I remember #hulahoop #home #herefordshire #elizabethhurleybeach.'”
“Elizabeth highlighted her ageless complexion with barely-there makeup in the snaps as she enjoyed the impromptu fitness session.”
“It comes just days after she left fans hot under the collar with a raunchy clip of a topless swimming session, although many were more distracted by who was the person behind the camera.”
“Sexy: It comes just days after the 53-year-old actress left fans hot under the collar with a raunchy clip of a topless swimming sessionTaking to Instagram, Elizabeth risked baring all as she slipped off her bikini top to perform the breaststroke in the swimming pool.”


"But Liz is very proud of her young looks. She tells him that it's OK for a woman her age to be sexy."
"At his age, everything his mother does is embarrassing. He just doesn't understand why she can't hide a little more."
"The 53 year old actress showed off her washboard stomach and amazing figure in a relaxed summer snapshot."
"Elizabeth wrote in the title that she enjoyed this interesting fitness activity at her home in the country. Before that, she made fans excited with a topless swim."
"The amazing Elizabeth Hurley tweeted an interesting snapshot on Saturday. She showed her stunning figure in a exposed pink bikini. The hula hoop in the photo made Elizabeth wear a pink bikini. The delicate frill details are incredible..."
“…… She spread her shoulder length brown hair in the summer waves... "
"The Royal Star pushed the red hula hoop in front of her, and she wrote in the title:" more difficult than I remember is Hula hope's hometown, Herefordshire and Elizabeth Hurley beach. "
"Elizabeth in enjoying this impromptu fitness training, with almost no makeup snapshot highlights her eternal skin color."
"Just a few days ago, she made fans excited with an obscene video of swimming with her bare upper body, but a lot of people were distracted by who was behind the scenes."
"Sexy: just a few days ago, 53 year old Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth Elizabeth



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...https://t.co/pD9vF3hx6u — Good Morning America (@GMA) September 19, 2016”
“Watch Louis-Dreyfus’ moving speech about her dad below:WATCH: Julia Louis-Dreyfus dedicates her #Emmys win to her father who passed away this past Friday.”
“Mike Pont via Getty Images For reference: Julia Louis-Dreyfus and her father, William, in 2014.”
“...https://t.co/4heUxufeOa — Richard Dreyfuss (@RichardDreyfuss) September 19, 2016Alive and tweetin’, people.”
“But I really appreciate all the concerned tweets.”
“Dreyfuss ― who again, is NOT dead, nor is he Louis-Dreyfus’ father, luckily has a great sense of humor and tweeted about the incident:I'm actually not Julia Louis-Dreyfus' father.”
“The spelling of Dreyfuss, versus Dreyfus, is also a nice hint that he’s not related to the “Veep” star.”
“Unfortunately, many tweeted their kind sentiments to the very alive actor Richard Dreyfuss, who is most famous for his role in “Jaws” and “What About Bob?”.”
“After her revealing admission, fans on Twitter were quick to offer their condolences to the star about her late father.”
“The actress apologized about her show, “Veep,” for basically allowing Trump to happen, before bringing the crowd to tears by announcing her father, William Louis-Dreyfus, died this past Friday.”


“... https://t.co/pD9vF3hx6u- Good morning, USA (@ GMA) September 19, 2016 "
"Look at Louis Dreyfus' touching speech about her father. Below: Watch: Julia Louis Dreyfus dedicated her winning Emmy to her father who died last Friday
"Mike pont via Getty Images for reference: Julia Louis Dreyfus and her father William, 2014."
“... https://t.co/4heUxufeOa-Richard  Dreyfuss (@ Richard Dreyfuss) live broadcast and twitter on September 19, 2016, Hello everyone. "
"But I really appreciate the microblog that you care about."
"Dreyfus - he's not dead again, and he's not Louis Dreyfus's father. Fortunately, he has a good sense of humor and tweeted about it: I'm not Julia Louis Dreyfus's father."
"The spelling of Dreyfuss and Dreyfus also suggests that he has nothing to do with veep."
Unfortunately, a lot of people have tweeted their affection for the very active actor Richard Dreyfus, most notably in jaws and what about Bob .”
"After her public admission, twitter fans quickly expressed their grief to the star for her late father."
"The actress apologized for her show" trump "because she basically allowed trump to happen, and then announced that her father, William Louis Dreyfus, died on Friday, bringing tears to the audience's eyes."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So I’ve got my winter body in full swing.””
“I want my pizza and my beer back.”
“For Vincent Rodriguez III, it was also a callback to his past as a go-go boy, working bars in Chicago and Provincetown while he was doing theater productions.”
““I basically had about 12 weeks.” That meant diets, trainers, and sadly for David Hull, cutting out most of his snacking.”
““They knew that they wanted to do a strip number from the beginning of the season, so they were like, ‘Just know you’re going to be shirtless and maybe pantless in episode nine,’” said Foster.”
“I gotta say, it looked great!”Even though the shoot only took half a day, the trio took a lot longer getting their abs camera-ready.”
““I guess people are doing that all the time in this town.”
“She says, ‘Jump in the shower and take your clothes off, I’ll be in in a second and do as you’re told!’” Hull said.”
““We just go to a stranger’s house.”
““I never understood it, but apparently it’s a thing.” The CXG crew packed the club with around 150 background actors and sent Hull, Foster, and Rodriguez to a spray tanner beforehand.”


"So my winter body is fully expanded."
"I want my pizza and beer back."
"For Vincent Rodriguez III, it's also a memory of his past as an actor in bars in Chicago and provenston."
"I basically have 12 weeks." That means dieting, training and, unfortunately, David hull, reducing most of his snacks
"They knew from the beginning that they wanted to do stripteases, so they said," you're going to be naked in Episode 9, maybe you don't have pants, "Foster said
"I have to say, great! "Although it took only half a day to shoot, it took three people a lot longer to prepare for the abdominal camera."
"I guess that's what people do all the time in this town."
"She said," take a shower, take off your clothes, and I'll go in and do as you say! "Hull said
"We're just going to strangers."
"I didn't get it all the time, but obviously it's one thing." CXG's staff arranged about 150 background actors in the club and sent Hull, Forster and Rodrigues to the spray Tanner in advance.



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He turned into a walking green hulk and couldn’t stop laughing through the mess.”
““It is the same energy you get from a WWE event.”
“One special dancer was Katy Perry’s Backpack Kid, who also wowed guests at the after-party.”
“Dance offCena stayed true to his word and came out dancing with a stage full of kids dressed in neon.”
“...to keep the show moving Also Read Watch Jimmy Fallon and John Cena Dance to Bruno Mars Finesse Here s who got slimed and 13 other moments not seen on TV”
“We have musical performances we have a bunch of stars we have awards to give out for the kids as the host it s not my job to make it the John Cena Show It s to make it the Kids Choice Awards so I have to be the vehicle...”
““The show is a vehicle to do so many moments at once.”
“A lot of it is with the set, a lot of it is with the audience — every year, they keep doing better and better,” Cena explained.”
““The hilarity of the show doesn’t rely on the host but it rests on the host’s ability to play along.”
“They embrace what it means to be a kid and I think that’s very special,” he told TheWrap.”


"He became a walking hulk and couldn't help laughing in the chaos."
"It's the same energy you get from WWE events."
"One of the special dancers was Katie Perry's backpacker, who surprised the guests after the party."
"The dancing ovsenna kept his word, and when he came out, the stage was full of children in neon lights."
“… To keep the show going, watch "Jimmy Fallon and John Senna dancing with Bruno Mars," which is "who's glued" and 13 other clips you don't see on TV
"We have music performances, we have a bunch of stars, we have awards for children as hosts, my job is not to make it a John Senna show, but to make it a children's Choice Award, so I have to be this car..."
"Acting is a tool to accomplish so many moments at once."
"A lot of it's about the set, a lot of it's about the audience - they get better and better every year," Senna explained
"The comedy of the program does not depend on the host, but on the host's ability to cooperate."
"They accepted what it means to be a child, and I think it's special," he told the wrap



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Other upcoming Marvel Cinematic Universe movies include Captain Marvel on March 8, 2019; the fourth Avengers movie on May 3, 2019; and Spider-Man: Far From Home on July 5, 2019.”
“Ant-Man and the Wasp is in theaters now.”
“Brie Larson, who will star in the upcoming Marvel Studios film as Carol Danvers/Captain Marvel, recently teased that she and Entertainment Weekly will "break the Internet" sometime tomorrow.”
“Hey @EW I’m bored.”
“Wanna break the Internet tomorrow?”
“— Brie Larson (@brielarson) September 5, 2018Entertainment Weekly has since responded to Larson's tweet, hinting that the surprise will be happening at 12 p.m.”
“ET.”
“Yes!”
“Meet us here at noon ET.”
“We’ve got something Marvel-ous in mind.”


"Other upcoming Marvel Comics films include Captain Marvel on March 8, 2019; the fourth Avenger on May 3, 2019; and spider man: far from home on July 5, 2019
"Ant man and wasp are in the cinema now."
Brie Larson, who will play in the upcoming Marvel studios film "Carol Danvers / Captain Marvel", recently joked that she and Entertainment Weekly will be "offline" sometime tomorrow
"Hey @ EW, I'm bored."
"Do you want to cut off tomorrow?"
"- Bree Larson (@ breelarson) on September 5, 2018, entertainment weekly subsequently responded to Larson's microblog, suggesting that the surprise will happen at 12 p.m."
"Wait a minute."
"Yes
"Meet us here at noon Eastern time."
"We have a great idea."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In any case, it's quite hilarious to see Cudlitz lay into the show with such naked honesty.”
“Saviors who had helped him...”
“Cudlitz again, mocking the terribleness of this scene which, if Rick had simply shot Negan when he first swaggered out the door, would have put a blessed end to this whole nonsensical plot:“He’s right there!”
“Apparently at this point the actor started "miming stray firing before imitating the showy Savior leader."”
“Team showed up...”
“Credit AMC More Cudlitz Hey I got a plan let s show up to where all the Saviors are with 500 weapons have them step 15 feet out into the balcony unarmed and shoot the windows out above his head You all know that sucked It was like the A”
“This started long before the disastrous Negan storyline, but Rick reached new heights of recklessness and stupidity as the show's writing quality plummeted.”
“Rick led his people into one disaster after another.”
“And while the audience was apparently shocked by this statement, he's not wrong.”
“Because how many more people was that a—hole gonna get killed?” Cudlitz said, according to ComicBook.com.”


"Anyway, it's so funny to see kudlitz lying naked and honest on the show."
"The Savior who helped him..."
”Kudlitz once again ridiculed the horror of this scene. If Rick only shot and killed negan when he swaggered out of the door for the first time, it would be a happy ending for the whole absurd plot: "he's there!"
Obviously, at this point, actors began to "imitate wandering shooting before they imitate the showy savior leader."
"There's a team..."
"Credit AMC more cudlitz hey, I have a plan for us to show up with 500 weapons where all the saviors are, and let them walk 15 feet into the balcony with their bare hands and shoot out the window over his head. You all know it's bad, like a"
"It started long before the disastrous Nigen story, but with the dramatic decline in the quality of the play's writing, Rick reached a new level of recklessness and stupidity."
"Rick led his people into disaster after disaster."
"Although the audience was obviously shocked by this sentence, he was not wrong."
"Because how many people can be killed by that hole? According to kudlitz ComicBook.com Website. "



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Serena Williams U S Olympic Women s Ice Hockey Team...”
“Four Battle for Stardom OTHER Choice Comedian ChoiceComedian Ellen DeGeneres James Corden Jimmy Fallon Kevin Hart Lilly Singh The Dolan Twins Choice Male Athlete ChoiceMaleAthlete Adam Rippon J J Watt LeBron James Red Gerard Shaun White Stephen Curry Choice Female Athlete ChoiceFemaleAthlete Chloe Kim Lindsey Vonn Mikaela Shiffrin Mirai Nagasu...”
“Cardi B) – “Finesse (Remix)”Taylor Swift (feat.”
“Florida Georgia Line) – “Meant to Be”Bruno Mars (feat.”
“The Man – “Feel It Still”Why Don’t We – “Trust Fund Baby”Choice Collaboration (#ChoiceCollaboration)Bebe Rexha (feat.”
“At the Disco – “Say Amen (Saturday Night)”Portugal.”
“Zacari) – “Love.”Choice Song: Group (#ChoiceSongGroup)5 Seconds of Summer – “Youngblood”Imagine Dragons – “Whatever It Takes”Maroon 5 – “Wait”Panic!”
“Chris Stapleton) – “Say Something”Kendrick Lamar (feat.”
“Young Thug) – “Havana”Demi Lovato – “Sorry Not Sorry”Dua Lipa – “New Rules”Halsey – “Bad at Love”Taylor Swift – “Look What You Made Me Do”Choice Song: Male Artist (#ChoiceSongMaleArtist)Charlie Puth – “Attention”Childish Gambino – “This Is America”Drake – “God’s Plan”Ed Sheeran – “Perfect”Justin Timberlake (feat.”
“The Mantwenty one pilotsX AmbassadorsChoice Song: Female Artist (#ChoiceSongFemaleArtist)Ariana Grande – “No Tears Left To Cry”Camila Cabello (feat.”


"Serena Williams, American Olympic women's hockey team..."
The battle of four stars another best comedian best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete best female athlete long beard... "
"Caddy B" - fine (mix) "Taylor Swift (feat)
"Florida Georgia line" - means "Bruno Mars" (feat)
"Men –" feel good "why don't we –" trust baby "choose to cooperate with Bebe Rexha (feat)"
"At the disco --" said amen (Saturday night) "Portugal."
Zakari - selected songs of love: Suite 5 seconds in summer - young man - imagine the Dragon - at all costs maroon 5 - waiting panic
"Chris Stapleton" - "say something" Kendrick Lamar (feat)
"Young thug" - "Havana" Demi Lovato - "I'm sorry, I'm not sorry" dualipa - "new rules" Halsey - "not good at love" Taylor Swift - "see what you make me do" selected songs: Male Artist Charlie putt - "attention" boyish Gambino - "this is America" Drake - "God's plan" ed Sheeran - "perfect" Justin· Timberlake (feat)
"No tears to cry" Camila Cabello (feat)



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The duo hit up Coachella together earlier this month, and headed to Texas to watch the Houston Rockets take on the Oklahoma Thunder in Houston this past week.”
“They left in the same car too.”Jenner and Scott have been frequently spotted together lately.”
“The Keeping up with the Kardashians starlet and cosmetics mogul headed to Bentley University outside Boston on Saturday night to support her latest beau, “Goosebumps” rapper Travis Scott.”
“Located just outside Boston in the town of Waltham, Bentley was celebrating their annual Spring Day, which always included a big a concert on campus featuring Scott.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The duo was spotted by a student leaving their fleet of tour buses and SUV’s.”
“Dressed in a thin, green bandeau top under a baggy white parka and matching pants, Jenner carried a Louis Vuitton purse as she and Scott walked towards the university with their arms around each other.”
“While in the Boston area, Kylie posts some scandalous selfies involving a major case of underboob.”
“Later, the couple headed to Boston’s Theater District where Scott made an appearance at Bijou nightclub.”
“When Scott’s table wasn’t isolated enough, he requested the nightclub move him to somewhere with a bit more privacy.”


"The two played cochella together earlier this month and went to Texas to watch the Houston Rockets meet the Oklahoma thunder in Houston last week."
"They left in the same car." Jenna and Scott have been spotted together recently
The Kardashian starlet and cosmetics tycoon went to Bentley university outside Boston on Saturday night to support her new boyfriend, goose bumps rapper Travis Scott
Bentley, in Waltham, a suburb of Boston, is celebrating their annual spring day, when there is always a big campus concert attended by Scott
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The two were found by a student leaving their tour bus and SUV fleet."
Jenna was wearing a thin green striped top, a loose white parka and matching pants. She and Scott walked to the university with a Louis Vuitton wallet
"In the Boston area, Kelly has released some defamatory selfies involving a major low-income case."
Later, the couple went to the theater district of Boston, where Scott appeared at the bijo nightclub
"When Scott's desk wasn't isolated enough, he asked the nightclub to move him to a more private place."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jessica Graf and Cody NicksonGetty ImagesThe “Big Brother” alumni were an adorable and stylish couple on the red carpet with Nickson cradling Graf’s baby bump.”
“News host glittered in this silvery minidress inspired by a double-breasted suit jacket.”
“Glitter, sequins and feathers ruled the red carpet as stars attended the 2018 People’s Choice Awards in Santa Monica, California.”
“Stars including Chrissy Teigen, Victoria Beckham and Giuliana Rancic looked dazzling as they arrived at the awards ceremony, which honored achievement in film, TV, music, social media and other areas of pop culture.”
“Here are some of the style highlights from the evening.”
“Victoria BeckhamWireImageThe designer was honored with a People’s Choice fashion icon award, and she certainly dressed for the occasion with this sleek, white pantsuit paired with black pumps.”
“Chrissy TeigenGetty ImagesThe social media superstar looked stunning in a sequined, beaded minidress, which she paired with sparkly heels.”
“Melissa McCarthyGetty ImagesThe actress looked radiant in a black pantsuit layered with a patterned, wide-sleeved coat.”
“Scarlett JohanssonGetty ImagesThe actress went for a rocker-chic vibe with high-waisted trousers, a thick leather belt, a corset-like top and slicked back hair.”
“Allison JanneyGetty ImagesThe actress looked chic as ever in a white ensemble that looked like a gown, but was actually a flowing jumpsuit.”


"Photos of Jessica Graf and Cody nixongetti" the alumni of big brother are a lovely and fashionable couple on the red carpet, Nixon holding Graf's lump. "
"Inspired by the double breasted suit jacket, the newscaster is shining in this silver miniskirt."
Stars shine sequins, sequins and feathers on the red carpet at the 2018 people's Choice Awards ceremony in Santa Monica, California
"The stars, including Chris tegan, Victoria Beckham and Juliana ranch, were all dazzling when they came to the ceremony. The awards ceremony recognized achievements in film, television, music, social media and other areas of popular culture. "
"Here are some of the highlights of the evening."
"Designer Victoria Beckham has won the people's choice of fashion icon award. She is wearing these fashionable white trousers and black high heels for this occasion, of course."
Chrissy teigengetty, the social media superstar, looks fabulous in a sequined, pearlescent miniskirt with shiny high heels
Melissa McCarthy, the actress looks radiant in black jumpsuits and a patterned wide sleeve coat
"The image of Scarlett johansongetti, the actress's pursuit of rock 'n' roll style, high waisted trousers, thick belts, corset like top and smooth back hair."
The image of Alison janigetti, the actress in a white suit, looks like a robe, but is actually a flowing jumpsuit, looks as chic as ever



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That new single drew 3.74 million plays on Spotify in the two days since its release over the long weekend — numbers that would be impressive for anyone, if that anyone hadn't done what "Look" just did.”
“If "Despacito" had lasted one more week at No.”
“...a wave of attention into record breaking metrics...”
“Driven by an expertly cryptic promotional campaign, the first single from Swift's forthcoming album Reputation set first-day records on YouTube and Spotify and drew the biggest weekly streaming and sales numbers for a single yet this year, according to Billboard.”
“Now, "Look" is the new No.”
“1 song in the country.”
“It broke Adele's record (of 61.6 million plays) for most-streamed debut week by a female artist, with 84.4 million U.S. streams.”
“And, in what must be a bitter disappointment for Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee, Swift displaced "Despacito" atop the Hot 100, where it has sat for four months.”
“1, it would have set an all-time record for most weeks at the top of the chart.”
“— but all anyone seems to care about is "Look What You Made Me Do."”


"The new single attracted 3.74 million hits on spotify in the two days after its long weekend release - an impressive number for anyone if there is no one like look."
"If" despair "lasts another week"
“… A wave of attention to record breaking indicators... "
According to billboard, the first single of Swift's upcoming album reputation, driven by a mysterious promotion, set a record on youtube and spotify, and attracted the largest weekly traffic and sales of the single so far this year
"Now," look "is the new number."
"A country song."
"It broke Adele's record (61.6 million plays), a female artist's premiere week in the United States, with 84.4 million shows."
"And it must have been a painful disappointment for Louis fonsey and Yankee Dad that swift replaced the desperate to top the top 100, where he's been sitting for four months."
"1. It's going to set a record for most weeks and be at the top of the list."
"- but it seems that everyone is concerned about" look what you asked me to do“



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Representatives for Depp did not respond to request for comment on the matter.”
“In terms of the now-dimmed fraud lawsuit that started all this back in early 2017, representatives for TMG contacted by Deadline had no comment on the outcome of the Saturday and Sunday sit-down.”
“After a long weekend in which attorneys for both Depp and the Management Group went hard, the parries reached a confidential settlement, I hear.”
“While no one is talking, both sides in what has been a sometimes bitter and revelatory legal knife fight are happy with the deal, Deadline has learned.”
“Prodded by a Los Angeles judge and overseen by a retired one the managed mediation between Depp s lawyer and TMG s reps from Kinsella Weitzman Iser Kump Aldisert LLP comes after the actor s primary attorney Ben Chew of Washington D C s Brown Rudick failed late last month...”
“...to get the August 15 starting trial pushed back...”
“It’s rare for a plaintiff to seek a delay in a trial that they requested, and the unusual hearing came on the heels of a long Rolling Stone profile of the Depp that pretty much everyone agrees was not a winner for the actor.”
“Another factor in the agreement hammered out over talks on Saturday and Sunday was Depp finally sitting down for a frequently postponed deposition in the matter back in May in L.A.Now, with the deal sealed, all that’s old news and all that is left is the formalities.”
“Which means, if things go as they usually do in these things, that in the next couple of weeks, dismissal filings are likely to pop up in L.A. Superior Court dropping Depp’s initial action of January 2017 and the commission-seeking cross-complaint that soon followed.”
“The November 2017 action for judicial foreclosure against several of the actor’s City of Angels properties by TMG over a $5 million loan that they said that made to him will also be closed.”


"Depp's representative did not respond to a request for comment on the matter."
"In the case of fraud litigation that began in early 2017, TMG representatives contacted before the deadline did not comment on the outcome of the negotiations on Saturday and Sunday."
"I heard that after a long weekend, Depp and the management lawyers worked hard and the parries reached a confidentiality agreement."
"Although no one is talking, both sides are happy with the deal, which is sometimes a painful and enlightening legal battle."
"Driven by a judge in Los Angeles and supervised by a retired judge, Depp's lawyer and TMG representative of Kinsella Weitzman Iser Kump Aldisert LLP conducted a managed mediation, after Brown Rudick of Washington, D.C Rudick's lead lawyer Ben chew failed at the end of last month. "
“… In order to postpone the trial that started on August 15... "
"It's very rare for the plaintiff to ask for a postponement of the trial. This unusual trial was conducted after Depp's long speech on rolling stone, and almost everyone agreed that he was not the winner."
"Another factor in the agreement that was finalized in the negotiations on Saturday and Sunday was that Depp finally sat down and prepared to take a frequently delayed oath in Los Angeles in May. Now, with the agreement, all this is old news, and all that's left is formalities. "
"This means that if things go on as usual, in the next few weeks, the Los Angeles High Court is likely to suddenly file a dismissal application, withdraw Depp's preliminary lawsuit in January 2017, and the committee will soon file a cross appeal."
"In November 2017, TMG's judicial foreclosure lawsuit against the actor's several Angel City Properties in connection with the $5 million loan provided to the actor will also end."



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is definitely not letting him off the hook asking Over a thousand you think Watch Reunion Road Trip Return To the Jersey Shore Sunday Aug 20 at 9 30 p m only on E”
“How many women do you think you ve slept with But Sorrentino isn t one to kiss and tell at least anymore and sneakily dodges the question but replies It was just a lot It was a lot However Polizzi...”
“The pair spent a lot of time together during their six seasons on the MTV series but the two have actually not kept in touch for the last five years leaving room for some interesting banter when Sorrentino picks her...”
“...up from her Jersey home...”
“In an exclusive clip from E!”
“News for the Reunion Road Trip: Return to the Jersey Shore airing Aug. 20, Snooki reveals the two got into a fight the last time they saw each other.”
““He was an a--hole.”
“But Mike was like, ‘I’m going to do a reunion with the cast, are you down?’ You can’t pass that up.”
“You gotta go,” she said.”
“With their first time back together in nearly half a decade, it doesn’t take long for the two to descend into some awkward territory when Polizzi remembers to take her birth control — except, she gets her days mixed up.”


“…… He'll never get away with more than a thousand you think watching the reunion road trip back to the Jersey coast Sunday, August 20, 9:30 p.m. only at e "
"How many women do you think you've slept with, but Sorrentino is no longer a woman who can kiss and talk to. She secretly evades this question, but answers that it's just a lot, but Polizzi..."
"The two spent a lot of time together in the six seasons of MTV series, but in the past five years, they haven't actually kept in touch. When Sorrentino picked her, there was room for some interesting jokes..."
“… From her Jersey home... "
"In an exclusive clip from e!"
"News of reunion: in" back to Jersey coast "broadcast on August 20, snooky revealed that the two had a quarrel at their last meeting."
"He's a hole."
"But Mike said," I'm going to be reunited with the actors. Are you disappointed? "You can't miss it."
"You have to go," she said
"They met again for the first time in nearly five years, and not long after that, when Polizzi remembered taking birth control measures, they were in an embarrassing situation - only that she confused her life."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple competed together on The Amazing Race but split in 2013 after 10 years together.”
“Following her win, she began dating Survivor: Africa winner Ethan John.”
“She’s also a model who landed a spread in Playboy in 2003 with fellow Survivor contestant Heidi Strobel.”
“Following her win on the 2003 season of Survivor, making her the youngest female winner in the show’s history, Morasca went on to compete on 2004’s Survivor: All Stars, The Amazing Race 19 and Fear Factor.”
“She was arrested for possession of narcotics paraphernalia and DUI and will be charged with assaulting a police officer.”
“There were also “several syringes in a large Ziploc bag in Morasca’s purse,” TMZ reports.”
“When an officer tried to subdue her, the reality star allegedly bit her on the forearm.”
“They administered Narcan but she woke up on the way to the hospital.”
“Upon arrival, cops determined she was under the influence, finding her Chevrolet Trax (with custom license plates reading “AMAZON”) still running.”
“Police received a call from a driver in South Strabane that a driver was passed out behind the wheel at a stop sign.”


"The couple took part in this wonderful competition together, but separated in 2013 after 10 years together."
After winning, she started dating survivors: African champion Ethan John
"She's also a model, and in 2003 she played in Playboy with another survivor, Heidi Strobel."
"Following her victory in the 2003 survivor season, which made her the youngest female champion in the history of the show, moraska continued to participate in the 2004 survivor: All Star, amazing game 19 and fear factor."
"She was arrested for possession of narcotics and drunk driving and will be charged with assaulting a police officer."
"There are several syringes in a large zipper pocket in moraska's wallet," TMZ reported
"When a police officer tried to subdue her, the reality show star was said to have bitten her on the forearm."
"They injected her with nacan, but she woke up on the way to the hospital."
"After arriving, the police confirmed that she was affected and found that her Chevy Trax (custom license plate with" Amazon ") was still driving."
"Police received a call from a driver in nanstrabane saying that a driver had fainted from behind the steering wheel at a stop sign."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"She can't dance."”
“I've learned to never underestimate her — I'd suggest you do the same.”
“Perry may not possess the vocal power of Mariah Carey in her prime, but SHE CAN SING.”
“Think before you speak.”
“Could a woman who "can't sing" sell 11 million albums and 81 million singles worldwide?”
“Do you realize how ridiculous you sound right now?”
“Here are 15 things you should never say to a hardcore Katy Perry fan:"She can't sing."”
“If you ask me, Perry catches her fair share of unwarranted flack, too.”
“I've taken the now 30-year-old hit-maker to task for all of these issues in the past (and will continue to do so in the future) — but darn it, I still love a lot of her music.”
“For example, "I Kissed a Girl" is eye roll–inducing, "Ur So Gay's" lyrics are homophobic, and her recent instances of offensive cultural appropriation are beyond infuriating.”


"She can't dance."
"I've learned never to underestimate her - I suggest you do the same."
"Perry may not have the voice of Maria Kelly in her youth, but she can sing."
"Think twice before you leap."
Can a woman who can't sing sell 11 million albums and 81 million singles around the world
"Do you know how ridiculous you sound now?"
"Here are 15 things you should never say to Katie Perry's big fans:" she can't sing. "
"If you ask me, Perry will get her groundless attack, too."
"In the past (and will continue to do so) I've put this 30-year-old Pop Producer on the task of all these issues - but the damn thing is, I still like a lot of her music."
For example, the song "I kiss a girl" is dazzling, the lyrics of "you're gay" are homophobia, and her recent example of offensive cultural misappropriation is undeniable



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Kitchen crime.”See more in the video below.”
“I didn't just become Mrs. Eddie Cibrian, I became a co-soul protector and lover of two little boy's hearts," she added.”
“The 34 year old singer took to Instagram on Saturday to wish her husband Eddie Cibiran a happy 6th wedding anniversary alongside a sweet message about how grateful she is to be the stepmom to his two sons 13 year...”
“...old Mason and 10 year old Jake...”
“WATCH: LeAnn Rimes on Possibility of Having Kids With Eddie Cibrian: 'We Practice a Lot'"6 for 6!”
“My heart overflows with LovE for these humans," Rimes wrote alongside a slideshow of pics of her wedding day.”
“"This was one of the most joyous days I've ever experienced.”
“The trio that is my life...I am grateful!"”
“"I will forever be in awe of the wonder of of God's plan.”
“It has challenged me beyond belief and fulfilled my soul more than I could have ever conceived," she continued.”


"Kitchen crime" is shown in the video below
"I became not only lady Eddie seabryan, but also the common soul protector and lover of the hearts of the two little boys," she added
"On instagram last Saturday, the 34 year old singer gave her husband Eddie cibiran her best wishes for her sixth wedding anniversary and sent a sweet message that she was very grateful to be the stepmother of her 13-year-old two sons..."
“… Old Mason and 10-year-old Jack... "
"Observation: LeAnn Rimes talks about the possibility of having a baby with Eddie cibrian: 'we practice a lot'" 6 on 6! "
"My heart is full of love for these people," rimes wrote next to the slide of her wedding day photo
"It's one of the happiest days I've ever had."
"These three people are my life I appreciate it! "
"I will always revere the miracle of God's plan."
"It challenges me beyond my imagination and enriches my soul as never before," she added



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In the video, she says: “We’re fighting so he came to serenade me.” Niall smiles and asks: “We’re still fighting?”.”
“Hailee even posted stories while they were backstage about their “fight”.”
“The party’s purpose was to celebrate Justin’s no.”
“24 November 22, 2015: They Attend The Purpose Afterparty With Selena GomezFollowing the big show on November 22, Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez hit Justin’s American Music Awards after-party at Nice Guy in Los Angeles together, also joined by their many celebrity friends.”
“It’s unsure whether Niall and Hailee met and talked, but they were there, together, so we couldn’t exclude that.”
“Taylor actually even threw an epic after party - which was also attended by Hailee Steinfeld and Niall Horan who was there with the other members of One Direction.”
“They won Top Touring Artist and Top Duo/Group but were also nominated for Top Billboard 200 Artist and Top Artist, both won by Taylor Swift - that undoubtedly killed it that night.”
“...advertising25 May 17, 2015: Hailee & Niall Attend The BBMAS & Taylor Swift's AfterpartyDuring the BBMAS held on May 17, 2005, One Direction won in two out of the four categories they were nominated in.”
“Here’s a complete timeline of Niall Horan and Hailee Steinfeld’s relationship in 25 pictures.”
“...friendship.”


In the video, she said, "we're fighting, so he came to serenade me." Neil smiles and asks, "are we still fighting?" .”
"Haley even released their" fight "story backstage."
"The purpose of the party is to celebrate Justin's birthday."
"November 22, 24, 2015: they took part in the" purpose "party with Selena Gomez. After the big performance on November 22, Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez took part in the" Justin American Music Awards "party in nisgay, Los Angeles, and many of their celebrity friends also took part in the party."
"It's not sure if Neil and Haley have met and talked, but they're together, so we can't rule that out."
"Tyler even gave an epic speech after the party - Haley Stanfield and Neil Holland were there, and they were there with other members from one direction."
"They won the best touring artist and the best combination, but they also won nominations for best billboard artist 200 and best artist, both of which were won by Taylor Swift - which certainly eclipsed it that night."
“… Ad 25 17 May 2015: Hailee & Niall attended bbmas & Taylor Swift's after party. In bbmas on 17 May 2005, one direction was nominated in two of the four categories. "
"This is the full timeline of Neil Holland and Haley Stanfield's relationship in 25 photos."
“… Friendship. "



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Ryan has a charm and charisma that resonate with his devoted TV and radio audiences, and together, he and the remarkable Kelly Ripa will take ‘Live’ to a whole new level.””
“Disney ABC Home Entertainment and TV Distribution...”
“...hosted since early 2001”
“Seacrest s move into the seat next to Ripa comes nearly a year after Ripa s former co host Michael Strahan left the Disney distributed show for an anchor slot on ABC s Good Morning America Ryan is a quintessential broadcaster and at the top of his game said Ripa...”
“...in a statement...”
““I am thrilled to start my mornings with him every day, and we are so fortunate at ‘Live’ to have him join the family.”
“Ryan is a close friend and his star shines as brightly off camera as it does on.”
“His tremendous success is only matched by his impeccable reputation.”
“Plainly said, everyone loves him, and so will our daily viewers.”The move gives Seacrest, the multi-hyphenate host and entrepreneur, another big media platform.”
“He will relocate from Los Angeles to New York for the “Live” gig, but will continue to host his syndicated daily drive-time radio show for L.A.’s KIIS-FM and the weekly “American Top 40” radio program.”


"The charm and charm of Ryan resonates with his loyal TV and radio audience, and he and the outstanding Kelly Ripa will take" live "to a new level."
"Disney ABC Family Entertainment and TV distribution..."
“…… At the beginning of 2001
"Seacrest moved into the position next to Ripa nearly a year ago when Ripa's former co host Michael Strahan left Disney's program and went to ABC's good morning American channel to act as anchor. Ryan is a typical broadcaster, saying Ripa at the top of his game..."
“… In the statement
"I'm happy to be with him every morning, and we're lucky to be alive to have him in the family."
"Ryan is a close friend and his star shines out of the camera as well as on the camera."
"His great success can only be compared with his impeccable reputation."
"To put it bluntly, everyone loves him, and our audience will love him every day." The move gives Seacrest, a multi hyphenated host and entrepreneur, another big media platform
He will move from Los Angeles to New York for "live" concerts, but will continue to host his daily travel time radio shows for kiis-fm in Los Angeles and the weekly "Top 40 America" radio show



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared on The Sun and has been republished with permission.”
“It was not the only fashion event in Paris on Tuesday — as Katy Perry and Cara Delevingne were among stars attending the Chanel show.”
“The design also had a dramatic split straight up the front of the dress — allowing Bella’s leg to take some of the attention.”
“Wearing no bra and with a wide, gaping neckline, Bella again faced the risk of exposing her boobs.”
“A silver dress — that didn’t look too dissimilar from a nightgown — shimmered on the catwalk as Bella stomped down the room.”
“A second outfit offered more dazzle — but again was high on the flesh flashing.”
“And she had some power-dressing trousers on, a purple leather tier-around belt, and some marble effect boots.”
“She wore dramatic earrings and a jaunty hat as part of the collection look.”
“The completely see-through material showed off her breasts for all to see.”
“At one point in the show, Bella had been dressed in a sheet navy top that left nothing to the imagination.”


"This article first appeared in the sun and was reprinted with permission."
"It's not the only fashion event in Paris on Tuesday - Katie Perry and Carla delaviny are stars at the Chanel show."
"There's also a dramatic split in the front of the dress - it's getting Bella's legs some attention."
"Bella didn't wear a bra, the neckline was wide and big, and she was in danger of exposing her chest again."
"As Bella stamped her feet in the room, a silver dress - which didn't look much different from pajamas - glittered on the catwalk."
"The second suit is more dazzling, but it's still eye-catching."
"She also wore a pair of tight trousers, a belt covered with purple leather, and a pair of marble boots."
"She's wearing eye-catching earrings and a stylish hat as part of her collection."
"The completely transparent material showed everyone her chest."
"In the show, Bella once wore a navy blue bedspread top, which was unimaginable."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That also means the due date is somewhere around mid-November.”
“Based on the womb snapshot, taken April 23, X's gf was just over 8 weeks along back then -- so, she's about 4 months pregnant now.”
“As we reported ... Cleopatra posted the sonogram with the caption, "He left us a final gift."”
“We're told the ultrasound photo shared by X's mother, Cleopatra Bernard, is definitely the girlfriend's.”
“Sources close to the rapper tell TMZ ... X's girlfriend -- whom he'd been dating for months -- is the mystery baby mama.”
“EXCLUSIVEXXXTentacion's legion of fans might be shocked by the baby news his mom dropped, but it wouldn't have been a surprise to him -- he knew weeks ago.”


"It also means that the due date is around mid November."
"According to a snapshot of the uterus taken on April 23, X's girlfriend was just over eight weeks old - so she's now four months pregnant."
"As we reported... Cleopatra posted an ultrasound image that said, "he left us the last gift."
"We were told that X's mother, Cleopatra Bernard, must have shared an ultrasound photo with her girlfriend."
"Sources close to rappers tell TMZ... X's girlfriend - he's been dating her for months - is the mysterious baby mother. "
"A large number of fans of exclusive parentacion may be shocked by his mother's announcement of the baby, but it's no surprise to him - he knew it weeks ago."



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’ll see.”— Erin Biglow...”
““I haven’t yet felt the need to make a career out of it,” she said.”
“PHOTOS: Hollywood Dads & Their KidsHowever, she isn’t ruling it out completely, either.”
“Although her multi-threat talents are on increasing display, Paris said she’s not quite ready to follow in her late father’s musical footsteps — despite being able to sing and play multiple instruments.”
““I guess the recurring theme was that I wanted to make a difference,” she said.”
“According to the mag, she grew up with dreams of becoming a vet, nurse and even an astronaut.”
“Taking social action is a characteristic that’s reportedly been a staple for Paris since she was a little girl.”
“Paris has also made a name for herself through speaking out publicly on multiple political issues, from the controversial Dakota Access Pipeline to climate change legislation.”
“READ: Paris Jackson Signs With Top Modeling Agency: ‘I Feel Very Lucky’“I think it’s important to show our youth that one shouldn’t compare another’s highlight reel to their own behind-the-scenes,” she said.”
“But, the starlet told VF why she’s also focused on staying balanced in a fame-obsessed culture, and hopes to project those values.”


"We'll see." - Irene Bigelow
"I haven't felt the need to get a career out of it yet," she said
"Photo: Hollywood dads and their children used to, and she didn't completely rule it out."
Paris said that although her multi threat talents have been more and more displayed, she is not fully ready to follow her late father's music - even though she can sing and play a variety of instruments
"I think the recurring theme is that I want to make a difference," she said
As a child, she dreamed of becoming a vet, nurse and even astronaut, according to the magazine
"Taking social action is a feature, which is reported to be a major Paris because she is a little girl."
"Paris has also made its name on a number of political issues, from the controversial access pipeline in Dakota to climate change legislation."
"Interpretation: Paris Jackson signed a contract with a top model agency:" I feel very lucky, "she said." I think it's important to show our young people that one shouldn't compare another's highlights with one's own behind the scenes. "
"But the little star told VF why she also focused on maintaining balance in a culture obsessed with fame and wealth, and wanted to project these values."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They need to have a sense that their own is meaningful and important.”
“Upon hearing the suggestion that his three children, Jennifer, Phoebe, and Rory, would receive $10 million each in his absence, Gates was quick to shut down talk of a substantial inheritance, saying, “They won’t have anything like that.”
“The father of four is the proud papa of daughters Megan and Matilda as well as teenage twins Jack and Holly, but don’t be confused – Ramsay plans on leaving absolutely nothing to his kiddos in his will.”
“Of course, that money didn’t just fall out of the sky and the sassy chef turned reality star worked his tail off in order to acquire all of his monetary gains.”
“Mommy and Daddy have a bank account.”19 Gordon Ramsay Refuses To Raise Trust-Fund KidsWith a hearty net-worth of around $54 million, it’s safe to say that Gordon Ramsay is pretty rich in his own right.”
“You are very poor, you have nothing.”
“...you re poor...”
“Nothing s been handed to us The actress made it quite clear that them from a very early age that her kids won t be entitled to any of their famous parents s earnings and even said that she sometimes tells them Mommy and Daddy may have a dollar but...”
“According to Kunis, teaching her little ones about how hard work pays off is “so important because we both came from pretty solid poverty backgrounds and grew up very poor and are very much self-made and are very aware of what a dollar is worth.”
“Ranking high up on their list, the couple vowed to not allow their kids to become spoiled brats, and that meant not letting them leech off of their parent’s wealth.”


"They need to have a sense that their own ideas are meaningful and important."
"Hearing that his three children, Jennifer, Phoebe and Rory, were advised to get $10 million each in his absence, gates quickly dismissed the claim of a huge legacy, saying," they won't have such a thing. "
"The father of the four children is the proud father of daughters Megan and Matilda and teenage twins Jack and holly, but don't get confused - Ramsey plans to leave absolutely nothing in his will."
"Of course, the money didn't come from the sky. The reality TV star, who was born as a fashionable chef, worked hard to get all the money."
"Mom and dad have a bank account." Gordon Ramsey refused to raise a trust fund for children with $54 million in assets, and to be sure, Gordon Ramsey himself is quite rich
"You are poor and have nothing."
“… You are poor... "
"We didn't get anything. The actress told them very clearly that her children had no right to receive any income from their famous parents from a very young age. She even said that sometimes she told them that their parents might have a dollar, but..."
According to Kunis, it's "very important to teach her children how to work hard, because we all come from a very solid background of poverty, very poor since childhood, very independent, very clear about the value of a dollar."
The couple are at the top of the list, vowing not to let their children be spoiled, which means not to let them squeeze money from their parents' wealth



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Farrow named Blanchett (and a few other actresses) specifically when pointing out what was, in her view, an incongruity between defending Woody Allen while also declaring that “Time’s Up.”This article has been updated.”
“Dylan’s older brother Moses has said that he witnessed their mother doing exactly that—relentlessly coaching Dylan, trying to drum into her that her father was a dangerous sexual predator.”
“For years, Farrow has claimed that Allen sexually abused her when she was a child.”
“(Allen has denied the claims.)”
“Numerous actresses—Greta Gerwig, Rebecca Hall, Ellen Page, Rachel Brosnahan, Kate Winslet—and actors—Colin Firth, Michael Caine, Timothée Chalamet—who collaborated with Allen in the past have publicly spoken out against the director in recent months.”
“But one actress, Allen’s Oscar-winning Blue Jasmine leading lady Cate Blanchett, isn’t quite as ready to step away.”
“In a new interview with CNN’s Christiane Amanpour, Blanchett said that social media—the birthplace of these hashtag social-justice movements—is “not the judge and jury” when it comes to Allen.”
“In the wake of the Time’s Up movement, Dylan Farrow has been emboldened to share her story more publicly and more often, prompting journalists such as Amanpour to press former- and current-Allen collaborators for their take on the director.”
“Amanpour questioned Blanchett, saying: “How do you juxtapose being a #MeToo proponent, a Time’s Up proponent, and staying silent or having worked with Woody Allen?” She also asked if Blanchett would work with Allen again, given the allegations.”
“The actress responded:I don’t think I’ve stayed silent at all.”


Farrow specifically named Blanchett (and other actresses), pointing out that in her view, while defending Woody Allen, she also declared that "time is up." This article has been updated
"Dylan's brother Moses said he saw their mother guide Dylan mercilessly, trying to convince her that her father was a dangerous sex offender."
"For years, Farrow has claimed that Allen sexually abused her when she was a child."
"(Allen denies that.)
"In recent months, many actresses, such as Greta gweger, Rebecca hall, Ellen Page, Rachel brosnahan, Kate Winslet, as well as actors who have worked with Ellen in the past, such as Colin Firth, Michael Kane and Timothy chalamit, have publicly expressed their opposition to the director."
"But one actress, Ellen's Oscar best actress, Kate Blanchett, is not ready to leave."
In a recent interview with CNN's Christian AMANPOUR, Blanchett said social media, the birthplace of the social justice movement, is "not a judge or jury" when it comes to Allen
"With the rise of time, Dylan Farrow boldly shared his story more openly and more frequently, prompting reporters such as AMANPOUR to pressure Allen's former and current collaborators to accept the director."
AMANPOUR asked Blanchett, "how do you juxtapose yourself with Woody Allen, keep silent as a supporter of" my supporter, time's up, "or work with Woody Allen? "Given the charges, she also asked Blanchett if she would work with Allen again."
"The actress replied," I don't know. "I don't think I kept silent at all."



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhy do you think Taylor's been hiding from the public eye?”
“...magazine has obtained the firs photographs of the singer after three months in hiding.”
“Undercover paparazzi snapped photographs of Swift at home in Nashville to see her mom on Mother's Day after retreating from the spotlight in the wake of feuds and break-ups.”
“This is the first time we've seen T. Swizzle since she performed at a Super Bowl weekend concert a few months back.”
“It's unclear why she's been underground, but at least the starlet appears happy...well, sorta.”
“Click through and let us know what you think!”
“Article continues below advertisementShe took a break from her hermit status and hopped on a private jet to show her mother some love.”
“Swift kept things casual in lose-fitted clothing, and at one point she was spotted in shorts so tiny they looked like underwear.”
“Peek-a-boo Tay's booty!”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Source: BACKGROUND: why do you think Taylor has been hiding from the public?"
“…… The magazine got the singer's first picture after three months of hiding
"The secret paparazzi took pictures of Swift's home in Nashville and went to see her mother on Mother's day after she was out of the spotlight because of discord and breakup."
"This is the first time we've seen T. Swizzle since she performed at the Super Bowl Weekend concert a few months ago."
"It's not clear why she's underground, but at least the little star looks happy Well, sort of
"Click here and let us know what you think!"
"The article goes on to say in the following advertisement that she was released from seclusion and jumped on a private plane to express her love to her mother."
"Swift was wearing clothes that didn't fit, which made people feel very casual. Once, people found that her shorts were very small and looked like underwear."
"The booty of hide and seek!"



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Know that all gods children are beautiful, Tall, short thick or thin," he tweeted last month.”
“I've already adressed (sic) my medical issues... A grown woman was gossiping bout me w I have a eating disorder telling people I need to eat 5 cheeseburgers cause I look like I'm dying."”
“The 29-year-old pop star was pulled over by Habersham County sheriffs after driving erratically in Georgia Saturday night, TMZ reports.”
“He refused to submit to a breathalyzer or blood and urine testing for driving under the influence, and was charged on suspicion of DUI, possession of marijuana, and possession of drug-related objects.”
“According to the celebrity gossip site, Carter's girlfriend Madison Parker, who was also in the car, has also been arrested.”
“Hours before his arrest, Carter told fans on Twitter he would be unable to make a concert in Kansas City due to "transportation issues."”
“The New York Daily News reports the couple was still in custody as of Sunday morning.”
“The incident follows a dramatic episode three weeks ago where he checked himself into the emergency room at St. Joseph's Hospital in Syracuse, hinting he needed treatment for exhaustion.”
“Carter posted photos of himself smiling in a hospital bed and wheelchair for "a little check up" after performing "lots of shows lately."”
“Pop singer Aaron Carter shared this photo of himself at St. Joseph's Hospital in Syracuse after performing at a HOT 107.9 concert Thursday, June 22, 2017.”


"All prodigies are beautiful, tall, short, thick or thin," he said on his microblog last month
"I've solved my medical problems... An adult woman was chatting about my eating disorder. She told people I needed five cheeseburgers because I looked like I was dying
According to TMZ, the 29 year old pop star was stopped by Habersham County sheriff on Saturday night after driving irregularly in Georgia
"He refused to undergo an alcohol test or a blood and urine test for drunk driving and was charged with suspected drunk driving, possession of marijuana and possession of drug-related substances."
"According to the celebrity gossip website, Carter's girlfriend Madison Parker was also in the car and she was arrested."
Hours before his arrest, Carter tweeted to fans that he would not be able to hold a concert in Kansas City because of "traffic problems."
"As of Sunday morning, the couple were still in custody," the New York Daily News reported
Three weeks ago, he had an examination in the emergency room of St. Joseph's Hospital in Syracuse, suggesting that he was exhausted and needed treatment
Carter posted photos of himself smiling on his bed and wheelchair for a "mini check-up" after "a lot of shows recently"
"Pop singer Aaron Carter shared this photo of himself at St. Joseph's Hospital in Syracuse after performing at the 107.9 concert on Thursday, June 22, 2017."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1 hit in the United States in 2016.”
““After hours of begging him for scraps of honesty, I chipped away just enough to confirm that this is not the first time he’s remorsely [sic] cheated on me,” she wrote in another post, listing some of the other women she had questioned him about.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Alex Pall of The Chainsmokers fame found himself in hot water on Tuesday when his girlfriend Tori Woodward shared photos she alleges are of him kissing another girl Alex Pall the Grammy winning deejay who is one half of the powerhouse EDM pop duo The Chainsmokers found himself in hot...”
“...water on Tuesday when his now ex girlfriend Tori Woodward shared photos she alleges are of him kissing another girl...”
“The pictures of Pall’s apparent indiscretion were captured at a residential location by CCTV and posted to Woodward’s Instagram Stories in a series of snaps — each with a series of savage messages thrown his way.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Alex is disgusting.”
“Men are trash.”
“Don’t ever forget it,” Woodward wrote on one of the surveillance shots, which Woodward later accused Pall of reporting to Instagram after it was deleted by the social network site.”


"There was one success in the United States in 2016."
"I've been begging him for hours to tell me the truth, but in the end I swore that it wasn't the first time he had been unfaithful to me," she wrote in another blog post
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"On Tuesday, Alex Parr of chain smokers found himself in trouble. His girlfriend Tori Woodward shared a picture of him kissing another girl. Alex pall is a Grammy winner deejay, and deejay is a member of chain smokers
“…… On Tuesday, his current ex girlfriend, Tori Woodward, shared what she claimed was a picture of him kissing another girl... "
"Bauer's apparently indecent photos were taken by CCTV in a residential area and published in the form of a series of snapshots in Woodward's instagram story - each with a series of savage messages
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Alex is disgusting."
"Men are rubbish."
"Don't forget that," Woodward wrote in one of the surveillance photos. Woodward later accused Parr of reporting to instagram after being deleted by social networking site instagram



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MULLALLY: The concept of the book was that we would have nine chapters on various topics.”
“The flow is very natural, in that the conversations turn incredibly weird.”
“MULLALLY: The photos look so good.”
“When you actually see them in action — this physical artifact — there’s something magical about that.”
“NICK OFFERMAN: It’s really fun when you envision a book and write it, and in this case, we shot these amazing photos that Megan designed.”
“The paper is really fancy and nice.”
“The paper — if I was reading this book and turning each page, I think it’d be pleasurable.”
“The book was so beautiful.”
“MEGAN MULLALLY: They looked beautiful.”
“ENTERTAINMENT WEEKLY: What was that moment like, when you got the final copies?”


"Mulally: the concept of this book is that we will have nine different thematic chapters."
"This flow is very natural, because the conversation becomes very strange."
"Mulally: it looks good."
"When you really see them in action - it's a physical relic - it's kind of magical."
"Nick Overman: it's really fun to imagine a book and write it down. In this case, we took these amazing pictures designed by Megan."
"This is a beautiful piece of paper."
"Newspaper - if I read this book and look at every page, I would have a good time."
"This book is so beautiful."
"Megan Mulally: they look beautiful."
Entertainment Weekly: what was it like when you got your last book? "



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll down and relive the home renovators’ best quotes about family and parenthood!”
“Since then, the Magnolia Market owners have teased interest in growing their family.”
“#5 #7ThePerfectNumber.”The husband and wife duo announced in October that season 5 of their HGTV show, Fixer Upper, would be its last so they can focus on raising their four children, Drake, 12, Ella, 11, Duke, 9, and Emmie, 7.”
“And I could not be more EXCITED!”
““And they put on a little too romantic of a concert .. anyways, one thing led to another, & we are officially pregnant.”
““You might recall a few months back .. the ever amazing, ever romantic @JOHNNYSWIM was in Waco,” he wrote.”
“Chip, 43, later revealed in a hilarious tweet on Tuesday that a romantic date night with his wife prompted her pregnancy.”
“As previously reported, the couple announced the happy news via Instagram on Tuesday, January 2.”
“Chip and Joanna Gaines will soon be expanding their brood and welcoming their fifth child together.”
“Baby on board!”


"Scroll down and review the best quotes of home decorators about family and parenthood!"
"Since then, the owners of Mulan market have joked that they are very interested in family development."
"Five by seven is the perfect number." The couple announced in October that the fifth season of their HGTV show "fix upper" will be the last, so they can focus on raising their four children, Drake, 12, Ella, 11, Duke, 9 and Amy, 7
"I can't be more excited!"
"They put on a concert that was a little too romantic.".. In short, one thing leads to another & we're officially pregnant. "
"You may remember a few months ago.. "The once amazing, once romantic Johannes VIM is in Waco," he wrote
"Chip, 43, later revealed on a funny microblog on Tuesday that her romantic date night with his wife made her pregnant."
"As previously reported, the couple announced the good news through instagram on Tuesday, January 2."
"Chip and Joanna Gaines will soon expand their parenting to meet their fifth child."
"Baby's on the boat!"



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Avengers Infinity War The Ballad of Buster Scruggs Black Panther Mission Impossible Fallout RELATED VIDEO”
“GLOW The Kominsky Method The Marvelous Mrs Maisel Outstanding Action Performance by a Stunt Ensemble in a Comedy or Drama Series Glow Marvel s Daredevil Tom Clancy s Jack Ryan The Walking Dead Westworld Outstanding Action Performance by a Stunt Ensemble in a Motion Picture Ant Man and the Wasp...”
“Lady Gaga and Bradley Cooper’s “A Star Is Born” led film nominations with four nods, including best actor for Cooper, best actress for Gaga, best ensemble, and best supporting actor for Sam Elliott.”
““BlacKkKlansman” and “The Favourite” followed close behind, both taking home a trio of nods.”
“On the small screen, “The Marvelous Mrs. Maisel,” and “Ozark” topped TV superlatives with a quartet of nominations apiece, followed by “Barry,” “GLOW,” “The Handmaid’s Tale,” and “The Kominsky Method,” scoring three nominations each.”
“Awkwafina and Laverne Cox announced nominations live from the Pacific Design Center in West Hollywood, Calif. SAG-AFTRA president Gabrielle Carteris introduced the presenters, who revealed nominations for acting in television and film.”
“Prior to that, SAG Awards committee chair JoBeth Williams and committee member Elizabeth McLaughlin revealed this year’s stunt ensemble nominees.”
“The 25th Annual SAG Awards ceremony will be simulcast live on TNT and TBS on Jan. 27 at 8 p.m. ET/PT.”
“Kristen Bell was the SAG Awards first-ever host last year, though an emcee has not been announced yet for the 2019 incarnation.”
“Here is the full list of nominations Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Leading Role Christian Bale Vice Bradley Cooper A Star Is Born Rami Malek Bohemian Rhapsody Viggo Mortensen Green Book John David Washington BlacKkKlansman Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role Emily Blunt...”


Avenger Infinite War: Buster Scrooges's Ballad: the impossible radiation related video of the Panther mission
"Brilliant kominsky method magical lady Messer outstanding action performance stunt ensemble in comedy or drama series brilliant miracle adventurer Tom Clancy's Jack Ryan walking dead west world outstanding action performance stunt ensemble in movie ant man and wasp..."
"Lady Gaga and Bradley Cooper's star comes led the movie nominations with four nominations, including Cooper's best actor, Gaga's best actress, best ensemble and Sam Eliot's best supporting actor."
"Blake Lansman" and "the most popular" followed, both receiving three nods
"On the small screen," the great lady Messer "and" ozak "topped the list of TV's most advanced films with four nominations respectively, followed by" Barry "," glow "," the maid's story "and" the kominsky method "with three nominations each."
Awkwafina and Laverne Cox announced nominations from the Pacific Design Center in West Hollywood, California. Gabrielle carteris, President of sag-aftraa, introduced the hosts and revealed their nominations in TV and movies.
Prior to that, sabeth Williams, chairman of the sag awards committee, and Elizabeth McLaughlin, member of the committee, revealed the nominations for this year's stunt ensemble
"The 25th sag annual awards ceremony will be broadcast live in TNT and TBS at 8 p.m. EST on January 27."
"Christine bell hosted the sag awards ceremony for the first time last year, but the host of the 2019 awards ceremony has not yet been announced."
"Here's a list of nominations for an actor to star in Christian Bale and Bradley Cooper, a star born rami Malek Bohemian Rhapsody Viggo Mortensen's green paper John David Washington Blackklansman) in the actress's excellent performance, a leading actress Emily cloth



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Jason Merritt/Getty Images]”
“They had crazy fights and wouldn’t speak for a bit.”
“The actress took all six children for the trip and finally talked about the split for the first time.”
“Jolie was spotted in Cambodia promoting her film, First They Killed My Father, in February.”
“The situation didn’t turn around until 2016 came to a close.”
“To make matters worse, the two were fighting a nasty custody battle that granted Pitt only supervised visits with his six children.”
“Every so often, Angelina threatened divorce, but in Brad’s eyes, their lives were stressful because they were raising six kids, things were always going to work out.”Pitt was eventually cleared of the abuse allegations, but not before suffering significant damage to his public image.”
““But, no matter how bad it got, Brad, especially, was never planning on walking away.”
“They would take some time apart, go on location, calm down and miss each other,” an insider shared.”
““Things had been volatile in their relationship for a little while.”


"[Jason Merritt / Getty pictures]
"They were so noisy that they wouldn't say a word."
"The actress took all six children on a trip and talked about breaking up for the first time."
"Julie was found promoting her film in Cambodia. The first one was that they killed my father in February."
"It wasn't until the end of 2016 that things got better."
"To make matters worse, the two are in a fierce custody fight. Pete can only take six children to see them."
"Angelina often threatens divorce, but in Brad's eyes, their lives are very stressful because they have to raise six children, and things will come to an end." Pitt was eventually charged with abuse, but that was not the case until his public image was seriously damaged
"But no matter how bad the situation, especially Brad, never intended to leave."
"They will be separated for a period of time, go on location, calm down and miss each other," a person familiar with the matter said
"There was a period of instability in their relationship."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The group, which additionally consists of the likes of Oscar Isaac (Poe), John Boyega (Finn), Gwendoline Christie (Captain Phasma), have appeared at fan conventions, film premieres, speak exhibits and different occasions.”
“Hundreds of delighted followers have flocked to venues in locations like Japan, Florida and California to catch a glimpse of their favourite Star Wars stars, particularly once they work together with one another.”
“Daisy Ridley (Rey), Adam Driver (Kylo Ren), Mark Hamill (Luke Skywalker) and lots of different members of the forged, in addition to director Rian Johnson, have been touring everywhere in the world to advertise the movie, the anticipated second a part of a 3rd trilogy.”
“Simply kidding!”


The group also includes Poe, Finn and captain phasma, and has attended fan conferences, film premieres, speech exhibitions and various occasions
Hundreds of fans flocked to Japan, Florida and California to watch their favorite star wars stars, especially when they worked together
"Daisy Ridley (Ray), Adam derev (Kello Allen), Mark Hamill (Luke Skywalker) and many different forger members, with the exception of director Ryan Johnson, have toured around the world to advertise the film, and the second film is expected to be part of the third trilogy."
"I'm kidding!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“On Monday, Robert Pattinson was in attendance for the 27th Annual IFP Gotham Awards in New York City where he was nominated for his new film "Good Time."”
“But before he headed straight for the prestigious event, the 31-year-old actor lounged around the red carpet and dished about his experiences with an entirely different film: The "Twilight" saga.”
“It had been five years since the final "Twilight" film had been released, "Twilight: Breaking Dawn Part Two," and in an interview with E!”
“News, the actor was reminded of this event and he could only share how "amazing" of an experience it was for him to be involved in such a film.”
“"It's all fond memories," Pattinson remarked about filming the "Twilight" movies.”
“"I mean it's almost more fond the further away you get from it ... it's just such a magical way to spend your 20s."”
“"I mean it's completely crazy.”
“I still haven't really processed it.”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
On Monday, Robert Pattinson attended the 27th IFP Gotham awards in New York City, where he was nominated for his new film "good time."
But before he made his way to the event, the 31 year old actor strolled on the red carpet, telling about his experience in a completely different film, twilight
"It's been five years since twilight's last movie, Twilight: the second part of dawn, was released. It's been accepting e!"
"As soon as the news came out, the actor remembered it. He could only share how amazing his experience of participating in such a film was."
"It's all good memories," Pattinson said of filming twilight
"I mean, the farther away from it, the more lovely it is... It's a fantastic way to spend your 20s. "
"I mean it's crazy."
"I haven't really dealt with it yet."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“POPULAR ON VARIETY:”
“Additional cast members include Issa Rae, Regina Hall, Russell Hornsby, Algee Smith, Lamar Johnson, and Common.”
““Due to the controversy surrounding his past comments and behavior, Kian Lawley will no longer appear in ‘The Hate U Give.’ The studio plans to recast the role of Chris and reshoot scenes as needed,” a spokesperson for Twentieth Century Fox Films told Variety.”
“In the clip, Lawley is heard using the N-word and other racial slurs.”
““We’re all black drinking purple Kool-aid and eating Kentucky fried motherf—king chicken,” he says.”
“[The video contains offensive language and can be seen in full here.]”
“Lawley apologized on Monday night for his actions.”
““Words have power and can do damage.”
“I own mine and I am sorry.”
“I respect Fox’s decision to recast this role for ‘The Hate U Give’ as it is an important story, and it would not be appropriate for me to be involved considering the actions of my past.”


Popular variety shows:
Other actors include Issa ray, Regina hall, Russell Hornsby, Archie Smith, Lamar Johnson and common
A 20th Century Fox spokesman told variety magazine: "due to the controversy over Chris's past speech and behavior, Kian Laurie will no longer play hate you. The studio plans to reshape Chris's character and remake the scene as needed. "
"In this video, people hear Laurie using the word n and other racial insults."
"We're all black, drinking purple coke and eating KFC fried chicken," he said
"[the video contains offensive language, you can see the full text here. ]”
"Laurie apologized for his behavior on Monday night."
"Words are powerful and can cause harm."
"I have mine. I'm sorry."
"I respect Fox's decision to change the role to 'hate you give' because it's an important story, and I'm not fit to be part of it considering my past behavior."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“American Horror Story just isn’t the same without Frances Conroy.”
“She says that the women of S.C.U.M.”
“In Season 5, however, American Horror Story itself showed the “Zodiac Killer” on Devil’s Night, when a group of serial killer spirits gathered at the Hotel Cortez to hang out with James March (Evan Peters)—indicating that in the A.H.S.”
“According to Bebe’s story, one of two gay men within S.C.U.M.’s ranks was the one who sent letters to the press claiming to be the Zodiac Killer.”
“...universe.”
“This is where the story gets interesting—and potentially problematic for the A.H.S.”
“...are real; the murders, probably, are not.)”
“(Solanas and S.C.U.M.”
“...committed several grisly murders—all of which got attributed to the Zodiac Killer.”
“Beverly brings Bebe to meet with the other women in the cult, where Bebe tells them all about her time with Valerie—who, according to Bebe, formed a cult of her own.”


"Without Francis Conroy, America's horror story would be different."
"She said the women of s.c.u.m."
However, in season 5, the American horror story itself shows the "Zodiac killer" of devil's night, with a group of serial killer ghosts gathering at the Cortes hotel with James March (Evan Peters) - which shows that in a.h.s
"According to Beibei's story, one of the two gay men in s.c.u.m.'s team sent a letter to the media claiming that he was a Zodiac killer."
The universe
"That's what makes the story interesting, and it could be a problem for the U.S. Department of health."
“…… It's true; murder, it may not be true. "
"(Solanas and s.c.u.m.)
“…… Several terrible murders have been committed, all of which are attributed to the zodiac killer
"Beverly takes Beverly to see other women in the cult. Beverly tells them about her time with Valerie. According to Beverly, Valerie is her own cult."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hence, when a new threat is unleashed on Central City, Barry must act as the team leader, while Iris takes over as a speedster in order to defeat their new foe.”
“During a battle with the team, Matthew transfers Barry’s (Grant Gustin) super speed to Iris, giving her the powers of the Flash.”
“Otherwise known as Melting Pot, the meta has the ability to swap people’s DNA.”
“In the upcoming March 13 episode, Team Flash confronts a new bus meta, Matthew (Leonardo Nam).”
“As EW previously teased , Iris (Candice Patton) will be temporarily suiting up on The Flash — and now we know why!”


"So when a new threat is released to the central city, Barry has to be captain, while iris is a speed division to defeat their new enemy."
"In a battle with the team, Matthew passes the super speed of Barry (Grant Gustin) to iris, giving her flash power."
"Meta, also known as the melting pot, has the ability to exchange human DNA."
"In the upcoming episode on March 13, the flash team will face a new bus player, Matthew (Leonardo Nan),"
"As EW has made fun of before, Iris (Candice Barton) will wear flashlight for the time being - now we know why!"



**Something goes wrong**
“The youngest member of the Kardashian/Jenner family did not go public with her pregnancy until after she had given birth.”
“While sister Khloe is letting the world in on the shower via social media, Kylie opted to have a very private baby shower in November.”
“After posting the snuggly Snapchat, Kylie and Jordan headed over to the Hotel Bel-Air to celebrate 's baby shower.”
“Oh the video, Ky wrote, "Can they get any cuter?"”
“And judging from the video, it looks like Stormi and Jordan have quite the bond with each other.”
“Ever since Kylie welcomed her first child on Feb. 1 her best gal pal has been constantly by her side helping out.”
“It's pretty clear that the first-time mom is over the moon about her little bundle of love.”
“...enlisted the help of her BFF for a snuggle sash with her newborn daughterThe 20-year-old posted a video of the cuddly twosome on her Snapchat on Saturday.”
“They're too cute!”
“Aww!”


"The youngest member of the Kardashian / Jenner family was not publicly pregnant until after childbirth."
"When sister Khloe let the world bathe through social media, Kelly chose to hold a very private baby shower in November."
After the release of the snapshot chat, Kelly and Jordan went to the Bel Air Hotel to celebrate the baby's bath
"Oh, video," ki wrote, "can they be a little more cute?"
"From the video, it seems that Tommy and Jordan have a very deep relationship."
"Since Kelly welcomed her first child on February 1, her best girlfriend has been helping her."
"It's obvious that this fledgling mother is very excited about her little bundle of love."
“… With the help of her boyfriend, she and her newborn daughter made a girdle. The 20-year-old released a video about the lovely couple on snapchat on Saturday
"They are so lovely!"
"Ah



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“NASA has confirmed that the movie will be available aboard the ISS in the near future.”
““[I] can confirm the crew will be able to watch it on orbit,” NASA Public Affairs Officer Dan Huot told Inverse, after a spaceflight reporter tweeted the news.”
““Don’t have a definitive timeline yet.”
“They typically get movies as digital files and can play them back on a laptop or a standard projector that is currently aboard As The Verge reports astronauts often enjoy movies on the ISS with access to a digital library that includes space classics such as 2001 A Space Odyssey...”
“...and Aliens...”
“Star Wars: The Last Jedi opens on Friday.”
“Hopefully, the astronauts can watch it shortly thereafter and avoid spoilers from us earthlings.”
“Get The Brief.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"NASA has confirmed that the film will be on the international space station in the near future."
"I can confirm that the crew will be able to watch it in orbit," Dan Huot, a public affairs officer at NASA, told inverse magazine after tweeting the news to an aerospace reporter
"There is no definite timetable."
"They usually get movies in the form of digital files, which can be played back on laptops or standard projectors currently on board. As verge reported, astronauts often enjoy movies on the international space station, and can visit the digital library, including space classics such as 2001's" Space Odyssey "...."
“… And aliens... "
Star Wars: the last Jedi will be released on Friday
"I hope the astronauts can see it soon and avoid the destruction of us on earth."
"Get the briefing."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET.”
“...at 8 p.m.”
“Hollywood Medium returns on Wednesday, May 17, on E!”
““Even if we think we know what happened there’s still some elements of unknown.”Watch Farley’s reaction and more in the video above.”
““I know you mentioned that this was an accident, but there seems to be a feeling — a questioning about how this individual was found,” he says.”
““It was an accidental, unexpected death.”Still, Henry goes on to suggest that something about the tragedy seems off.”
““It’s devastating because of the nature of how old this individual was when they died.”“To my knowledge it was an accident,” Farley says.”
““There’s an acknowledgement of basically an individual who did not even get to live to middle age and the feeling that is coming across is basically — I’m viewing this as a tragedy,” Henry says in the clip.”
“The psychic confirms that the death was an accident and occurred in early July.”
“During their sit-down, Henry, 21, connects the Jersey Shore alum, 31, to her husband Roger Mathews‘ late friend.”


"Wait a minute."
“… Eight o'clock in the evening. "
"Hollywood media will be in E on Wednesday, May 17!"
"Even if we think we know what happened, there are still some unknowns." Watch Farley's reaction and more in the above video
"I know you mentioned it as an accident, but there seems to be a sense of doubt about how this person was discovered," he said
"It was an accidental, accidental death." Nevertheless, Henry continued to hint that there seemed to be something wrong with the tragedy
"It's devastating because of how old the man was when they died." "As far as I know, it was an accident," Farley said
Henry said in the clip: "people basically admit that a person who can't even live in middle age, and now the feeling is basically - I think it's a tragedy."
"The psychic confirmed that the death was an accident and took place in early July."
"As they sat down, Henry, 21, connected his 31 year old Jersey coast alumni with the late friend of her husband, Roger Matthews."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s just a fun girl to hang out with.””
““But Nicollette is great, she is a great girl.”
““We were pretty removed from the court case,” added Longoria.”
“...in a high profile wrongful termination lawsuit...”
“There was no bad blood I think that was just the way it was RELATED Teri Hatcher Is Desperate For A Desperate Housewives Revival During the same interview Longoria also denied that her friendship with former Housewives co star Nicollette Sheridan was impacted when she sued series creator Marc Cherry...”
“Teri didn’t.”
““Me and Marcia and Felicity were a lot closer because we are just girlie girls who like to be in each other’s company.”
““You know, Teri [Hatcher] was just a loner,” she told the magazine.”
“...magazine (via Digital Spy) may shed light on the matter.”
““But 99 per cent of us are.”While Longoria didn’t mention the name of the “Desperate Housewives” star on the receiving end of her shade-throwing, a 2012 interview she gave to OK!”


"She's just an interesting girl."
"But nicolt is great. She's a great girl."
Longoria added: "we have been removed from the court."
“… In a dramatic miscarriage of justice... "
"No bad blood, I think it's just the way it's relevant that Teri Hatcher is desperate for desperate housewives to resurrect. In the same interview, Longoria also denied that her friendship with former housewives co starring Nicole Wright Sheridan was affected when she sued series creator mark cherry..."
"Terry didn't."
"I got closer to Marcia and felicity because we're just girls who like to be with each other."
"You know, Teri (Hatcher) is just a lonely person," she told the magazine
“… Magazines (through digital espionage) may reveal that. "
"But 99 percent of people do." Although Longoria didn't mention the name of the "desperate housewife" star on the audience side of cast the shade, she gave an interview in 2012



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Tony Awards are presented by The Broadway League and the American Theatre Wing.”
“The Tony Awards, which honors theatre professionals for distinguished achievement on Broadway, has been broadcast on CBS since 1978.”
“Visit CBS.com/allaccess for details).”
“(Live stream is available in select markets.”
“Or stream the Tony Awards live across platforms with the CBS All Access subscription service.”
“The American Theatre Wing’s 2019 Tony Awards, hosted by James Corden, will be broadcast live on Sunday, June 9, 2019 (8:00 – 11:00 p.m. ET/delayed PT) on the CBS Television Network from Radio City Music Hall in New York City.”
“We’ll announce details later this spring, including information about the Red Carpet and other live coverage.”
“Long before the curtain goes up on the big night, viewers can follow the @TheTonyAwards on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, and Snapchat.”
“OTHER LIVE COVERAGEEven if your country or region isn’t listed, Tonys fans may watch live coverage of Tony Awards events here at TonyAwards.com and on social media.”
“All information is subject to change.”


"The Tony Award is presented by the Broadway League and the American theater wing."
The Tony Awards, which have been broadcast on CBS since 1978, are designed to honor outstanding Broadway drama professionals
"Visit CBS.com/allaccess Please refer to
"Some markets offer real-time streaming."
"Or use CBS all access subscription service to live the Tony Awards across platforms."
"The American theater wing's 2019 Tony Awards, hosted by James cordon, will be broadcast live on Sunday, June 9, 2019 (8:00 – 11:00 pm ET) at the Radio City Music Hall of New York City on CBS television network
"We will release details later this spring, including information about the red carpet and other live coverage."
"Audiences can follow @ the Tony Awards on Facebook, twitter, instagram and snapchat long before the big night starts."
"Other live broadcasts even if your country or region is not listed, Tony fans can watch the live broadcast of Tony Awards activities here TonyAwards.com The site is on social media. "
"All information is subject to change."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shop some of our favorites—most of which are on sale!—right this way.”
“Whether you’re going full-on 2000s with a tube top, prefer an off-the-shoulder style, or want something a little less cropped, we’re kind of loving the smocked texture right now.”
“Bella paired her topknot and Aviator sunglasses with the memorable summer wardrobe staple while on vacation this past weekend.”
“The ‘00s are next up, complete with Juicy Couture tracksuits, the next generation of Ugg boots, and—according to Bella Hadid—the smocked tube top.”
“It seems there’s a new decade coming back with fervor, though.”
“The ‘90s have gotten quite a workout lately, from slip dresses to chokers, bomber jackets and mom jeans.”


"Buy some of our favorites, most of them are on sale! -This way
"Whether you're looking for a 2000's tube top, a shoulder down style, or a less tailored dress, we all like the smoky texture a little bit now."
"Last weekend, when Bella was on holiday, she paired her top knot sunglasses and Pilot Sunglasses with her unforgettable summer staple glasses."
"The '00s is the next generation, with juicy fashion sportswear, the next generation of ugg boots, and Bella Hadid's smoky top."
"But it seems that the new decade is coming back with passion."
"People in the '90s have been exercising well lately, from casual wear to necklaces, baseball suits and mom's jeans."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Nonetheless, his mom did seem to consider it an adjustment.”
“...for Barron upon his arrival in Washington...”
“CNN noted that the Trumps broke with “presidential pet tradition” by not adding an animal to the household.”
“He doesn’t have a pet at the White HouseWhile many first children have had pets at the White House, Barron Trump doesn’t.”
“8.”
“Next: Unlike other first kids, he doesn’t own one of these.”
“Barron Trump, too, is Donald Trump’s youngest child.”
“News explains, all of the sons who were young enough to live in the White House over the past century, such as John Aspinwall Roosevelt, were the youngest of their siblings.”
“As E!”
“Yet Barron does have a surprising characteristic in common with other presidential sons.”


"Even so, his mother thinks it's an adjustment."
“…… When Barron arrived in Washington... "
"CNN noticed that the trumps broke the" presidential pet tradition "and did not add animals at home
"He didn't have a pet in the White House, a lot of the first generation kids had pets in the White House, and Barron trump didn't," he said
“8.”
"Next: unlike the other first kids, he doesn't have them."
"Barron trump is also Donald Trump's youngest child."
The news explains that in the past century, all sons young enough to live in the White House, such as John Spencer Roosevelt, were the youngest of their brothers and sisters
"As e!"
"However, Baron and the other sons of presidents have one amazing thing in common."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Travis is keeping the private beach to himself though -- he put up the producers at a nearby hotel.”
“Our sources say the whole crew is in grind mode in the home studio.”
“We're told barely an hour after Kylie and Stormi jetted back to L.A. ... Travis flew in Nav, Gunna and Cash.”
“The family spent a few days on a private beach before Travis moved on to the second order of biz.”
“We're told the crib was loaded with Stormi's fave toys, as well as one big toy for Dad -- a recording studio.”
“Sources close to the situation tell TMZ ... Travis, Kylie Jenner and their daughter, Stormi, recently took off to Honolulu where Travis' first order of business was getting some QT with his girls in a massive Airbnb rental.”
“EXCLUSIVETravis Scott busted a Kanye West ... taking the fam on a retreat before getting the creative juices flowing and starting work on his new album.”


"Travis left the private beach to himself - he put the producer in a nearby hotel."
"Our source said that the whole crew was in a running in state in the home studio."
"An hour after Kelly and stomer flew back to Los Angeles, we were told... Travis was in the Navy, gunner and cash
"The Travis family spent a few days on a private beach and then moved on to a second career."
"We heard that the crib was full of Tommy's favorite toys, and there was a big toy for Dad - the recording studio."
"People familiar with the matter told TMZ... Travis, Kylie Jenner and their daughter, stormi, recently went to Honolulu. Travis's first business was to buy some QTS with his daughters in a large airbnb rental house. "
"Exclusive Travis Scott killed a Kanye West... Before he starts to write his new album, let his family have a rest. "



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I love you mommy and hope you know how much you are loved by your six children and six grandchildren every day.””
““Happy Mother’s Day to my beautiful mommy who still teaches me how to celebrate life and make the best out of every experience and truly live in the moment!”
“Kardashian, who shares her three kids with ex-boyfriend Scott Disick, 33, also honored her own mother, Kris Jenner, 61, with a sweet throwback snap.”
“I feel incredibly blessed to be their mommy,” she wrote.”
““I thank God every morning for these three little angels who changed my heart forever.”
“Earlier in the day, Kardashian penned an emotional note to daughter Penelope, 4, as well as sons Mason, 7, and Reign, 2, describing what a blessing it is to be their mom.”
““Mother nature,” Kardashian captioned the cheeky snap.”
“Hours after posting an adorable picture of her three children on Instagram, the 38-year-old reality star shared a photo of her bare bottom late Sunday night with her 57 million followers.”
“Kourtney Kardashian celebrated herself on Mother’s Day.”


"Mom, I love you. I hope you know how much you are loved by your six children and six grandchildren every day."
"Happy Mother's day to my beautiful mother, who still teaches me how to celebrate life, how to make full use of every experience and really live in the moment!"
"Kardashian, who has three children with her 33 year old ex boyfriend Scott disc, pays homage to her 61 year old mother, Kris Jenner, with a sweet backtracking shot."
"As their mother, I feel incredibly lucky," she wrote
"I thank God every morning because these three little angels have changed my heart forever."
"Earlier in the day, Kardashian wrote a touching letter to her 4-year-old daughter Penelope, 7-year-old son Mason and 2-year-old Rafe, describing how happy it was to be their mother."
"Mother nature," Kardashian wrote in a cheeky tone
Hours after the 38 year old reality star posted cute photos of her three children on instagram, she shared a photo of her naked butt with 57 million fans late Sunday night
"Kurtany Kardashian celebrates herself on Mother's day."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ pic.twitter.com/vpcDZJA16P — Jacob Tremblay (@JacobTremblay) January 12, 2018— Stephanie Swaim...”
“I hope to work with you one day!”
“Congrats to the talented & kind @theBrooklynnK on her @CriticsChoice Awards win for Best Young Actor!”
“I hope to work with you oneday!,” he wrote.”
““Congrats to the talented & kind @thebrooklynK onher @CriticsChoice Awards win for Best Young Actor!”
“Jacob took to Twitter on Thursday to congratulate his friendon her big win.”
“All the nominees are greatyou guys are awesome,” she said onstage.”
““This is such a big honor.”
“They were both nominated in the Best Young Actor/Actresscategory at the show, and Brooklyn ended up winning for her performance in“The Florida Project”!”
“Brooklynn rocked a pretty red gown, while Jacob wore adapper black suit.”


“  pic.twitter.com/vpcDZJA16P -Jacob Tremblay (@ Jacob Tremblay) January 12, 2018 - Stephanie Swan “
"I hope to work with you one day!"
"Congratulations to this talented and kind-hearted 'the Brooklyn K' who won the 'criticchoice' Award for best young actor!"
"I hope to work with you one day! "He wrote
"Congratulations to the brilliant and kind-hearted 'the Brooklyn K on her' criticchoice 'Award for best young actor!"
"Jacob tweeted to his friends on Thursday to congratulate her on her victory."
"All the nominees are great, you're great," she said on stage
"It's a great honor."
They were all nominated for best young actor and actress, and Brooklyn won the prize for her performance in project Florida
"Brooklyn is wearing a beautiful red robe, and Jacob is wearing a fashionable black suit."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Isn’t that interesting?”October 18, 2016SJP opens up to Howard Stern, saying, “This sort of narrative, this ongoing catfight, it really used to upset me.”
“But nobody asked those questions of shows with men.”
“It wasn’t all about the money.”November 5, 2009While filming SATC 2, Sarah Jessica Parker covers Elle and says, “I don’t think anybody wants to believe that I love Kim.”
“So I took a step back and returned to Canada, where my family is—that’s the reason behind it.”
“Then my dad was diagnosed with dementia.”
“In the same interview, Kim talks about the filming holdup and says, “I was going through a divorce and my job of seven years was coming to an end.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“People made a decision that we had vilified her.”This content is imported from YouTube.”
“Sarah Jessica Parker even supports Kim, telling The Telegraph, “She mentioned money and no one should vilify her for it.”
“Sucks for fans, but seems fair, IMO.”


"Isn't that interesting? On October 18, 2016, SJP opened his heart to Howard Stern, saying: "this kind of narration, this kind of constant cat pounce, really upset me."
"But no one asked questions about men's performance."
"I don't think anyone wants to believe that I love Kim," Sarah Jessica Parker said in an interview with Al on November 5, 2009 while filming SATC 2
"So I took a step back and went back to Canada, where my family was, and that's why."
"Then my dad was diagnosed with dementia."
"In the same interview, Kim talked about the problems he encountered during the shooting process." I was going through a divorce and my seven-year work was coming to an end, "he said
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"People made a decision that we denigrated her." This content was imported from YouTube
"Sarah Jessica Parker even supported Kim, telling the Daily Telegraph:" she mentioned money and no one should slander her for it. "
"It's bad for fans, but I think it's fair."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Frozen 2 is coming out in 2019!”
“The Good Place star, 37, was the first-ever host of the Screen Actors Guild Awards, and she really upped her style game for the occasion.”
“Bell rocked not one, but four different gowns throughout the course of the evening – each more dazzling than the next.”
“Getty ImagesFirst, she went full princess for her red carpet getup, in a fuchsia strapless J.Mendel gown with floral accents.”
“To celebrate the lovely look, Bell was spotted posing on the carpet with Stranger Things actor David Harbour.”
“Getty ImagesOnce she got inside The Shrine Auditorium in Los Angeles, Bell kicked things up a notch in a sexy, low-cut black Reem Acra gown with silver embellishments.”
“She rocked the look during her opening monologue, in which she called for people to come together and share their stories.”
“Getty Images“As we march forward with active momentum and open ears, let’s make sure that we’re leading the charge with empathy and with diligence, because fear and anger never win the race,” she said.”
““And most importantly regardless of our differences, I think we can all come together and delight in one thing.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Frozen 2 will be available in 2019!"
"The 37 year old good place star is the first host of the Screen Actors Guild Award, and she really improved her style on this occasion."
All night, the bell didn't ring, only four different dresses, each more dazzling than the next one
"Getty Images first of all, she wore a purple red Strapless J. Mendel dress on the red carpet, with the charm of flowers, dressed very beautiful."
To celebrate this lovely look, bell was found posing with actor David Harper on the carpet
"As soon as Getty Images bell walked into the temple auditorium in Los Angeles, he put on a sexy low cut black REM Akala dress with silver decoration, which took everything to the next level."
"She made a difference in her opening remarks, calling on everyone to share her story."
"Getty Images" she said: "as we move forward with positive momentum and open ears, let's make sure we lead with compassion and diligence, because fear and anger will never win the game."
"The most important thing is that no matter how different we are, I think we can all come together and be happy about one thing."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There has been a lot of The Hills baby news of late, as both of their Hills co-stars Lauren Conrad and Whitney Port are also expecting.”
“...missing my mommy!'”
“#blessed Thank you to all you beautiful amazing moms for your endless love and dedication!”
“The 33-year-old wrote: 'So excited to celebrate my first Mother's Day!”
“...herself cradling her bump on Instagram...”
“Exciting times The following day Heidi enjoyed her first Mother s Day with husband Spencer showing her in gifts His queen The star received two giant bunches of white and pink roses as well as a pair of pink and white Adidas sneakers On Sunday Heidi posted a snap of...”
“Despite all the pink, the couple have announced they are having a little boy.”
“The star received two giant bunches of white and pink roses as well as a pair of pink and white Adidas sneakers.”
“Pregnant pause: Heidi showed off her 18 weeks-along bump as she ran errands and took her Pomeranian pooch for a walkThe following day, Heidi enjoyed her first Mother's Day with husband Spencer showing her in gifts.”
“Heidi skipped wearing makeup and wore a black cap to keep her face out of the sun.”


"There's been a lot of news about hills baby recently, because their co stars Lauren Conrad and Whitney Potter are also looking forward to it."
“… I miss my mother! "
Thank you to all the beautiful and charming moms for your endless love and dedication
"The 33 year old wrote: 'it's so exciting to celebrate my first mother's Day
“… She's holding her lump on instagram herself... "
"The next day, an exciting moment, Heidi enjoyed her first mother's day. Her husband Spencer showed her the gift, and his queen received two big bunches of white and pink roses, as well as a pair of pink and white Adidas sneakers. On Sunday, Heidi posted a picture... "
"Despite all the pink, the couple announced they were going to have a little boy."
"The star received two big bunches of white and pink roses and a pair of pink and white Adidas sneakers."
"Pregnancy pause: Heidi runs errands, takes her Pomeranian dog for a walk, and shows you her 18 week experience. The next day, Heidi enjoyed her first mother's day, and her husband Spencer showed her a present
"Heidi didn't make up and wore a black hat to keep her face from the sun."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We have an incredible relationship.”
““This has been blindsiding to us.”
“But I could have!”Chris and Anna in 2008 Getty ImagesHe added in an interview with Elle, "We were friends first, but she left her husband at the end of the movie, and we started dating when we were back in LA.”
““It took a while for me to admit it, because it would be crazy to be like, ‘I want to marry you’ the first day I met her.”
““I knew I wanted to marry her pretty soon [after I met her,]” he told PEOPLE.”
“But annoyingly she was married to actor Ben Indra at the time.”
“Chris says he knew she was 'The One' immediately.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”
“Look – they get engaged in the trailer!”


"We have an incredible relationship."
"This has been deceiving us."
"But I can! In an interview with Elle in 2008, Chris and Anna added: "we were friends initially, but she left her husband at the end of the movie and we started dating when we got back to Los Angeles."
"It took me a while to admit it, because the first day I saw her, I said, 'I want to marry you.' it's crazy."
"I know I want to marry her soon," he told people
"But it was irritating that she married actor Ben Indra."
"Chris said he knew right away that she was the one."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from YouTube."
"Look, they're engaged in a trailer!"



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a sneak peek clip from Sunday's episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians, the 34-year-old reality star gets emotional about trying to move on from the mother of his three children with other ladies.”
“In the clip, Scott opens up to Kim Kardashian West about his trip to Cannes with Bella Thorne back in May.”
“"It just looked like some big soap opera going on," Kim says of their dramatic adventure.”
“"It was like a fun show."”
“WATCH: Bella Thorne Wants People to 'Get Over' Her and Scott Disick, Says She's Got Her Eye on Someone New"I didn't see the show because I was living it," Scott explains.”
“"But look at it from my perspective.”
“She was on vacation with one man the whole trip.”
“That looks like a happier scenario than me jumping around trying to find happiness and these girls are not fulfilling that.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"In a peep clip from Sunday's follow Kardashian series, the 34 year old reality star is thrilled to try to get out of his relationship with the mother of three and other women."
"In this video, Scott tells Kim Kardashian West about his trip to Cannes with Bella Thorne in May."
"It looks like a soap opera going on," said Kim, their dramatic adventure
"It's like an interesting performance."
"Watch: Bella Thorne wants people to 'forget' her and Scott Disick, saying she's in love with a new person," Scott explained. "I didn't watch the show because I was living."
"But from my point of view."
"She spent the whole trip on holiday with a man."
"It seems happier than I'm looking for happiness everywhere, and these girls don't get it."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After the 10-minute mingle, the brothers returned to Windsor Castle with the bear in tow.”
“Judging by his cool, calm demeanor, Prince Harry is indeed ready to be married!”
“...to which he replied, "Great."”
“...and "How are you feeling?"”
“Before saying goodbye, Prince Harry was even gifted a small teddy bear outfitted with a red sweater as others in the crowd shouted questions at the royal, including "You ready, Harry?"”
“People in the crowd were understandably ecstatic to see the siblings and had their cameras and cell phones at the ready to document the special moment.”
“The groom-to-be paid particular attention to the youngsters dispersed in the crowd, crouching down to the floor to talk to them as they were divided by a barrier.”
“The two brothers thrilled the throngs of onlookers as they shook hands and chatted.”
“Traveling fans of the royals got what they have been waiting for this week when and surprised crowds and stepped outside for a brief walkabout in the streets of Windsor on Friday, just a day before the big wedding.”
“Hi, Harry!”


Ten minutes later, the brothers returned to Windsor Castle with the bear
"Judging from his calm manner, Prince Harry is really ready to get married!"
“… He replied, "great. “
“… And "how do you feel?"
Before saying goodbye, Harry even got a little teddy bear, which was wearing a red sweater, and other people in the crowd asked the royal family loudly, including "are you ready, Harry?"
"It's understandable that people in the crowd are overjoyed to see their brothers and sisters and are ready to record this special moment with cameras and mobile phones."
"The groom should pay special attention to the young people scattered in the crowd. When they are separated by obstacles, they squat on the floor to talk to them."
"The two brothers shook hands and chatted, making the crowd excited."
"The Royal Travel fans got what they had been waiting for this week, and they walked out of the crowd in surprise on the streets of Windsor the day before the wedding, Friday, for a short walk."
"Hi, Harry!"



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Channing Tatum whisked his gorgeous wife, Jenna Dewan Tatum, away for a beach getaway in Mexico over the weekend, to mark the actress and dancer’s 37th birthday on Sunday.”
“The couple was snapped at the airport at celebrity vacation hot spot, Cabos San Lucas, on Saturday, with Jenna sporting a white floral maxi dress, while Channing chatted on his cellphone in a blue sweater and casual pants.”
“Jenna shared some of the seaside fun from the couple’s luxury rental on her Instagram Stories, posting photos of a cocktail balancing on her knee against the beach backdrop, as well as a sexy shot showing her white bikini top.”
“She also took a snap of her reading material, Moulin Rouge.”
“InstagramInstagramInstagramLater, Jenna shared more Instagram pics of her "birthday suit," a low-cut black one-piece.”
“"This year has been one i will never forget," she captioned one of the shots.”
“"Challenging, beautiful and wonderfully expansive all at the same time.”
“But I know for sure that every experience you have is here for your own growth and when viewed that way, the magic of life will show you the way.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
To commemorate the actress and dancer's 37th birthday, Channing Tatum took his beautiful wife, Jenna Dewan Tatum, to Mexico beach for a weekend holiday
"On Saturday, the couple were photographed at cabs Saint Lucas airport, a star resort. Jenna was wearing a white floral dress while Channing was chatting on her mobile phone in a blue sweater and casual pants."
"In the instagram story, Jenna shares some of the seaside fun of the couple's luxury rental, posting a cocktail photo balanced on her lap against the beach background and a sexy photo showing her white bikini top."
"She also photographed her own book, Moulin Rouge."
"Instagram instagram later, Jenna shared more instagram photos, her" birthday suit ", a low cut black jumpsuit."
"This is a year I will never forget," she wrote in one of the photos
"Challenge, beauty and wonderful expansion at the same time."
"But I am sure that every experience you have is for your own growth. If you look at it in this way, the magic of life will show you the way."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“With all the rumored drama surrounding Disick and ex Kourtney Kardashian, we wonder if she'll be up for making those Father's Day plans this year?”
“We went to the zoo, had a great time, had lunch on the water in Santa Barbara, it was as good as I could've asked for I guess," he said.”
“MORE NEWS: Scott Disick and Kourtney Kardashian Aren't Speaking After His Wild Cannes Trip"Last year we had an awesome time.”
“Last year, the reality star said he had a wonderful time on the holiday.”
“"I didn't make any, but hopefully someone made some for me, but we'll see!"”
“I think someone should make them for me," he said.”
“"I don't know if I made those plans.”
“UP NEXT: Kourtney Kardashian Spills Her Best Tips for Sexy Curves and a Tight TummyWhen asked about whether or not he had any Father's Day plans with Mason, Penelope and Reign, Disick admitted he didn't.”
“I'm trying to figure it out now, but hoping to get to see some of my best friends from back home," she said.”
“Not exactly positive.”


"All the talk about Disick and former Courtney Kardashian is about her, and we want to know if she will be ready to make those father's Day plans this year?"
"We went to the zoo, had a good time, had lunch on the water in Santa Barbara, and I think that's all I can ask for," he said
More news: Scott Disick and Courtney Kardashian did not speak after their trip to Cannes: "we had a good time last year."
"Last year, the reality star said he had a good holiday."
"I didn't do anything. I hope someone did something for me, but we'll see!"
"I think someone should do it for me," he said
"I don't know if I made those plans."
"Next: Kourtney Kardashian gave her best tips on sexy curves and tight bellies. When asked if he had any father's Day plans with Mason, Penelope and raven, Disick admitted he didn't."
"I'm thinking about it now, but I hope to see my best friend in my hometown," she said
"Not entirely positive."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now, about that ring...”
“While the two have presumably been dating for several months, and even took a PDA-filled vacation last week, it looks like they are finally comfortable revealing the truth.”
“After some adorable squabbling, Logan made a grand enough gesture to appease his woman: one free kiss, which Chloe half-heartedly accepted ... even though it was on her head.”
“...star complained, "All I know is Justin Bieber has been dating Hailey Baldwin for a fu**ing month, and she gets a fu**ing ring and an Instagram post!"”
“The Agents of S.H.I.E.L.D.”
“In a series of Instagram stories, Bennet is discussing the engagement of Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin, and teases Paul about not doing anything similarly nice for her.”
“In what may have been a worse kept secret than Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson, YouTube star Logan Paul is finally acknowledging he's in a relationship with Chloe Bennet.”


"Now, about that ring..."
"Although the two have been dating for several months, and even took a holiday full of PDAs last week, it seems that they can finally confidently reveal the truth."
"After a lovely quarrel, Logan made a gesture grand enough to appease his woman: a free kiss, which Chloe accepted half heartedly... Even on her head. "
“…… The star complained, "all I know is that Justin Bieber dated Haley Baldwin for a month and she got a ring and an instagram post."
"Agent of s.h.i.e.l.d."
"In a series of instagram reports, Bennett is discussing Justin Bieber's engagement to Haley Baldwin and mocks Paul for not doing anything similar for her."
"In a worse secret than Ariana grand and Peter Davidson, YouTube star Logan Paul finally admitted his relationship with Chloe Bennett."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It made us understand our bond even more."”
“The tests we've passed made us love each other even more.”
“"I applaud her for being my backbone, my support system, and more importantly, taking my life to the next level...”
“"I applaud my wife for just displaying a high level of strength that I can't even explain," he said.”
“While continuing to shower his wife with praise for giving him a second chance, he credited her for upgrading his life in a way he claims he needed.”
“He went on to acknowledge that their marriage "has been put to the test," before admitting that those said tests stemmed from "stupidity."”
“"Yes, that's my wife, we're lovers, it's a relationship, it's marriage... but the friendship we have is like no other."”
“"The friendship that I have with my wife is insane," he continued.”
“Two months following the frenzy, however, Kevin and Eniko appeared to have worked through it all and welcomed a healthy baby boy, Kenzo.”
“Fans may recall that this all came on the heels of Hart being exposed in a video, leaked by a former friend, which showed him engaging in sexual acts with a woman who wasn't his wife.”


"It gives us a better understanding of our relationship."
"The tests we passed made us more in love."
"I applaud for her, she is my backbone, my support system, and more importantly, she has brought my life to a new height..."
"I applaud for my wife because she shows great power that I can't explain," he said
"While continuing to praise his wife for giving him a second chance, he praised her for improving his life in the way he claimed he needed it."
He went on to admit that their marriage had been "tested" and that the tests were due to "stupidity."
"Yes, that's my wife. We are lovers, relationships, marriages... But our friendship is unique
"My friendship with my wife is crazy," he continued
"However, after two months of madness, Kevin and iniko seem to have solved all this and welcomed a healthy baby boy, Jiansan."
"Fans may remember that all this happened after Hart was exposed in a video leaked by an ex friend showing that he had sex with a woman who was not his wife."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Yours truly, Dom #FamilyAlways.” I’m not crying, there’s just some grease in my eye.”
“The delay of the ninth film is no one’s fault, he wrote, “However, like any vehicle that has run around the globe 8 times, the franchise is in need of maintenance.”“We have some very exciting news to share soon... stay tuned,” he concluded.”
“But, since he always seems to be the peacemaker in these situations, Diesel posted another Instagram hours later of a screenshot of him and Johnson from Fast 5, the first in the franchise to introduce Johnson’s character Luke Hobbs.”
“Yikes.”
“...to be seen in the photo...”
“Vin Diesel the leader of the franchise and the man whom Johnson once referred to as a candy ass has released a few cryptic social media posts the first of which on Friday featured himself with Gibson and the late Paul Walker and was simply titled Brotherhood Johnson is nowhere...”
“#HobbsShaw2019.” He didn’t address Gibson’s concerns directly, but, listen, the fans can tell.”
“In light of the news, Johnson simply tweeted, “My goal from day 1 was to come in and create an exciting/fun character for the fans, elevate the franchise and build it out.”
“The spinoff news came only a day after the delay announcement, and Gibson smelled a rat.”
“The ninth movie has been delayed a full year to April 10, 2020, while Johnson and Statham’s spinoff, inspired by their delightful chemistry during The Fate of the Furious, is coming July 26, 2019.”


"Really, my family." I didn't cry, just a little greasy in my eyes
"The delay in the ninth film is not anyone's fault, but like any car that has run eight laps around the world, the franchise needs to be maintained," he wrote "We'll soon have some very exciting news to share... "Please stay focused," he concluded
"But, as he always seems to be a peacemaker in this situation, a few hours later, dessel posted a screenshot of him and Johnson in fast 5 on instagram, the first person in the series to introduce Johnson's character, Luke Hobbes."
"Oh, dear."
“… You can see in the photo... "
"Vin Diesel, the leader of the franchise company, who Johnson once called sugar butt, has published some mysterious social media posts, the first of which featured Gibson and the late Paul Walker on Friday, with the title of" the Johnson Brothers have nowhere to go... "
"Hobshaw 2019." He didn't solve Gibson's problem directly, but, listen, the fans can tell us
"In view of this news, Johnson just tweeted," my goal from day one is to come in and create an exciting / interesting role for the fans, upgrade the franchise and build it out. "
"The day after the delay, the news of the split came out, and Gibson smelled a rat smell."
"The ninth film has been delayed for a full year until April 10, 2020, and Johnson and Stassen's derivative, inspired by their pleasant chemical reaction in angry destiny, will be released on July 26, 2019."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Keep scrolling to see all the sparkly dresses, sharp suits, gorgeous gowns and more!”
“From Allison Janney’s sparkly midi to Jessica Szohr’s plunging blue design, there was no shortage of fierce fashion.”
“But, let’s be honest, we were just as excited to see what everyone in attendance was wearing.”
“...adulation and even a few tear jerking moments...”
“Trading their jerseys and uniforms for some super cool dresses nominees like Olympic gold medalists Chloe Kim and Aly Raisman mingled with Hollywood heavyweights like Ciara Kate Beckinsale and Jennifer Garner for a night that was full of plenty of...”
“...the red carpet...”
“Hosted by race car driver Danica Patrick the annual fete devoted to all things sports was held at the Microsoft Theater in L A on Wednesday July 18 and you can bet the stars brought their fashion A game on...”
“...celebrities and professional athletes came together to celebrate the best best plays and playmakers of the year at the 2018 ESPY Awards...”
“With an unusually quiet week on the sports calendar the NFL NHL and NBA seasons are over while the MLB in the midst of its All Star break and Wimbledon and the World Cup just wrapping up across the pond...”


"Continue to scroll through all the shiny dresses, neat suits, gorgeous dresses, etc.!"
"From Allison Janney's shiny MIDI to Jessica Szohr's dark blue design, there is no lack of intense fashion."
"But, to be honest, we were just as excited to see what everyone was wearing."
“…… Flattery, even some tear jerking moments... "
"They swapped their jerseys and uniforms for some super cool clothes, such as Olympic gold medalists Chloe king and Ellie lesman, and spent a wonderful time with Hollywood heavyweights siala Kate Beckinsale and Jennifer Garner."
“… The red carpet... "
"The annual sports event hosted by car driver Danica Patrick is on Wednesday, July 18 at the Microsoft theater in Los Angeles. You can bet the stars bring their fashion games..."
“…… At the ESPY awards ceremony in 2018, celebrities and professional athletes gathered to celebrate the best screenplay and screenwriter of the year.... "
"It's a very quiet week in the sports calendar, the NFL, NHL and NBA seasons are over, and MLB is in the all star intermission, Wimbledon and the world cup are just over..."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gomez continues to be open about her battle with lupus after first revealing in 2015 that she’d undergone chemotherapy to treat the disease.”
“It was really, really hard,” she said during her appearance on his daytime talk show Harry.Watch this video on The Scene.”
“...well...”
“Speaking with Self about the moment Gomez, 25, revealed they were a confirmed match for the transplant procedure, Raisa, 29, said she turned to her social worker for advice about what to expect.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It’s going to be hard, the recipient is going to glow and she’s going to recover a lot faster than the donor because she’s getting something she needs and you are losing something you don’t need to lose.”
“It’s going to be hard,” the actress recalled of the pre-surgery conversation.”
“And it was hard said Raisa who added Selena and I both went through a depression Also in the on camera interview Raisa walked fans through the steps of the transplant as she had the button on her jeans undone to show her C section scar and the marks on...”
“...her stomach area...”
“Image zoom Francia Raisa | Credit: SELF“Your scars don’t define you.”


"Gomez continued to fight lupus openly after he first disclosed that he had received chemotherapy for lupus in 2015."
"Really, really hard," she said on his daytime talk show. Look, this is a live video. "
“… Well
"Referring to the moment when Gomez, 25, revealed that they matched the transplant, Raisa, 29, said she asked her social workers for advice on the future."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"It's going to be hard, the recipient's going to glow, she's going to recover much faster than the donor, because she gets what she needs and you lose what you don't need to lose."
"It's going to be hard," the actress recalls the pre-operative conversation
"It's hard to say about Lisa who added that Selena and I both experienced depression during the camera interview. Lisa walked away from the fans through the steps of transplanting as she unbuttoned her jeans to show her caesarean scar and scar..."
“… Her stomach area... "
"Image zooming Francia Riza credit: self" your scar doesn't define you



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hear more in the video below!”
“#thankstho."”
“News flash it's MY body.”
“WATCH: Chrissy Metz Defends Latex Look at MTV Movie & TV Awards: 'It's My Body'Metz originally responded to the criticism immediately after the awards show wrapped, tweeting, "For the record, I wear what I want, when I want.”
“She concluded her post by congratulating all of the night's winners, including her co-stars, Milo Ventimiglia and Lonnie Chavis, who won the Tearjerker Award for their infamous push-up scene on the popular NBC series.”
“Wear what you want, love [your] love and treat people the way you want to be treated."”
“"All I'm saying, is do YOU, Boo!”
“"I truly had no idea it would make anyone feel uncomfortable, I just wanted to try something different," she continued.”
“"I hope that in some small way an unconventional body wearing an unconventional material opened up discussion, hearts and minds."”
“The outpouring of love and support from all of you lovely people has not gone unnoticed," Metz wrote.”


"Hear more in the video below!"
"Thank you."
"This is my body."
"Observation: Chris Metz defended the MTV Film Awards:" this is my body. "Metz initially responded to criticism immediately after the award ceremony and said on her micro blog," for the record, I can wear whatever I want and when I want to wear. "
Finally, she congratulated all the winners of the night, including her partners Milo Ventimiglia and Ronnie Chavez, who won the tear gas Award for their infamous push ups in the NBC hit series
"Wear whatever you want, love (your) love, and treat others the way you want to be treated."
"What I want to say is, be you, boo!"
"I really didn't know it would make anyone uncomfortable, I just wanted to try something different," she continued
"I hope that in some small way, an unconventional body wearing unconventional materials opens up the discussion and the heart."
"The love and support of you lovely people has not been ignored," Metz wrote



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ABC also recently announced that it will revive the Fox reality singing competition series “American Idol” next season.”
“The news comes as the broadcast networks begin to finalize their fall programming slates ahead of the upfront presentations next week.”
“The Kerry Washington-led “Scandal” is reportedly set to end after the conclusion of its seventh season next year.”
“Also Read: ABC Closes Deal to Revive 'American Idol'“Modern Family” joins the Shondaland dramas “Grey’s Anatomy,” “Scandal” and “How to Get Away With Murder” and the long-running comedy “The Middle” as the five ABC shows already renewed.”
“And the good kind of family, not the kind that argues with you all the time,” added co-creator and executive producer Steve Levitan.”
““We are beyond thrilled that we get to spend more time with these characters, these amazing actors, our ridiculously-talented writers and our incredible crew – all of whom are like family to us.”
“Steve and Chris have created such endearing characters, and the cast is second-to-none,” said ABC Entertainment President Channing Dungey in a statement.”
“Also Read: 'Scandal' to End After Season 7“Modern Family has been the centerpiece of our comedy brand for eight seasons and we are thrilled to have it on our schedule for two more years.”
“The news comes after months of negotiations between the network, producers 20th Century Fox Television and the cast, whose previous deals expired at the end of Season 8, though a renewal was likely always in the cards given the show’s success in the ratings.”
“The order will bring the series to a staggering total of 232 episodes.”


ABC also recently announced that it will revive the fox reality TV singing contest series "American Idol" in the next season
"The news comes as radio and television networks begin to finalize autumn programming ahead of next week's early press conference."
"It is reported that the Kerry Washington led scandal will end after the end of the seventh quarter of next year."
"Read also: ABC has reached an agreement to restore 'American Idol','modern family 'has joined the shodland drama' Gray's anatomy ',' scandal 'and' how to get rid of murder 'and' long comedy 'in the middle' as ABC's five shows have been updated."
"And it's a good family, not one that's been arguing with you all the time," added co producer and executive producer Steve Leviathan
"We're thrilled to have more time with these characters, these amazing actors, our talented writers and our incredible staff, all of whom are like a family to us."
"Steve and Chris have created such lovely characters that the cast is second to none," ABC entertainment president Channing dunkey said in a statement
"Please also read: 'scandal' after the end of the seventh season 'Hyundai family has been the core of our comedy brand for eight seasons and we are happy to have it on our schedule for more than two years."
"The news was released after months of negotiations between the network, 20th Century Fox producers and the cast, whose previous agreement expired at the end of Season 8, but given the show's ratings success, a renewal may always be possible."
"The order will bring the series to an amazing 232 episodes."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“FICTION AWARD Alexandria Bombach On Her Shoulders Bing Liu Minding the Gap RaMell Ross Hale County This Morning This Evening Related Content...”
“(Alfonso Cuaron’s Roma, for example, has been hailed as an early Oscars frontrunner, and it was only eligible at the Spirit Awards in the international film category.)”
“Street Could Talk further into the Oscar conversation...”
“The Spirit Awards, held in a tent at a Santa Monica beach on Feb. 23, the day before the Oscars ceremony, honor the best achievements in films made within a $20 million budget.”
“The awards voted for by members of Film Independent often help to indicate which films will go on to win key Oscars Moonlight in 2017 Spotlight in 2016 Birdman in 2015 and 12 Years A Slave in 2014 all won best feature at the Spirit Awards and went on to...”
“...pick up the Best Picture Oscar...”
“Bo Burnham’s Eighth Grade, Paul Schrader’s First Reformed, and Lynne Ramsey’s You Were Never Really Here all earned four nominations, including best feature.”
“Barry Jenkins’ If Beale Street Could Talk and Debra Granik’s Leave No Trace rounded out the Best Feature category (and scored three nominations apiece).”
“Jeremiah Zagar’s We the Animals scored the most nominations with five, including best first feature, best supporting actor for Raúl Castillo, and the Someone to Watch Award.”
“The Indie Spirits aren’t a perfect predictor for what will eventually triumph at the Oscars, but they are a decent indicator of what will be in the conversation.”


"Novel Award Alexandria bonbach, Liu Bing on his shoulder, this morning, roshale County, tonight..."
(for example, Alfonso Cologne's "Rome" is known as the early leader of the Oscar, which only won the Spirit Award in the international film category.)
"Street can talk about Oscar in depth..."
On February 23, the day before the Oscars, the "spirit award" was held in a tent on Santa Monica Beach to honor the best film achievement within a $20 million budget
"The awards voted by the members of the Independent Film Association often help to show which films will continue to win the key Academy Awards in 2017. Moonlight, 2015 Birdman, 2016 spotlight and 2014 12 years of slavery both won the best feature film award at the Spirit Award and continue to..."
“… Best Picture award... "
"Bob Burnham's eighth grade, Paul Schrader's the first reform, and Lynn Ramsay's you've never really been here have all won four nominations, including best feature film."
"Barry Jenkins's if Beale Street can talk and Debra granik's leave no trace were rounded to the best scenario category (three nominations respectively)."
"Jeremy zagal's" we animals "won the most nominations with five nominations, including best first feature film, best supporting actor of Raul Castillo and" someone's watching. "
"The spirit of independence is not a perfect predictor of what will eventually win the Oscars, but they are a decent indicator of what will be in the conversation."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All proceeds will benefit giraffe conservation events, the zoo and Ava’s Little Heroes, a charity for families who face unexpected medical expenses.”
“At the end of the voting period, the zoo will open another voting contest with the 10 most popular names.”
“Each submission costs $1 with a minimum purchase of five name suggestions for $5.”
“Animal lovers everywhere can submit a name for the baby until April 25 at nameaprilscalf.com.”
“The newborn giraffe doesn’t yet have a name since Animal Adventure Park is holding a contest to name the calf.”
“Approximately 1.2 million people watched as she welcomed the baby, who weighed 129 pounds and measured 5 feet, 9 inches.”
““It’s creating some very cute moments.”As fans all over the world saw via livestream, April the giraffe gave birth to her fourth calf on Saturday, April 15, after 16 months of pregnancy.”
““Oliver — usually males have no part in raising of the young — [but] he’s actually been quite inquisitive and getting nose to nose with baby,” he said.”
“The zoo owner, Jordan Patch, told Good Morning America on Monday, April 17, that it’s rare for male giraffes to help with their newborns’ upbringing.”
““Dad & Baby meet!” the tweet read.”


"All the proceeds will go to giraffe conservation, the zoo and EVA's little hero, a charity for families facing unexpected medical costs."
At the end of the voting period, the zoo will hold another voting competition to select the 10 most popular names
"The fee for each submission is 1 yuan, at least 5 yuan to buy 5 name suggestions."
"Animal lovers around the world can submit their baby's name before April 25 aprilscalf.com .”
"The new giraffe doesn't have a name yet, because the Animal Adventure Park is holding a contest to name the calf."
"About 1.2 million people watched her greet the 129 pound, 5-foot-9-inch baby."
"It creates some very lovely moments." Fans all over the world have seen through livestream that on Saturday, April 15, a giraffe, 16 months pregnant, gave birth to her fourth calf
"Oliver - usually men are not involved in raising children - but in fact he's always curious and always dealing with children," he said
"Jordan patch, owner of the zoo, told Good Morning America on Monday, April 17 that it's rare for male giraffes to help raise newborns."
"Meet daddy and baby! "It said on Weibo."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ethan wakes up, asking if his father's awake.”
“She asks him to talk to Ethan instead.”
“Full Summary [ edit | edit source ]A patient is brought into the ER, while a magician and his assistant are screaming at each other next to the ambulance.”
“Meanwhile, a magician’s assistant is rushed into the ER after a magic trick goes terribly wrong.”
“After an incident with Ethan’s grandmother, Owen fears the child could end up in foster care and a new craniofacial specialist arrives at Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital to work on a young patient.”
“Short Summary [ edit | edit source ]The doctors reach out to Bailey but she continues to shut everyone out.”
“” — Meredith GreyDo You Believe in Magic is the twenty-second episode of the ninth season and the 194th overall episode of Grey's Anatomy.”
“But there is a magic in knowing that while not everything can be repaired, most everything can be survived.”
“Not in the traditional, abracadabra, genie in a bottle kind of way.”
“There's no such thing as magic.”


Ethan wakes up and asks if his father wakes up
"She asked him to talk to Ethan."
"Full Abstract [editor | editor source] a patient is taken to the emergency room while a magician and his assistant scream at each other next to the ambulance."
At the same time, a magic problem, a magician's assistant was rushed into the emergency room
"After an accident with Ethan's grandmother, Owen worried that the child would eventually be fostered, so a new craniofacial specialist came to gray Sloan Memorial Hospital to treat a young patient."
"Short summary [editor | editor source] doctors took the initiative to contact Bailey, but she continued to shut everyone out."
"- Meredith grad's do you believe in magic is the 22nd episode of season 9 and the 194th episode of Gray's anatomy."
"But it's magic to know that not everything can be fixed, but most things can survive."
"It's not traditional, it's bottle monsters."
"There is no magic."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“That's all.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Giphy.”
“Have you seen a more legendary accessory?”
“ShutterstockI mean, do you see this bag?”
“Someone call Miranda Priestly because Streep is about to single-handedly start her own Fall 2017 trend of Obama handbags and I am totally on-board.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"That's all."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
This content was imported from giphy
"Have you ever seen more legendary accessories?"
"I mean, do you see this bag?"
"Someone called Miranda Priestley because Streep is about to start her own autumn 2017 Obama handbag trend on her own, and I totally agree."



**Something goes wrong**
“This is a realistic behind the scenes look behind the ultimate fashion week in New York.”
“The overall backstage scene consists of models quietly glued to their phones texting their agents, stylists buzzing around them in a frenzy; while publicists and personal assistants are barking requests left and right.”
“The following is a sneak peek into what goes on behind the curtain.”
“What the average person would find is a pandemonium of stylists, publicists, make-up artists, models and personal assistants striving to make the designer’s vision come into fruition.”
“This team is responsible for making the show perfect down to every detail.”
“Typically, the call time is 2 hours prior to the start of a show.”
“Models are requested at 1 or even up to 4 shows a day, so this means there is some extensive running around combined with different hair styles, make-up and designer outfits for every show.”
“Prior to the day of the fashion show, most models have a fitting with the designer.”
“This way the clothes are tailored to fit perfectly, so models can change from outfit to outfit effortlessly.”
“The day of the event begins with a flock of models dressed in sweat pants racing to the backstage show location – a sight most do not get to see.”


"It's the real behind the scenes look behind New York's ultimate fashion week."
"The whole backstage scene is models quietly gluing to their mobile phones and texting agents, stylists buzzing around them madly, while PR staff and personal assistants barking around them."
"Here's a peek at what's going on behind the scenes."
"The average person will find that designers, PR people, makeup artists, models and personal assistants are all trying to realize their vision."
"This team is responsible for making every detail of the program perfect."
Usually, the talk time is two hours before the program starts
"Models have to attend one or even up to four shows a day, so it means that each show will have a wide range of different hairstyles, makeup and designer clothes."
Before the fashion show starts, most models have to fit the designer
"It's a great fit, so models can easily change clothes."
"On the day of the event, first of all, a group of models in sweatpants rushed to the backstage exhibition site - a scene that most people can't see."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was really nerve-racking and it’s scary, and it’s not only you,” she said during an episode of her mother’s Lifetime series Making a Model with Yolanda Hadid.”
“I would literally start crying and shaking if I had to do interviews at red carpet events.”
“...was always very reserved...”
“Love the skin you re in baby While Hadid has grown comfortable in her own skin earlier in January she revealed that she used to get so nervous before interviews that she would start crying and shaking My sister Gigi Hadid is very bubbly and very out there and I”
“Image zoom The Hadid sisters pose for British Vogue‘s March issue | Credit: Steven MeiselThe duos mother, Yolanda Hadid, was spotted by paparazzi in Beverly Hills and asked how she felt about the covers, to which she told a TMZ photographer, “I love it.”
“Hadid recently landed her first dual cover alongside Gigi for the March issue of British Vogue.”
“There she was joined by sister Gigi, who had just closed Jeremy Scott’s New York Fashion Week show.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Khloé Kardashian and Kendall Jenner — Traumatized by Stalkers and Robbers — Visit a Gun RangeThe model did not let the incident stop her from enjoying her night, as she later headed to friend Samuel Krost’s birthday dinner, which Bella shared video of on her Instagram stories.”
“The investigation is ongoing, and it is unclear if he is still in custody, the spokesperson tells PEOPLE.”
“Perez was charged with aggravated harassment and stalking.”


"It's really nerve wracking and scary, not just you," she said in her mother's life as a model with Yolanda Hadid
"If I had to be interviewed on the red carpet, I would start to cry and shiver."
“… Always conservative... "
"Love your skin baby, and Hadid has been comfortable in her skin in the early January," she said. "She used to be very nervous before she interviewed, and she would start to cry and tremble. My sister Gio Hadid is very frothy, very there and me."
"Zoom in and out" the Hadid sisters pose for the March issue of vogue | photo source: Yolanda Hadid, the mother of Steven Meisel the duos, was found by paparazzi in Beverly Hills. When asked how she felt about the cover, she told a photographer at TMZ, "I like it."
"Hadid recently joined Gigi on the UK's Vogue's first double cover in March."
"She was joined by her sister, Gigi, who had just finished Jeremy Scott's New York Fashion Week show."
"Related video: khlo é Kardashian and Kendall Jenner - injured by stalkers and robbers - visited a gun riding range, and the model didn't let it stop her from enjoying the night because she later went to her friend Samuel krost's birthday dinner, and Bella shared her story video on instagram."
"The investigation is still ongoing and it is not clear whether he is still in custody," the spokesman told people
"Peres is charged with serious harassment and stalking."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And 93 percent of it said yes.””
““And it was like in a magazine like, was Pete Davidson stupid?”
“Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson were infamous for getting matching tattoos while together, but it looks like things haven’t changed even after their split.”
“The ex-pair, who called things off in October, each showed off a new black heart tattoo recently — Davidson’s ink behind his ear, Grande’s on her left finger — both of which covered up former ink dedicated to each other.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Early on in their relationship, the Saturday Night Live star, 25, got a Playboy-inspired bunny ears mask (the one Grande wore on the cover of her Dangerous Woman album) tattooed on the left side of his neck.”
“But just days before they announced their split, Davidson had covered the ink with a large black heart.”
“Image zoom Pete Davidson’s tattoo | Credit: London Reese/Instagram; Jackie Brown/SplashAnd on Friday, while teasing her upcoming “Thank U, Next” music video, Grande, 25, posted a photo to Instagram featuring her new ink: a black heart on her left ring finger.”
“The new design hid her cursive “Pete” tattoo, which she had debuted for her former fiancé at the end of June, but later covered with a band-aid days after breaking up.”
“The “No Tears Left to Cry” singer is known for using black hearts on social media, especially in the wake of her split.”


"93% agreed."
"Like in a magazine, is Peter Davidson stupid?"
"Ariana Grande and Peter Davidson were notorious for matching tattoos when they were together, but it doesn't seem to change even after the break-up."
"The ex lovers cancelled their engagement in October, and recently each showed a new black heart tattoo - the ink behind Davidson's ear and the ink on Grande's left finger - both of which cover up the ink previously given to each other."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In the early days of their relationship, the 25-year-old Saturday night live star had a playboy rabbit ear mask tattooed on the left side of his neck (the one Grande wore on the cover of dangerous women)
"But a few days before they announced their break-up, Davidson covered the ink with a big black heart."
"Zoom in on Peter Davidson's tattoo | photo source: Reese / instagram, London; Jackie Brown / sperland, 25, posted a photo on instagram on Friday while joking about her upcoming" thank you, next "music video, showing her new ink: a black heart on the ring finger of her left hand."
"The new design hides her cursive 'Pitt' tattoo, which she first tattooed for her ex fiance at the end of June, but was covered with band aids a few days after the breakup."
"The" no tears to cry "singer is known for using black hearts on social media, especially after she broke up."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I feel like I know people like him.”
“I know a lot of people are kind of down on David, but I’m still sort of into him.”
“Because my image is me.”HuffPost’s Emma Gray chatted all about Jordan and David with actress and “Bachelor” fan Erin Darke on the “Here to Make Friends” podcast:Gray: So Jordan makes a few claims on this group date.”
“Because, do you know why?”
“If you’re trying to wreck my image, you’ll never succeed.”
“It’s something some people consider the top....”
“If you’re trying to tear down my image and my three-year contract ... it’s actually pretty serious.”
“I have an image.”
““I don’t think you know what that means.”
“I’m a Wilhemina model,” he says.”


"I think I know people like him."
"I know a lot of people are a little dissatisfied with David, but I still like him a little bit."
"Because my image is me." Emma gray of the huffin post talked to actress and bachelor fan Irene duck on "make friends here" about Jordan and David Podcast: grey: so Jordan made some suggestions on this group date
"Because, do you know why?"
"If you want to destroy my image, you will never succeed."
"This is what some people think is the best..."
"If you want to damage my image and my three-year contract... This is actually quite serious. "
"I have an image."
"I don't think you know what that means."
"I'm Wilhelmina's model," he said



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more from Yahoo Lifestyle:Follow us on Instagram, Facebook, and Twitter for nonstop inspiration delivered fresh to your feed, every day.”
“#thisisus #randall #setlife # A post shared by Zoe Hay (@zoehaymakeup) on Sep 18, 2017 at 1:14pm PDTHere’s hoping for more shirtless moments on and off screen as Season 2 of This Is Us premieres on Tuesday on NBC.”
“Brown, along with his This Is Us co-stars Mandy Moore and Milo Ventimiglia, stopped by The Ellen DeGeneres Show ahead of Tuesday’s season premiere.”
“Given that it was the recent Emmy winner’s first time on the show, he got a little hazed.”
“Since Moore was forced to ride a toy car during her first Ellen appearance and Ventimiglia was forced to take his shirt off during his, why not combine the two for Brown?”
“Photo: @TheEllenShow via YouTubeDeGeneres had the 41-year-old actor, who won an Emmy for Outstanding Lead Actor in a Drama Series earlier this month, ride around set shirtless on a tiny tractor.”
“All we have to say is hubba-hubba.”
“This isn’t Sterling K. Brown’s first shirtless moment.”
“Ahead of the 2016 Emmys, the actor showed off a joke award he was given (before his first real Emmy for The People v. O.J.”
“Simpson) for “Best Courtroom Abs.”Photo: @sterlingkbrown via InstagramHowever, it wasn’t until a few months ago when he really set the internet ablaze, showing off his fit physique with a full-on mirror selfie.”


"Read more about Yahoo's lifestyle: follow us on instagram, Facebook and Twitter to provide fresh inspiration for your feed every day."
"#thisius#randall#setlife#zoe hay (@ zoehay makeup artist) shared a post at the US Premiere of NBC on Tuesday, September 18, 2017 at 1:14 p.m., hoping to have more shirtless moments on and off the screen."
"Brown and his" this is America "co stars Mandy Moore and Milo ventimilia went to Ellen DeGeneres before the premiere on Tuesday
"Considering that this is the first time the Emmy winner has been on the show recently, he's a bit confused."
"Since Moore was forced to ride in a toy car when he first showed up with Ellen, and Ventimiglia was forced to take off her shirt when she first showed up with Ellen, why not combine the two clothes into one?"
"Photo: @ the EllenShow via YouTube genes has the 41 year old actor, Emmy winning actor in a drama series earlier this month, riding naked on a small tractor."
"We're talking about habah habah."
"It's not the first time that sterling K. Brown has been barefaced."
"Before the 2016 Emmy, the actor showed off a joke award he won (before his first real Emmy was presented to the people's v.o.j.)."
Photo: @ sterlingkbrown via instagramhower, only a few months ago did he really shine on the Internet, showing his healthy physique with a full mirror self portrait



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Press PLAY on the trailer above to get a taste of the final season, then hit the comments: Are you planning to watch?”
“In keeping with Netflix’s model, all Season 3 episodes will be available to stream on May 26.”
“Season 2 of the slow-burn series ended with Rayburn sibling John (played by Kyle Chandler) driving out of town just as Marco (Enrique Murciano) got some very interesting news about Danny’s death… and then died after Kevin beat the salt water outta him with a stone dolphin.”
“The 10-episode third season — down from an original order of 13 — will follow John and his kin as they “reach the end of their morally ambiguous journey,” per the series’ official release.”
“The tortured family at the center of Netflix’s engrossing drama will return for a final season on Friday, May 26, the streaming video service announced Monday.”
“It’s the end of the Bloodline for the Rayburns.”


"Click play in the trailer above to enjoy the last season, and then click comment: are you going to watch it?"
"According to Netflix's model, all episodes of the third season will be broadcast on May 26."
"At the end of the second season of the slow burn series, John (Kyle Chandler) drives out of town, while mark (Enrique murciano) gets some interesting news about Denny's death Then Kevin beat out his salt water with a stone dolphin and he died
According to the official release of the series, the 10 episodes of the third season - reduced from the original 13 episodes to now - will follow John and his relatives "to the end of the journey of moral ambiguity."
The battered family will return to Netflix's last season on Friday, the streaming video service announced on Monday
"This is the end of the ray burns family."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I failed as a negotiator because I gave up early.”
“I got mad at myself.”
“Jennifer Lawrence Movies'The Hunger Games'In 2012, Lawrence became a box-office sensation as Katniss Everdeen, the lead in The Hunger Games, the film adaptation of the bestselling novel by Suzanne Collins.”
“She also took on the role of Mystique in X-Men: First Class.”
“Opportunities continued to pour in, and in 2011 Lawrence appeared in The Beaver with Mel Gibson, Jodie Foster and Anton Yelchin.”
“After The Bill Engvall Show was canceled, Lawrence went on to appear in the critically acclaimed Winter’s Bone in 2010, which earned her nominations for an Academy Award, a Golden Globe and a Screen Actors Guild Award.”
“While working on the series, she also appeared in feature films including The Poker House and The Burning Plain alongside Charlize Theron and Kim Basinger.”
“Soon after, Lawrence and her family moved to Los Angeles, where she had small roles on the series Medium, Monk and Cold Case, before landing a part on the TV series The Bill Engvall Show.”
“(The film was shelved due to lack of distribution and was eventually released in 2013.)”
“Things happened quickly after that: Lawrence stayed in New York City for the summer, acting in commercials for MTV and filming the 2007 thriller Devil You Know with Lena Olin.”


"I failed as a negotiator because I gave up early."
"I'm angry with myself."
Jennifer Lawrence's movie "hunger game" in 2012, Lawrence starred in Susan Collins best-selling novel adaptation of the film "hunger game" and box office sensation
"She also played a mysterious role in X-Men: first class."
"Opportunities are pouring in. In 2011, Lawrence starred in beaver with Mel Gibson, Judy foster and Anton Yeltsin
"After bill enval's performance was canceled, Lawrence starred in the highly acclaimed winter's bones in 2010 and was nominated for an Academy Award, a Golden Globe Award and a Screen Actors Guild Award."
While filming the series, she also starred in feature films including "Poker House" and "burning Plains" with Charlize Theron and Kim Basinger
Soon after, Lawrence and her family moved to Los Angeles, where she played small roles in the TV series "the monk and the cold case" and then got a role in the TV series "bill enval show."
"(the film was shelved due to insufficient distribution and was finally released in 2013)"
And then it happened: Lawrence spent a summer in New York, advertising for MTV, and shooting the 2007 thriller "the devil you know" with Lena Olin



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian, welcomed a baby girl named Chicago via a surrogatein January and her sister Khloe Kardashian is due to give birth in two months.”
“He was arrested after his concert and police claimed he "encouraged people to rush the stage" but his lawyer said video footage did not support the allegations so other charges of inciting a riot and endangering the welfare of a minor were dismissed.”
“On the same day her name was disclosed, it was revealed Stormi's father, rapper Travis Scott - real name Jacques Webster - had pleaded guilty to disorderly conduct for an incident last year at a concert in Arkansas.”
“Image: Pic: Kylie Jenner/YoutubeDuring her pregnancy there were several rumours which she chose not to address, only posting pictures on social media where her stomach could not be seen.”
“Jenner also shared an 11-minute video giving fans a peek into the last nine months, from the time she found out she was expecting until the baby's birth.”
“She said pregnancy had been the most "beautiful, empowering and life changing experience" of her life and she is "actually going to miss it".”
“Image: Pic: Kylie Jenner/YoutubeThe star has been in the spotlight since she was nine years old as part of the Jenner-Kardashian family on reality TV show Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“"I knew my baby would feel every stress and every emotion so I chose to do it this way for my little life and our happiness."”
“She said: "There was no gotcha moment, no big paid reveal I had planned.”
“Jenner apologised to fans for "keeping you in the dark" and said she kept the pregnancy private because she needed to "prepare for this role of a lifetime in the most positive, stress free, and healthy way I knew how".”


Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian, is expecting a baby girl named Chicago through a surrogate in January. Her sister, helo Kardashian, will give birth in two months
He was arrested after the concert, and police claimed that he "encouraged people to rush onto the stage," but his lawyer said the video did not support the charges, so other charges of inciting riots and endangering the welfare of minors were dismissed
On the same day that her name was revealed, Tommy's father, rapper Travis Scott (real name Jacques Webster), pleaded guilty to disorderly conduct at a concert in Arkansas last year
"Picture: picture: during Kelly Jenner / utu's pregnancy, there were several rumors that she chose not to publish, just posted some pictures of her belly on social media that she couldn't see."
"Jenna also shared an 11 minute video to give fans a glimpse of the past nine months, from her discovery of pregnancy to the birth of her baby."
She said pregnancy was the most "beautiful, powerful and life changing experience" of her life, and she "will actually miss it."
"Photo source: Kylie Jenner / youtube, a star who has been a member of the Jenner Kardashian family on the reality TV show" keep up with Kardashian "since she was nine years old, has been receiving much attention."
"I know my baby will feel every kind of pressure and emotion, so I choose to do it for my little life and our happiness."
"I didn't seize the moment, I didn't plan to expose," she said
Jenna apologized to fans for "keeping you in the dark" and said she kept pregnancy secret because she needed to "prepare for the role of her life in the most positive, stress free and healthy way I know."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...https t co 0tPGr1cNEM HamillHimself HamillHimself November 25 2017 Former NSYNC member Lance Bass quipped Tiger Beat called and said I was probably going to be Boybander of the year but it was going to take a long photo shoot...”
“Thanks anyway!”
“I don't know who else can be the Time magazine person of the year other than our president, Donald Trump.”
“— TIME (@TIME) November 25, 2017Former Trump campaign manager Corey Lewandowski then fired back at the magazine, telling Fox News, "The mainstream media has never wanted to give this president the credit that he's deserved.”
“TIME does not comment on our choice until publication, which is December 6.”
“The President is incorrect about how we choose Person of the Year.”
“Time does not comment on our choice until publication, which is December 6."”
“Taking to its own Twitter account, the magazine stated, "The president is incorrect about how we choose Person of the Year.”
“— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) November 24, 2017Time quickly disputed Trump's claim.”


“… Before November 25, 2017, nsync member lance bass called Tiger beat and said, "I may be the best male singer of the year, but it will take a long time to take photos..."
"Thank you all the same!"
"I don't know who will be time's person of the year other than our president, Donald Trump."
"- time (@ time) on November 25, 2017, former trump campaign manager Corey Lewandowski later countered the magazine, telling Fox News that" the mainstream media never thought about giving the president the honor he deserved. "
"Time will not comment on our choice until December 6."
"The president is wrong about how we choose the person of the year."
"Time will not comment on our choices until December 6."
"The president is wrong about how we choose our person of the year," the magazine said on its twitter account
"- Donald J. trump (@ real Donald Trump) on November 24, 2017, Time magazine quickly questioned Trump's statement."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The surviving members of Linkin Park subsequently cancelled the remainder of their North American tour, and vowed to memorialize Bennington in their home city, Los Angeles, presumably in the near future.”
“"Bennington died on July 20 in an apparent suicide .”
“...around the world for your outpouring of love and support...”
“Soundtracked by an instrumental version of Linkin Park s One More Light it shows the candlelight vigils and balloon releases fans have organized in Bennington s memory while also reminding us of the global resonation of his music The band simply captioned the video Thank you to our fans from...”
“Indonesia Peru and the U S among other countries...”
“...pic twitter com W0idQCmt8G LINKIN PARK linkinpark September 7 2017 Almost two months after Chester Bennington s death Linkin Park have shared a moving video highlighting the ways fans around the world have paid tribute to him The two minute montage collects footage from memorials in China Germany Russia Mexico...”
“Thank you to our fans from around the world for your outpouring of love and support.”


"The surviving members of Lincoln Park later cancelled the rest of their North American tour and vowed to commemorate Bennington in their hometown of Los Angeles in the near future."
"Bennington died of apparent suicide on July 20."
“… Love and support from all over the world... "
"Voiced by the instrumental version of one more lamp by Lynn Parker, it shows the candlelight vigil and balloon release activities organized by fans in benington's memory, and also reminds us that his music resonates all over the world. The band just added a title to the video to thank us for our fans coming from..."
"Indonesia, Peru and the United States..."
“… Pic twitter com w0idqcmt8g Linkin Park linkin park nearly two months after Chester Bennington's death on September 7, 2017, Linkin Park shared a touching video, highlighting the way fans around the world pay homage to him. The two minute montage collected scenes of memorials in China, Germany, Russia and Mexico... "
"Thank you to our fans from all over the world for your love and support."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.26842105263157895
Correct number is  51
Total number is  190
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
